_	In contrast, philosophers who define the right to life by reference to particular levels of physical or psychological development typically maintain that such characteristics are morally relevant, and reject the assumption that all human life necessarily has value (or that membership in the species "Homo sapiens" is in itself morally relevant).
_	The algorithm is based on the assumption that most users have a general conception of which documents should be denoted as relevant or non-relevant.
_	Now let's suppose that we abandon the assumption that the clocks are
_	Under the assumption that formula_43 and formula_42 vary slowly with tip-sample bias, the features in formula_46 reflect the sample DOS, formula_4.
_	Linnaeus gave the black wolves of Europe the binomial name "Canis lycaon", under the assumption that the species was distinct from grey and white coloured wolves.
_	Frequent hybridisation between species in natural populations challenges the assumption that species have evolved from a common ancestor by simple branching, in which branches are genetically isolated.
_	Some commentators have remarked that the NCMP scheme is premised on the assumption that the one party-dominance will continue to govern Singapore's political state of affairs.
_	In marketing, geodemographic segmentation is a multivariate statistical classification technique for discovering whether the individuals of a population fall into different groups by making quantitative comparisons of multiple characteristics with the assumption that the differences within any group should be less than the differences between groups.
_	At the heart of this approach is the assumption that evolutionary processes are driven by entrepreneurs and organizations’ struggles to obtain scarce resources, both social and physical.
_	The Uralo-Siberian hypothesis is rooted in the assumption that this distinct typological profile was, rather than an areal profile common to four unrelated language families, the profile of a "single" language ancestral to all four: Proto-Uralo-Siberian.
_	Fathers' rights campaigners question the assumption that it can ever be legitimate for the state to collude in disrupting a loving and natural relationship between a father and his children.
_	In computational complexity theory, the oracle model has led to unconditional lower bounds proving that certain matroid problems cannot be solved in polynomial time, without invoking unproved assumptions such as the assumption that P ≠ NP.
_	The proof relies heavily on the assumption that the external potential can be expanded in a Taylor series about the initial time.
_	Under the assumption that the Palatinate was therefore undefended, Baden and Württemberg troops marched from Bretten with 8,000 men and invaded the state.
_	Richard Felson challenges the assumption that violence against women is different from violence against men.
_	Implicit in Tirpitz's theory was the assumption that the British would adopt an offensive strategy that would allow the Germans to use mines and submarines to even the numerical odds before fighting a decisive battle between Heligoland and the Thames.
_	Like many privileged foreigners, he was sent to the Assassins' Guild as a child on the assumption that he would get an excellent education.
_	By contrast, the adult males of Epipaschiinae are easier to recognize, and three of their traits support the assumption that Epipaschiinae are a natural, monophyletic group:
_	Galbraith also critiqued the assumption that continually increasing material production is a sign of economic and societal health.
_	The Washington Metro sells a 7-day Short Trip Pass good for any trip during peak hours (when fares, effective 2014, can range up to $5.90) up to the maximum off-peak fare of $3.60, clearly under the assumption that it would not be worth people’s time to exit and re-board.
_	Statements of their "little power" refer implicitly to the assumption that fighting for workers' interests was their purpose, which it was on paper but not in reality.
_	Hussey's claim was largely based on the assumption that the south wing was completed in 1680, at a time when Jones would have been dead for 20 years.
_	So not true the assumption that Al-Irshad is an organization of people of Arab descent."
_	This approach led to a series of methods for developing creativity based on the assumption that a quantitative increase of ideas will necessarily bring about a qualitative improvement.
_	At the heart of a contextual theory of happiness is the assumption that pleasantness is a judgment where the underlying dimensions are degrees of freedom.
_	A later column pointed this out, so they said they would not deliberately contradict it, even though they would still go from the assumption that it never happened.
_	However, Durgasimha (or his source) puts forward his own legendary textual history, based on the assumption that the "Panchatantra" was originally part of the "Brihatkatha" (when in fact "[i]t appears that the original "Bṛhatkathā" did not include the "Pañcatantra", but a later version made in Kashmir or north-western India seems to have inserted the "Pañcatantra" into its repertoire of stories").
_	Times are given with the assumption that the gorge is walked at very slow pace and with at least one stop.
_	The physical reasoning behind this approximation is the assumption that the axial gradient of the flow field of interest is of much smaller magnitude than the radial gradient.
_	The mean basic reproduction number, averaged across all infected individuals, is given by formula_67, under the assumption that the background mortality rate is negligible compared to the rate of recovery formula_40.
_	Joseph Shipman showed in 2007 that the assumption that odd degree polynomials have roots is stronger than necessary; any field in which polynomials of prime degree have roots is algebraically closed (so "odd" can be replaced by "odd prime" and furthermore this holds for fields of all characteristics).
_	Rommel was a suitable candidate, since his suicide following the failed 20 July plot had led to the assumption that he had opposed Nazism.
_	The EU-funded collaborative research project ENFIRO (EU research project FP7: 226563, concluded in 2012) started out from the assumption that not enough environmental and health data were known of alternatives to the established brominated flame retardants.
_	Advertisements for Capri follow the logic that slimmer is better, apparently influenced by the assumption that women prefer to be physically slim, since a slender figure is often presented as more desirable in women s fashion magazines and by models in the fashion industry.
_	He had never studied filmmaking before, he says, "Many times we begin with the assumption that the problem of film is on the technical knowledge, but the technical rules are the quickest to learn and the least you use.
_	During colonialism, the British codified several aspects of the Hindu legal tradition into the Indian legal system, with the assumption that all Indians were Hindus.
_	When the M-code comes to an end (and it must, because of the assumption that these M-codes are finite algorithms), the "figures" will begin as 1s and 0s on alternate squares, proceeding to the right forever.
_	On February 18, 2016, the FBI revealed that they have not ruled out the possibility of a third shooter, but clarified that they are continuing to operate under the assumption that only two shooters were involved.
_	Reservoir sampling makes the assumption that the desired sample fits into main memory, often implying that formula_4 is a constant independent of formula_43.
_	Initial statements by investigators and scientific consultants were founded on the assumption that the bundled bills washed freely into the Columbia River from one of its many connecting tributaries.
_	Modern trends have been towards 36 inches or 900 mm, based on the assumption that its purpose is to protect the wall from chair backs.
_	The complexity for revision schemes is determined in the assumption that the extra information needed to compute revision is given in some compact form.
_	The problem is that codice_5 is designed on the assumption that the page is only accessed in a non-malicious way.
_	We are interested in a bidder's expected value from the auction (the expected value of the item, minus the expected price) conditioned on the assumption that the bidder wins the auction.
_	Another issue economists have is with the assumption that monetary policy has its strongest influence on short-term interest rates, such as the federal funds rate.
_	Critics claim that the Michigan model exaggerates the assumption that party identification is cemented by circumstances, but rather that party identification can change in light of a party's performance or other circumstances.
_	More precisely, Feld-Tai reciprocity requires the Hermitian (or rather, complex-symmetric) symmetry of the electromagnetic operators as above, but also relies on the assumption that the operator relating formula_18 and formula_119 is a constant scalar multiple of the operator relating formula_120 and formula_121, which is true when ε is a constant scalar multiple of μ (the two operators generally differ by an interchange of ε and μ).
_	The last line follows from the assumption that both real interest rates and the inflation rate are fairly small, (perhaps on the order of several percent, although this depends on the application) therefore is much larger than and so can be dropped.
_	She further blames Cyril for having instigated the murder and concludes that all of Hypatia's writings were burned in the Library of Alexandria when it was deliberately destroyed, apparently under the assumption that this was done many years later.
_	Alexander Vasiliev pointed out that Emperor Theophilus provided for the safe conduct of the Rus', who had somehow arrived at Constantinople (ca. 838), through Frankish lands by his embassy to Louis the Pious of 839, as witnessed to by the Annals of St. Bertin, which is inconsistent with the assumption that the raid had at that time already taken place.
_	The episode ends with Homer, still under the assumption that it is April Fools' Day, trying to fool the family by saying he is taking them to Hawaii.
_	Don Santiago scoffs, refusing to consider Americans any threat to his way of life; Alvaro wants to know what military action can be undertaken to stave off the American forces; Luis Gonzaga contemplates whether or not Americans really are the uncultured hoodlums he has heard them to be; María de los Ángeles, under the assumption that Americans are not Catholic, assumes the invasion is punishment from God for Mexico's sins; and Susanita wonders what it would be like to dance with a tall white-skinned man.
_	Under certain engineering assumptions (e.g. besides the above assumptions for a constant failure rate, the assumption that the considered system has no relevant redundancies), the failure rate for a complex system is simply the sum of the individual failure rates of its components, as long as the units are consistent, e.g. failures per million hours.
_	The surveyors designing the line had worked on the assumption that the wagons would have a load on each wheel of and had designed the line accordingly.
_	Ia supernovae which happened in the universe's remote past, paired with the assumption that the physics involved in these events is universal, allows for an upper bound of less than 10 per year for the gravitational constant over the last nine billion years.
_	For instance, the reactant concentrations must always obey the assumption that the initial concentration of the guest ([G]) is much larger than the initial concentration of the host ([H]).
_	For half an hour the battle continued until wreckage was seen falling from "Bravoure" and Barton ordered his ship to ceasefire on the assumption that the French ship had surrendered.
_	The 1st Canadian Infantry Brigade of the 1st Canadian Infantry Division began its arrival at Brest on 11 June and was sent to Sablé-sur-Sarthe, on the assumption that two fresh divisions would be enough to allow the Tenth Army to retreat through them and take up positions prepared around the Brest peninsula.
_	It requires the assumption that soil is uniform within layers.
_	However, for antiplane shear, with the assumption that body forces in the 1 and 2 directions are 0, these reduce to one equilibrium equation which is expressed as
_	This coincided with the assumption that Japan has achieved the third stage of the “flying geese” pattern of development - an economic model that was influential to Japanese lawmakers at the time.
_	A number of solutions have been proposed to mitigate the potential harm of a nuclear winter if one appears inevitable; with the problem being attacked at both ends, from those focusing on preventing the growth of fires and therefore limiting the amount of smoke that reaches the stratosphere in the first place, and those focusing on food production with reduced sunlight, with the assumption that the very worst-case analysis results of the nuclear winter models prove accurate and no other mitigation strategies are fielded.
_	Note that the first (and only the first) full adder may be replaced by a half adder (under the assumption that "C" = 0).
_	The Anglo-French effort to include the Balkans into the "peace front" had always rested on the assumption that the cornerstone of the "peace front" in the Balkans was to be Turkey, the regional super-power.
_	The metaphor with the mental landscape is based on the assumption that certain signal patterns give rise to a better well-being or performance.
_	The first step, called the accumulation step, as the name suggests, clusters the line segments with the assumption that a cluster will share a common vanishing point.
_	On the night of October 19–20, Givati's 51st Battalion made its assault, under the assumption that the fort was manned by one demoralized Egyptian platoon.
_	The same evidence is also consistent with the assumption that they were fricative sounds (as opposed to approximants or stops), an assumption which is strongly supported by the behaviour of laryngeals in consonant clusters.
_	One is the epistemological approach, the assumption that the scientific method trumps other ways of knowing and the ontological approach, that the rational mind reflects the world and both operate in knowable ways.
_	The framework of high/low hierarchies makes sense only under the assumption that P is not NP.
_	As neither system had been released yet, the team was under the assumption that the 3D features would require 3D character models.
_	For a while it was theorised that ostriches evolved in India during this epoch, under the assumption that European ratites like "Palaeotis" represented recent Asiatic migrations.
_	The operating system relies on the assumption that if it sees item #1 is present (saying the file is about to be saved), but that item #4 is missing (confirming success), that the save operation was unsuccessful and so it should undo any incomplete steps already taken to save it (e.g. marking sector 123 free since it never was properly filled, and removing any record of XYZ from the file directory).
_	This was often tolerated among the educated middle classes, with the assumption that such behavior was asexual and would stop when the girl married.
_	This relation "Q" is proved to be total: if it had a pair of incomparable elements then the transformation could be applied to it, leading to another strict partial order that extends "R" and strictly contains "Q", therefore contradicting the assumption that the "Q" is maximal in the set of strict partial orders extending "R".
_	The copy was most commonly known as "The Dying Gladiator" until the 20th century on the assumption that it depicted a wounded gladiator in a Roman amphitheatre.
_	While "sheltering in place" is staying indoors, in a preferably sealed tight basement, or internal room, for a number of hours, with the oxygen supply available in such a scenario being more than sufficient for 3+ hours in even the smallest average room, under the assumption that the improvised seal is perfect, until carbon dioxide levels begin to reach unsafe values and necessitate room unsealing for a number of minutes to create a room air change.
_	This statement does not mention the power series, but the assumption that formula_13 is entire was used by Macintyre.
_	Jewish mystical exegesis is a method of interpreting the Bible based on the assumption that the Torah contains secret knowledge regarding creation and the manifestations of God.
_	This means that under the assumption that the underlying statistics of the system are stationary, the n-th order correlation functions do not change when every time argument is translated by the same amount.
_	Related later research looked at cross-cultural differences in attachment, and concluded that there should be re-evaluation of the assumption that attachment is expressed identically in all humans.
_	The resurgence of interest in social capital as a remedy for the cause of today's social problems draws directly on the assumption that these problems lie in the weakening of civil society.
_	Most of the opposition centers around the assumption that many of the day-laborers in Montgomery County are undocumented workers, mostly from Central America.
_	If a pilot could not establish clear contact with the tower, visual flight rules stated that he should only continue the approach with extreme caution under the assumption that conflicting air traffic was in the area.
_	Using this, futures rates, along with the assumption that arbitrage opportunities will be minimal in future markets, and that futures rates are unbiased estimates of forthcoming spot rates, provide enough information to construct a complete expected yield curve.
_	By comparison, a jingle fallacy is based on the assumption that two measures which are called by the same name capture the same construct.
_	Landlord–tenant law generally recognizes differences between residential and commercial leases on the assumption that residential leases present much more of a risk of unequal bargaining power than commercial leases.
_	Standpoint theorists argue that standpoints are relative and cannot be evaluated by any absolute criteria, but make the assumption that the oppressed are less biased or more impartial than the privileged.
_	The French admiral made the assumption that Cornwallis must have sighted assistance beyond his own field of vision and had turned to engage the enemy knowing that a superior force was nearby to come to their relief.
_	Therefore, the assumption that formula_27 is false is an expansion.
_	The novel is based on the assumption that the miracles described did actually happen and that Saint Demetrius, as well as numerous other beings of the Christian as well as Classical Greek and Slavic mythologies, appeared and took part in the siege of Thessalonica.
_	Walden (2011, p. 5) suggests that Bettina Brentano was Beethoven’s "Immortal Beloved", based on the assumption that one of the two spurious letters by Beethoven to her is true:
_	Duncan Watts and Peter Dodds examined the phenomenon through a computer network simulation under the assumption that influential people are more difficult to influence, therefore social hubs have a lower tendency to adopt new products.
_	Since many genetic disease alleles are recessive and because the word dominance has a positive connotation, the assumption that the dominant phenotype is superior with respect to fitness is often made.
_	For this reason, distributive negotiation is also sometimes called "win-lose" because of the assumption that one person's gain is another person's loss.
_	The following sizing methodology is based on the assumption that those flow rates are known.
_	By applying a standard logit model to panel data you are making the assumption that the unobserved factors that affect a person's choice are new every time the person makes the choice.
_	The proof only relies on the Schrödinger equation and the assumption that partial derivatives with respect to λ and t can be interchanged.
_	Referring to Steffensen, he dismisses the assumption that "any large Scandinavian host could be composed exclusively and over a long period of dark-haired individuals" as being unrealistic.
_	In the 18th century it was common practice to ignore any negative results derived from equations, on the assumption that they were meaningless.
_	Japanese intelligence never learned of the existence of these airfields and the Japanese tactical decisions were based on the assumption that their attack on Dutch Harbor would not be opposed by land-based aircraft.
_	This process exploits the contrast principle, which follows the assumption that the perception of human conduct is influenced by what it is compared against.
_	Bartlett's studies relating to the nosology of mental illness and his critique of the assumption that psychological normality should be equated with good mental health led him to examine the psychology of creative individuals.
_	Wieser based his "theory of imputation" on the assumption that factors of production are combined in fixed proportions in each industry, but at different rates in different industries.
_	This design was made with the assumption that students would grow in the meantime.
_	The difference is based on the assumption that offense may cause discomfort, but does not necessarily cause harm.
_	They are not to be sustained, except upon the assumption that there is still, in this land of universal liberty, a class which may yet be discriminated against, even in respect of rights of a character so essential and so supreme, that, deprived of their enjoyment, in common with others, a freeman is not only branded as one inferior and infected, but, in the competitions of life, is robbed of some of the most necessary means of existence; and all this solely because they belong to a particular race which the nation has liberated.
_	Geppetto's solution seemed obvious, to create new children, initially older sons, operating under the assumption that they would prove more mature than Pinocchio, then turning his hand to daughters.
_	Pakistan's tactical plan was based on the assumption that an attack in the area would help Pakistan’s 1st Armoured Divisions task in the Sri Ganganagar area.
_	Oxygen balance applies to traditional explosives mechanics with the assumption that carbon is oxidized to carbon monoxide and carbon dioxide during detonation.
_	The model is based on the assumption that the innovators privately creating the public goods benefit more than the free-riders only consuming the public good.
_	This procedure involves removal of amniotic fluid periodically throughout the pregnancy under the assumption that the extra fluid in the recipient twin can cause preterm labor, perinatal mortality, or tissue damage.
_	The engraved suggestion to keep humanity's population below 500 million could have been made under the assumption that war had already reduced humanity below this number.
_	Bandić won almost 80% of all Hebrang voters as well as 57% of Primorac's voters and obtained 3 quarters of all HDZ voters, confirming the assumption that Bandić mostly appealed to the right.
_	The UKAEA study used the assumption that protective systems either worked or failed, with the probability of failure per demand being calculated using fault trees or similar analysis methods.
_	Several theorists (e.g., Kirman and Sondermann) point out that when one drops the assumption that there are only finitely many individuals, one can find aggregation rules that satisfy all of Arrow's other conditions.
_	Since he was a member of the burakumin, a social minority frequently discriminated against, human rights groups and lawyers claimed that the courts made the assumption that he was guilty.
_	Edmund Wilson's early analysis of the book, "The Dream of H. C. Earwicker", made the assumption that Earwicker himself is the dreamer of the dream, an assumption which continued to carry weight with Wakean scholars Harry Levin, Hugh Kenner, and William Troy.
_	Its large bill suggests the assumption that its main diet included large seeds.
_	For, suppose (by NL-completeness) that there existed a deterministic logspace reduction "r" that maps an instance "y" of problem "Y" to an instance "x" of problem "X", and also (by the assumption that "X" is in L) that there exists a deterministic logspace algorithm "A" for solving problem "X".
_	The more limited debate (operating on the assumption that "Amphibia" is a monophyletic clade) is whether "Caudata" is more closely related to "Anura" (in a shared clade called "Batrachia" — the traditional view) or to "Gymnophiona" (suggested by research in 2005).
_	We now use the assumption that formula_7 is large compared to other scales in the problem; we therefore neglect the last term in the equation, and get a 1-dimensional diffusion equation:
_	It was usually written without tones under the assumption that the proper tones could be understood from context.
_	This led him to author "Darwin on Trial" (1991), which examined the evidence for evolution from a religious point of view and challenged the assumption that the only reasonable explanation for the origin of species must be a naturalistic one, though science is defined by searching for natural explanations for phenomena.
_	Shopper marketing challenges the assumption that the shopper and the consumer are the same.
_	He left detailed planning for later on the assumption that success in achieving Line Kansas, and thus the dam operation, was some days away.
_	Historically social ownership implied that capital and factor markets would cease to exist under the assumption that market exchanges within the production process would be made redundant if capital goods were owned by a single entity or network of entities representing society, but the articulation of models of market socialism where factor markets are utilized for allocating capital goods between socially owned enterprises broadened the definition to include autonomous entities within a market economy.
_	Solovyov wrote that Blavatskyan theosophy based only "on the assumption that there is some kind of secret wisdom", and described it as a doctrine not only "anti-religious" and "antiphilosophic", but also "anti-scientific".
_	There are conflicting data concerning the importance of this layer, and these are explained in the literature either by the existence of an additional signaling positional mechanism that interacts with the reelin cascade, or by the assumption that mice that are used in such experiments have redundant secretion of reelin compared with more localized synthesis in the human brain.
_	While the text is, compared to similar novels, accepting of Africa and its "potential", it operates on the assumption that Africa can be made better through the introduction of Western ideals (particularly those of Protestantism).
_	She argued that there are a disproportionate number of women who are nurses, and that denying admission to men "lends credibility to the old view that women, not men, should become nurses, and makes the assumption that nursing is a field for women a self-fulfilling prophecy.
_	The stochastic interpretation rests upon the assumption that the quantum vacuum consists of real fields.
_	The inertial compensation makes the profile data more or less independent of what speed the profilometer vehicle had during the measurements, with the assumption that the vehicle does not make large speed variations and the speed is kept above 25 km/h or 15 mph.
_	Semiorders were introduced and applied in mathematical psychology by as a model of human preference without the assumption that indifference is transitive.
_	Von Weizsäcker (1962), along with Samuelson (1971), analysed the problem under the assumption that the economy grows at a constant rate following the Golden Rule of Accumulation.
_	Without the assumption that "A" is Noetherian, the statement of the Artin-Tate lemma is no longer true.
_	Based on the assumption that MD is similar in nature to a migraine, some advise eliminating "migraine triggers" like caffeine.
_	Simply put, the method looks for commonalities in multiple sources with the assumption that, the more sources that report an event or saying, the more likely that event or saying is historically accurate.
_	He begins to make elaborate plans to murder Nevern on the assumption that Margaret will then inherit her husband's estate.
_	TERP is a calculated price for a company's stock shares after issuing new rights-shares with the assumption that all these newly issued shares are taken up by the existing shareholders.
_	Mapping refers to a family of computer algorithms in probabilistic robotics for mobile robots which address the problem of generating maps from noisy and uncertain sensor measurement data, with the assumption that the robot pose is known.
_	Alternatively, one can reject the assumption that the smaller wheel is independent of the larger wheel.
_	Lichenometry is based on the assumption that the largest lichen growing on a rock is the oldest individual.
_	The stylistic difference between the Hellenistic style portrayed in more riders and reproduced in the Parthian style in other characters led to the assumption that the four men were later carved into the rock on the right side.
_	Newton's law of universal gravitation, part of classical mechanics, does not provide for their existence, since that law is predicated on the assumption that physical interactions propagate instantaneously (at infinite speed)—showing one of the ways the methods of classical physics are unable to explain phenomena associated with relativity.
_	Since the draw for the second qualifying round took place before the results of the previous round were known, the seeding was carried out under the assumption that the team with the higher coefficient of an undecided tie would advance to this round, which meant if the team with the lower coefficient was to advance, it simply took the seeding of its defeated opponent.
_	During the investigation, Hamburg police contacted about 11,500 Hamburg doctors, operating under the assumption that the perpetrator was injured himself during the attack.
_	Consequently, some of the findings of the first commission— those based on the assumption that "Voyager" was under appropriate command—required reevaluation.
_	This is because the assumption that the demand for industrial goods is high seems unrealistic, since the real wage in the agricultural sector is extremely low and that hinders the demand for industrial goods.
_	It asks cities to come up with a plan to end chronic homelessness under the assumption that if homeless people are given independent housing immediately with some social and financial support, then there will be reduced needs for emergency homeless shelters.
_	Steele notes that commodities almost never have equal quantities of labor and that Marx's argument rests upon the assumption that when commodities are exchanged, they must have "something" in common and that something can be nothing but labor.
_	Sure enough, one producer made what Welles later called a "wonderful offer", but Antoine turned it down on the assumption that an even better offer would arrive.
_	This, as well as the fact that all the amoraim mentioned in this midrash resided in the Land of Israel, justifies the assumption that its compiler resided there as well.
_	Though Walker denies Cosmopolitanism and the assumption that state sovereignty will eventually be a thing of the past, he stresses the importance of Modern theorists to acknowledge the decline of a states ability to act autonomously within its own fixed borders.
_	In it Arnheim critiques the assumption that language goes before perception and that words are the stepping stones of thinking.
_	The algorithm is formally justified by the assumption that the data are generated by a mixture model, and the components of this mixture model are exactly the classes of the classification problem.
_	Former UN diplomats commented that UN officials already work under the assumption that they are spied on and are used to getting around it, but the surprise in this case was that it was done by other diplomats rather than intelligence agencies.
_	In Asia there has also been a tendency to hire TEFL teachers on superficial criteria, such as race (with Caucasians preferred) on the assumption that an English teacher or native English speaker should be 'white', this is proven especially true in Thailand, a big employer of TEFL teachers, with adverts frequently calling explicitly for native-English speakers.
_	The central premise of the "hegemony of hegemony" is "the assumption that effective social change can only be achieved simultaneously and "en masse", across an entire national or supranational space".
_	In a March 2009 interview with Rustavi 2 TV, Merabishvili said the assumption that he was the most powerful figure in Saakashvili's administration was "over-exaggerated", yet confirmed that in some cases the President had given him broader tasks.
_	Using the assumption that the vapor flow is limited to sonic velocities, one gets that formula_5, where Po is atmospheric pressure and Pr is recoil pressure.
_	However, the whole concept was based on the assumption that the Swedish open sea fleet would be able to decisively defeat its Russian counterpart.
_	Rational analysis starts from the assumption that the mind is adapted to its environment.
_	Shaan (Satyadeep Mishra), a close friend, takes Mehak to an empty apartment, on the assumption that living alone for a while might benefit her.
_	Lloyd Dumas has challenged one of the implicit assumptions of the Keynesian Revolution ... the assumption that all activity which is paid for must be productive.
_	Other psychologists have questioned the assumption that moral action is primarily a result of formal reasoning.
_	In April, 1996 the Vancouver Management Resource Group stated that the Vancouver Health Board was in the process of developing a budget based on the assumption that decreases in Federal transfer payments would mean a status quo or reduced budget overall for 1996/1997”.
_	These critics did not appreciate the assumption that they should identify with the characters simply based on the fact that they were Asian.
_	The earliest pottery ever found in the Western Hemisphere, radiocarbon-dated 8,000 years old, has been excavated in the Amazon basin of Brazil, near Santarem, providing evidence to overturn the assumption that the tropical forest region was too poor in resources to have supported a complex prehistoric culture".
_	Effective participation, by contrast, is conducted on the assumption that each different situation will require a different design, using a new combination of tools as part of an evolving cycle of action and reflection by the institution involved.
_	A crippling tithe of international political effort and social action is directed to the assumption that we are", and "the climate change debate—or enforced consensus—concerns the way science is done and perceived.
_	When the Germans attacked on 10 May, Billotte's forces advanced into Belgium under the agreed Allied plan, on the assumption that the Germans would repeat their manoeuvre of World War I, attacking through Belgium into northern France, and then advance on Paris.
_	The law can be explained by the assumption that linguistic segments contain information about its structure (besides the information that needs to be communicated).
_	I dispute the assumption that everyone's attention span is getting shorter:
_	According to the Lieutenant R. Qadri, an Electrical engineer officer at "Hangor" during the time, the assigned mission was considered quite difficult and highly dangerous, with the submarine squadron sailing under the assumption that the dangerous nature of this mission meant a great mortal risk to the submarine and her crew.
_	After the demolition of the mosque in 1992, Professor Ram Sharan Sharma along with historians Suraj Bhan, M. Athar Ali and Dwijendra Narayan Jha wrote the "Historian's report to the nation" saying that the assumption that there was a temple at the disputed site was mistaken, and that there was no valid reason to destroy the mosque.
_	In the assumption that the new belief is correct, some of the old ones have to be retracted in order to maintain consistency.
_	The program was designed based on the assumption that households benefit from living in higher-opportunity neighborhoods.
_	The working of ABQL can be depicted in the table below by assuming 4 processors contending to enter the critical section with the assumption that a thread enters the critical section only once.
_	Linton viewed ascription of status as a means by which society could begin to prepare the individual from birth for his or her future functions on the assumption that the earlier training for a class can begin, the more successful it is likely to be.
_	In order to understand relational dialectics theory, one must also be aware of the assumption that there are three different types of relational dialectics.
_	Note that the assumption that the variables be independent for the above formula is very important because it is possible even for the sum of two Gaussian variables to have a skewed distribution (see this example).
_	The confusion in many family trees may have arisen from the assumption that the first son must have been the heir, as well as from the existence of several Warhams).
_	Hammon, like Otley, operates under the assumption that money can buy anything, even love, and approaches Jane not as a person but as a commodity.
_	By the assumption that "P" has width "w", and by the finite version of Dilworth's theorem, every finite subset "S" of "P" has a "w"-colorable incomparability graph.
_	In a three-page letter, Steven Miller, then acting IRS Commissioner, outlined the effects of the fiscal cliff and said that the IRS is working under the assumption that Congress would "patch" the Alternative Minimum Tax (AMT).
_	The remainder of this pit opens to an “un-ossified” region which comes somewhat close to the cochlear recess, giving one the assumption that inner ear articulation occurred directly within this region.
_	This was based on the assumption that it was a sort of "living fossil", as it resembles other Gruiformes rather than other rails in many traits.
_	After making the assumption that the number of impingements per unit time, formula_8, is constant, equation () becomes:
_	The quarry, which had been unused for around ninety years, was filled with compacted rubble and heavily overgrown with trees and shrubs, making assessment of the site difficult until significant work had been carried out, but the assumption that the floor of the quarry was flat proved to be correct.
_	Under the assumption that paid soldiers furnished with rations and suits of clothes would be better soldiers, on 18 January 1776, the Maryland Provincial Convention established the Maryland Line as a regiment of uniformed regulars.
_	The relative success of Community Transit in the late 1970s and 1980s prompted the Community Transit Board to propose consolidation with Everett Transit in 1988, though long-term planning under SNOTRAN for both agencies worked under the assumption that there would be no merger by 2000.
_	In Aronson's "Theories of Cognitive Consistency", he states: "Dissonance theory does not rest upon the assumption that man is a rational animal; rather, it suggests that man is a rationalizing animal – that he attempts to appear rational, both to others and to himself."
_	The theory operates with the assumption that every process has at least one influencing constraint, of which must be improved for the process to become more economic.
_	Blue Security operated on the assumption that as the community grew, the flow of complaints from tens or hundreds of thousands of computers would apply enough pressure on spammers and their clients to convince them to stop spamming members of the Blue Security community.
_	In other words, the scenario is formalized by the formulae above (that specify only the effects of actions) and by the assumption that the changes in the fluents over time are as minimal as possible.
_	Vahid Dastgerdi seems to be the first writer to propose this name for Nezami's first wife, but Said Nafisi (at the same time) and a recent source have challenged this interpretation of the corresponding verse in Nezami's work and the assumption that "Afaq" was the real name of his wife and have taken the "Afaq" in that verse to simply mean "horizon" rather than a proper name.
_	According to Smoluchowski aggregation, the kinetics of colloids is based on the assumption that each particle is surrounded by a "sphere influence".
_	However, critics pointed out that his reasoning is based on the assumption that Liberal voters who are denied the ability to vote for a liberal candidate would automatically vote for a NDP candidate, and that many might instead vote for the Conservatives (or simply not vote at all).
_	It was thought to be a case of petty embezzlement, with the assumption that the pilfered cash had been used by the youths to go partying that night.
_	It has been suggested that the time rate for each machine should be based on the assumption that it is being worked continuously to its full capacity.
_	Most such proposals rest on the assumption that the Earth's magnetic field would be much weaker during reversals.
_	This is due to the assumption that portions of the brain receiving increased blood flow are being used more heavily during the moment of scanning.
_	He argues that "in GAAP... material facts [should] be disclosed in a conservative, consistent, and reliable manner", and that "Financial statements [should] be prepared under the assumption that the users of such financial statements are reasonably intelligent, reasonably diligent, and are people who understand not only the uses, but also the limitations, of GAAP...
_	Currently the price of fossil fuels companies' shares is calculated under the assumption that all of the companies' fossil fuel reserves will be consumed, and so the true costs of carbon dioxide in intensifying global warming is not taken into account in a company's stock market valuation.
_	The theory is based on the assumption that people and the planet should come first, and that it is human well-being, not economic growth, which should be prioritized.
_	Center observes that "Police go on the assumption that it didn't really happen if a woman is not noticeably physically injured."
_	Transition state theory is also based on the assumption that atomic nuclei behave according to classic mechanics.
_	The détente had rested on the assumption that a "linkage" of some type could be found between the two countries, with the U.S. hoping that the signing of SALT I and an increase in Soviet–U.S. trade would stop the aggressive growth of communism in the third world.
_	Many Pagans are uncomfortable with traditional twelve-step meetings because of the use of Christian prayers, the difficulty in finding supportive sponsors, the assumption that a person's Higher Power is male, etc.
_	They argue that the assumption that heritability effects are additive overestimates heritability attributable to all genetic variation underlying disease, and thus underestimates the fraction of heritability attributable to already-discovered ones.
_	The classical dichotomy is the assumption that there is a relatively clean distinction between overall increases or decreases in prices and underlying, “nominal” economic variables.
_	For improved properties, the first analysis applied is the use of the property based on the assumption that the parcel is vacant.
_	Currently the price of fossil fuels companies' shares is calculated under the assumption that all fossil fuel reserves will be consumed.
_	Mao additionally criticized Stalin for making the assumption that socialist industrialization was a necessary precondition for the collectivization of agriculture and consequently over-prioritizing the development heavy industry in an unbalanced way.
_	"Thus the hypothesis can only be maintained on the assumption that, while consistency was the hallmark of the various documents, inconsistency was the hallmark of the redactors" (p. 19).
_	Page released a statement after the episode aired, stating that he was under the assumption that he would be sharing stories in Warrior's memory and did not know that steroids would be the only topic discussed.
_	Kerckhoffs's principle was reformulated (or perhaps independently formulated) by American mathematician Claude Shannon as "the enemy knows the system", i.e., "one ought to design systems under the assumption that the enemy will immediately gain full familiarity with them".
_	The destroyer claimed a share of the kill after depth-charging an oil slick to the south under the assumption that it was oil from "U-714", which "Wivern"s crew believed had been only been damaged by "Natal" and was attempting to escape.
_	Sum of the years' digits method of depreciation is one of the accelerated depreciation techniques which are based on the assumption that assets are generally more productive when they are new and their productivity decreases as they become old.
_	Grafman was subject to fairly extensive criticism throughout the rest of his life, including from some within the Jewish community, based on the assumption that he had been pro-segregation.
_	This was based on the assumption that Leo, having left Granada, would not have wanted to live under Christian Spanish rule again, and his wish (recorded in "Description of Africa") that he wanted to ultimately return to his home country "by God's assistance".
_	The study of Victorian masculinity is based on the assumption that "the construction of male consciousness must be seen as historically specific."
_	In other words, the MP works on the assumption that universal grammar constitutes a perfect design in the sense that it contains only what is necessary to meet humans' conceptual and physical (phonological) needs.
_	The DIR model is based on the assumption that the core developmental foundations for thinking, relating, and communicating can be favorably influenced by work with children’s emotions and their effects.
_	On the assumption that the Ottonians were aware that the cameo was a portrait of Augustus, it served to link the Ottonian dynasty with the original Roman emperors, and assert them as God's representatives on earth.
_	A-weighting uses a weighting curve based on ‘equal-loudness contours’ that describe our hearing sensitivity to pure tones, but it turns out that the assumption that such contours would be valid for noise components was wrong.
_	Philip Johnson-Laird and Ruth M.J. Byrne developed a theory of mental models which makes the assumption that reasoning depends, not on logical form, but on mental models (Johnson-Laird and Byrne, 1991).
_	Child pornography is illegal in the US and is not looked at in terms of the typical guidelines of the First Amendment, due to the assumption that it always harms children when it is made, sold, and/or owned.
_	This logic rests on the assumption that the conservatizing strategy of in-group cohesion is maladaptive as it risks locking the businesses into early success and strategies, which in the absence of new information can easily become detrimental in a rapidly changing business environment.
_	Unlike those who came before him, he discarded the assumption that planets moved in uniform circular motion, replacing it with elliptical motion.
_	Since the draw for the third qualifying round took place before the results of the previous round were known, the seeding was carried out under the assumption that the team with the higher coefficient of an undecided tie would advance to this round, which meant if the team with the lower coefficient was to advance, it simply took the seeding of its defeated opponent.
_	(The bound on formula_2 in the preconditions of the lemma ensures that formula_56 is too large to be a term of the numerator, and the assumption that formula_2 is odd is needed to ensure that formula_48 contributes only one factor of formula_2 to the numerator.)
_	They based the techniques on four general memory retrieval rules based on the encoding specificity principle, and the assumption that memory traces are usually complex with various kinds of information.
_	Here we typically make the assumption that the function "f" is continuous and differentiable.
_	Dan had run Lucas off the road and Lucas was left with the assumption that Dan had done it intentionally.
_	Mulaney decided that Stefon should wear an Ed Hardy shirt, under the assumption that it was made of latex and looked like something out of the Macaulay Culkin and Seth Green film, "Party Monster".
_	O'Neil operated under the assumption that he was hired to revamp the character and as a result tried to instill a different tone in the books than had gone before.
_	Note that, thanks to the revelation principle, the assumption that the mechanism is direct does not lose generality.
_	The contrasting view was that regulatory competition among states could be beneficial, on the assumption that shareholders would choose to invest their money with corporations that were well governed.
_	However these functions were designed on the assumption that the <samp>wc</samp> encoding is not a variable-width encoding and thus are designed to deal with exactly one <samp>wchar_t</samp> at a time, passing it by value rather than using a string pointer.
_	In the former, one assumes that the features of a person innately correspond to their natural inheritance, exemplified by drives and instincts; the latter refers to the assumption that the features of a person continue to change throughout their development and nurturing, exemplified by ego ideals and formative identifications.
_	In both his stage and screen adaptations, Archibald wrote under the assumption that the supernatural experiences of Miss Giddens were real, and that the ghosts she encountered were legitimate entities as opposed to figments of her imagination (a possibility left unresolved in James's original work).
_	For, every element of "S" clearly belongs to "T", and any join-irreducible element less than or equal to "x" must (by join-primality) be less than or equal to one of the members of "S", and therefore must (by the assumption that "S" is a lower set) belong to "S" itself.
_	Breast cancer screening refers to testing otherwise-healthy women for breast cancer in an attempt to achieve an earlier diagnosis under the assumption that early detection will improve outcomes.
_	His parents' generation had emphasised prioritising English on the assumption that Fijian could be learned later, but this had resulted in a generation knowing little Fijian, and unless the language was made compulsory at all levels of primary education, it would be lost to the next generation, Madraiwiwi said.
_	The other is based on the assumption that while reforms are not socialist in themselves, they can help rally supporters to the cause of revolution by popularizing the cause of socialism to the working class.
_	So Andrew Cowan, who had requested "a car to come last" from the Chrysler factory on the assumption that only half a dozen drivers would even reach Sydney, took victory in his Hillman Hunter and claimed the £10,000 prize.
_	Rather, the use of painted eggs has been adopted under the assumption that it might be a pre-Christian survival.
_	This argument begins with the assumption that evolution is a process that creates complex systems out of pre-existing properties but yet cannot make "entirely novel" properties.
_	For Overy, a major problem with the Mason thesis was that it rested on the assumption that in a way unrecorded by the records, that information was passed on to Hitler about the "Reich"'s economic problems.
_	A semiring is obtained by weakening the assumption that ("R",+) is an abelian group to the assumption that ("R",+) is a commutative monoid, and adding the axiom that 0 · "a" = "a" · 0 = 0 for all "a" in "R" (since it no longer follows from the other axioms).
_	He also takes the audience for granted and gives them a film under the assumption that they will embrace it because it has been written by Murugadoss".
_	Although several non-fatal attacks had been reported since 1985, it was not until April 26, 2000 when a 6-year-old boy survived an attack by a wolf in Icy Bay, Alaska that the assumption that healthy wild wolves were harmless became seriously challenged.
_	He has worked under the assumption that improvisation is important to creativity more generally, and creativity is vital to basic problem-solving, evolution, and survival.
_	In addition, the assumption that the pressure of perilymph is equal to ICP does not hold if the patency of the cochlear aqueduct is compromised, which is often the case in elderly subjects.
_	Originally, the paradox was resolved by giving up the assumption that the principle of locality is true, but other interpretations have also emerged.
_	The lack of production credits and other helpful identifying information on the LP sleeves has generally led to the assumption that they are bootleg recordings.
_	Because of the assumption that only one worker per family would be permitted to work under the proposed program, this total of 5.15 million was further reduced by 1.6 million—the estimated number of workers who were members of families with two or more employable people.
_	While most critics assume that the narrator is female, mostly due to the autobiographical elements of the book and the assumption that the narrator is Dillard herself, Clark questions whether the narrator is male.
_	Costes approach makes the assumption that only positive correlations are of interest, and does not provide a useful measurement of PCC.
_	Miami's defense was based on the assumption that Flutie couldn't throw the ball as far as the end zone, but Flutie hit Phelan in stride against a flatfooted defense a yard deep in the end zone.
_	He was patient and good humoured, proceeding on the assumption that if everything was explained carefully, then the deputies would naturally be convinced.
_	Furious that Monk would let her leave Julie in the care of a murderess, on the assumption that she wouldn’t kill anyone else, Natalie stalks off, not trusting herself near Monk for a good week.
_	Namely that we have been engaged in a perennial conflict with Zionism—and hence with the Jewish presence in Palestine—since the Kingdom of Solomon and before ... thus in one stroke Canaanism cancels the assumption that Zionism is a European movement, propelled by modern European contingencies..."
_	Underlying this search was the early recognition of the importance of leadership and the assumption that leadership is rooted in the characteristics that certain individuals possess.
_	However, this method does not make use of the assumption that the original radiocarbon age range is a normally distributed variable: not all dates in the radiocarbon age range are equally likely, and so not all dates in the resulting calendar year age are equally likely.
_	Both parties agreed that the case should proceed on the assumption that the plaintiffs did actually hold native title rights, although the question had not been decided yet.
_	Many other stories, however, run on the assumption that both Hermione and Hiram come from money (he is actually named after the real-life old money Lodge family).
_	This is based on the assumption that people or households will share more similarities in the types and styles of their material goods with other members of a social community than they will with outsiders.
_	Initially Lino was deceived by trusted police officials as he was under the assumption that Tremaine was wanted for being a highly dangerous criminal.
_	Researchers use statistical processes on a student's past test scores to predict the student's future test scores, on the assumption that students usually score approximately as well each year as they have in past years.
_	Khan's policy made the assumption that an open conflict with India would not last long due to International pressure, and that since East Pakistan was undefendable, the war-effort should be concentrated on occupying as large an area of Indian territory as possible as a bargaining tool at the negotiating table.
_	The minority contends that “Congress itself has unsurprisingly understood "Gardner-Denver" the way we have repeatedly explained it and has operated on the assumption that a CBA cannot waive employees’ rights to a judicial forum to enforce antidiscrimination statutes.”
_	The comparison with the Latin "edo", the English "eat" and the German "essen" led to the assumption that NINDA-an ezzatteni means "you will eat bread".
_	Davidson returned to the soap under the assumption that she would be portraying Susan Banks, with just a little bit of Kristen DiMera.
_	In its price control determination for the period 2010 to 2015, Ofwat did not allow the funds needed to finance a significant further reduction in leakage and used the assumption that daily leakage would be in 2010–11 and from 2011 to 2012.
_	Furthermore, while Holland suggests that people can be "categorized as one of six types," he also argues that "a six-category scheme built on the assumption that there are only six kinds of people in the world is unacceptable on the strength of common sense alone.
_	Guthrie admitted that his own theory required the assumption that people react to a given situation the same way so long as it was still effective.
_	When asked about the ad and the thought of it being a cross, Republican presidential candidate Ron Paul stated that he had not seen the ad, but replied with the assumption that it was a cross, quoting Sinclair Lewis' warning that "when fascism comes to this country, it will be wrapped in the flag, carrying a cross."
_	The concentrations of species in equilibrium are usually calculated under the assumption that activity coefficients are either known or can be ignored.
_	Early liberal feminists had to counter the assumption that only white men deserved to be full citizens.
_	This find, which has been lost at the British Museum, as well as records of the Romans at Richmond using Brigantian slaves digging for lead, has led to the assumption that the Romans were mining lead in Arkengarthdale in the 2nd century.
_	First, ASD is a heterogeneous condition and the assumption that hyper-arousal should be a general explanatory theory of autism was too broad.
_	However criticism of some of the plan's aspects exists, for example questioning the assumption that energy demand will fall as much as expected with the process of electrification and that electricity demand will rise 40% to 325TWh pa by 2020.
_	Critics also question the assumption that all domestic passenger and freight travel can also shift to electric in that timeframe.
_	Its security can also be argued in the generic group model, under the assumption that formula_40 is "random-prefix preimage resistant" and "random-prefix second-preimage resistant".
_	under the null hypothesis of that formula_52, given the assumption that the sample pairs are independent and identically distributed and follow a bivariate normal distribution.
_	Traffic conflicts are used as traffic collision surrogates, under the assumption that the same factors affecting collision rates also affect conflict rates, in proportion to the conflict severity, termed conflict hierarchy.
_	Theory is based on the assumption that crime can be committed by anyone who has the opportunity.
_	It was reported that the Conservatives accepted Mawdsley as a candidate on the assumption that if elected, he would be allowed to express his own views on trade union issues.
_	His observations led him to make the assumption that the Grail was hidden in the bathroom.
_	Some researchers refute the Bayesian method obtained date, and argue that we cannot rely on the assumption that the deposits in which all the dated artefacts were located were undisturbed.
_	This has in turn been used to estimate maximum depth ranges for many living and extinct cephalopod groups, on the assumption that these animals would not normally venture deeper than two-thirds of their shell's implosion depth.
_	However, according to translator and classicist William Arrowsmith, "this evidence is late and unreliable and needs to be treated with reserve, all the more since – even on the assumption that the "Satyricon" contained sixteen rather than, say, twenty or twenty-four books – the result would have been a work of unprecedented length."
_	SUE is the standardized difference between reported earnings and expected earnings, where expected earnings is modelled based on the assumption that earnings follows a seasonal random walk with a trend.
_	If the variable has a signed integer type, a program may make the assumption that a variable always contains a positive value.
_	Of course as in all statistical hypothesis tests, SEM model tests are based on the assumption that the correct and complete relevant data have been modeled.
_	The sight of the burning wrecks in the night once again spread panic throughout the French fleet, the grounded ships opening a heavy fire on the scuttled ships in the assumption that they were fireships.
_	Since this derivation is with the assumption that the nucleus is orbited by one electron, we can generalize this result by letting the nucleus have a charge "q" = "Z e" where "Z" is the atomic number.
_	His method of treatment was based on the assumption that the mentally deficient did not suffer from disease.
_	At the conclusion of Compton's 1923 paper, he reported results of experiments confirming the predictions of his scattering formula, thus supporting the assumption that photons carry momentum as well as quantized energy.
_	This method relies on the assumption that average performance is proportional to the mean, irrespective of the actual score.
_	However, he continued to announce for "Saturday Night Live" at the behest of executive producer Lorne Michaels, initially under the assumption that a permanent replacement would be found quickly.
_	Throughout the book, the protagonist Aulus Perennius is acting under the assumption that the Empire is irrevocably doomed - and still, he is doggedly and completely devoted to this doomed Empire, even when having seen much of its seamy side.
_	However, one commentator used a Monte Carlo simulation to eliminate the assumption that people have a fixed number of sexist remarks to make, and found that women suffer from overwhelmingly more sexism in an environment where both genders are equally sexist.
_	The sequence is increasing, and it was proved in 1995 by Richard Laver that under the assumption that there exists a rank-into-rank (a large cardinal), it actually increases without bound.
_	In that case the assumption that we are dealing with an example of sound law that affects deep phonological structure is not required.
_	The most significant mistake that has been made, he suggests, involves the assumption that race was developed in the nineteenth-century purely as a 'science' which can be challenged on purely scientific grounds.
_	Part of the justification for this design concept is the assumption that in the event of the system being required (such as a war), there should be enough warning time to purchase the system, install it in the vehicle, and train operators in its use.
_	A term originally coined by Ivan Turgenev in his 1862 novel "Fathers and Sons", Nihilists favoured the destruction of human institutions and laws, based on the assumption that such institutions and laws are artificial and corrupt.
_	By applying a single spatial model on an entire domain, one makes the assumption that is a stationary process.
_	Yet it is also often referred to as England’s fourth, on the assumption that London preceded it, for University College London had been opened in 1828.
_	The starting point for the framework was the assumption that it makes economic sense for development aid projects to allocate resources to women as well as men, which will make development more efficient – a position named the “efficiency approach".
_	Security of this technique is based on the assumption that only JavaScript running within the same origin will be able to read the cookie's value.
_	This led Cole and Brent to the assumption that Max is gay, and was attracted to one of them.
_	This challenges the assumption that a community good or service must be financed through taxation and delivered by government employees.
_	The marketing department was no more impressed; examining a report by the Stanford Research Institute (SRI), they found that SRI had calculated a market for 325 aircraft based on the assumption that every route over 1000 miles would use an SST.
_	Gore ties this conclusion to the assumption that "the Earth is so big, we can't possibly have any lasting, harmful impact on the Earth's environment."
_	Backed partly by a then-record US$8 billion trade surplus in 1990 and partly by the assumption that Menem's free-market policies would encourage a wave of foreign direct investment, Cavallo's Convertibility Plan tied the Argentine currency to the U.S. dollar, leading a sharp drop in local interest rates and to a recovery in local deposits, lending and the depressed economy soon after the plan's March 27, 1991 introduction.
_	The maintenance of only a token military force before the Falklands War, and the suggestion that HMS "Endurance" was to be withdrawn, persuaded Argentina to start a conflict, with the assumption that Britain would not respond and could not easily recapture the islands.
_	When Hieatt was found he was not wearing goggles, leading to the assumption that he threw them off while still riding.
_	The gravity of the situation was well understood by the Polish Commander-in-Chief Józef Piłsudski, who remarked that all the battle plans for his counteroffensive were based on the assumption that Warsaw would hold, and suggested to General Tadeusz Rozwadowski that he reinforce the Radzymin area with any forces available, including an "en masse tank attack".
_	Bahr immediately shared the contents of the letter with "Gramophone" magazine, telling journalist Jessica Duchen afterwards that he "had given a lot of thought" to suing Barrington-Coupe for damages, but was inclined not to do so, on the assumption that the hoax recordings were "a desperate attempt to build a shrine to a dying wife".
_	Decades of anthropological, sociological, and psychological research have shown that the assumption that religious beliefs and values are tightly integrated in an individual's mind or that religious practices and behaviors follow directly from religious beliefs, is actually rare.
_	Editorials on the Projekt Web site (dating back to January 2001) countered the assumption that all labels oppose all unofficial MP3 downloads.
_	Deprived of the XVII Corps and the 53rd Division, Castelnau continued to plan in support of the main effort by the Tenth Army, under the assumption that the transferred divisions would be replaced or that they would not and the effort would have to come from the forces remaining in the Second Army.
_	Cohn's electrodynamics of moving bodies was based on the assumption that light travels within the Earth's atmosphere with a constant velocity - however, his theory suffered from internal failures.
_	He makes the assumption that this phrase is the origins of the call "Whoopie Ti Yi Yo".
_	However, the vacuum energy is mathematically infinite without renormalization, which is based on the assumption that we can only measure energy in a relative sense, which is not true if we can observe it indirectly via the cosmological constant.
_	He is convinced that such uncertainty propels into the dangerous regions of relativism and solipsism: relativism sees all truth as determined by the single observer; solipsism, in which the single observer is the only creator of and legislator for his or her own universe, carries the assumption that no one else exists.
_	The movement for African-centered education is based on the assumption that a school immersed in African traditions, rituals, values, and symbols will provide a learning environment that is more congruent with the lifestyles and values of African-American families.
_	Since in linear regression it is possible to directly compute the factor ("n" − "p" − 1)/("n" + "p" + 1) by which the training MSE underestimates the validation MSE under the assumption that the model specification is valid, cross-validation can be used for checking whether the model has been overfitted, in which case the MSE in the validation set will substantially exceed its anticipated value.
_	Using the theoretical framework of Goals-Plans-Actions developed by Dillard in 1980, Schrader and Dillard operate from the assumption that individuals possess and act on multiple goals.
_	Former Chief Justice of the Supreme Court Meir Shamgar, taking a different approach, wrote in the 1970s that there is no "de jure" applicability of the 1949 Fourth Geneva Convention regarding occupied territories to the case of the West Bank and Gaza Strip since the Convention "is based on the assumption that there had been a sovereign who was ousted and that he had been a legitimate sovereign."
_	His political position was based on the assumption that none of the colonial powers possessed the resources to withstand the strains of world war and maintain their direct rule in their Asian colonies.
_	On the assumption that this earthquake would damage Rome it seems very likely that the earthquake occurred shortly before 508 AD when the earthquake damage to the Colosseum was repaired.
_	But he himself received the epistle, and explained the difference in style and character and structure of words by the assumption that Peter used different interpreters in the composition of the two epistles; and from his time onward the epistle was generally regarded as a part of the New Testament.
_	The base was located near the canal on the assumption that it was the safest location from Israeli attacks, which was expected to come from the east, where the defenses were the strongest, not from the south, where they were the weakest.
_	In this case, using the assumption that a higher arbitrageur presence increases the probability of consummation, the share price will not fully reflect the increased probability of success and the risk arbitrageur can buy shares and make a profit.
_	In science fiction, A. Bertram Chandler introduced into his future Galactic civilization the character Dominic Flandry from Poul Anderson's quite different Galactic future (he had Anderson's consent) – on the assumption that these were two alternate history timelines and that people could on some occasions cross from one to the other.
_	A second ship convoy, under the assumption that the first did not survive, arrives at New World at the end of "Monsters of Men".
_	Correspondence theory centres heavily around the assumption that truth is a matter of accurately copying what is known as "objective reality" and then representing it in thoughts, words and other symbols.
_	In attempting to resolve the dilemma, Lovelace relaxed the assumption that strings had to be restricted to four dimensions.
_	This made the assumption that Britain could send a fleet to its naval base in Singapore within two or three days of a Japanese attack, while relying on France to provide assistance in Asia via its colony in Indochina and, in the event of war with Italy, to help defend British territories in the Mediterranean.
_	argued, "the growth of the State giving the trustees of public authority more and means to abuse their power, the more the Government has to have force to contain the people, the more force the Sovereign should have in turn in order to contain the Government," with the understanding that the Sovereign is "a collective being of wonder" (Book II, Chapter I) resulting from "the general will" of the people, and that "what any man, whoever he may be, orders on his own, is not a law" (Book II, Chapter VI) – and furthermore predicated on the assumption that the people have an unbiased means by which to ascertain the general will.
_	This is the standard policy for a fire in a high-rise building, but relies on the assumption that the fire can be contained in one flat.
_	Rostow’s model makes the assumption that the inequality between states will eventually disappear once each progresses on the timeline of modernity—sped up, he argued, through contact with modernized cultures and their modern economic and political models.
_	Corrections were applied to adjust for differences in IQ cohorts (the "Flynn" effect) on the assumption that the same correction could be applied internationally, without regard to the cultural or economic development level of the country involved.
_	It's an attempt to make an “international” thriller, with the assumption that a star with a huge fan base would be able to pull it off.
_	In many cases, the assumption that an element is not equal to zero is insufficient to construct the inverse; the assumption that it is apart from zero implicitly contains the necessary information.
_	In a wider perspective, Asian American viewers “were especially galled by the assumption that they should identify with the Kims simply because they were Asian”, and non-Asian audiences were equally unable to identify with “yet another example of Hollywood's ignorance and indifference when it comes to depicting an ethnic group about which it knows so little”.
_	Subsequent study showed it "failed for several reasons, largely associated with the validity of the assumptions on which it was based", including the assumption that laboratory results can be scaled up to the real world.
_	This is likely due to the assumption that a person would know his or herself best, and may still perform activities associated with another temperament while still claiming to be the opposite; for example, a true introvert may still elect
_	A report on the 1961 Soviet tests, published by a group of American scientists led by Hans Bethe, determined "that [Soviet] laboratories had probably been working full speed during the whole moratorium on the assumption that tests would at some time be resume," with preparations likely having begun prior to the resumption of talks in Geneva in March 1961.
_	It is based on the assumption that people have an innate desire to help others, so is centrally concerned with our shared humanity.
_	However the order for Terra to launch a full-scale attack against the Centaurian Empire (under the assumption that the majority of the enemy ships and planets would have been destroyed in the Icarus explosion) had already been given.
_	This has led to the assumption that tRNA modification at position 37 correlates with the amount of polyuridine slippery sequences found in genomes.
_	This calculation is based on the assumption that the average reported size of Alamanni raiding-bands (800 men) represented the maximum manpower of a "pagus".
_	While a non-binary person is less likely to identify as heterosexual, the assumption that as someone with a ‘non-heterosexual’ identity, they must be homosexual is also problematic as it ignores sexual orientations that are not dictated by the gender of the person but rather who they are (or are not) attracted to such as bisexual, pansexual, queer, androsexual, gynesexual, skoliosexual, or asexual.
_	Coined by John H. Herz in his 1951 work "Political Realism and Political Idealism", defensive realists believe the security dilemma, as expanded by Robert Jervis in "Cooperation Under the Security Dilemma" in 1978, is defined by the assumption that the offense-defense balance tends to favour defensive capability over offensive capability.
_	Corrections were applied to adjust for differences in IQ across cohorts (the “Flynn” effect), on the assumption that the same correction could be applied internationally, without regard to the cultural or economic development level of the country involved.
_	The approach is based on the assumption that many aspects of intelligence can be achieved by the manipulation of symbols, an assumption defined as the "physical symbol systems hypothesis" by Allen Newell and Herbert A. Simon in the middle 1960s.
_	Hence, it can solve the 3-partition problem which is a contradiction under the assumption that "P" = "NP".
_	This left the ground controller with the assumption that Flight 954 was holding at the 32R run-up pad and in no danger of conflicting with other traffic and the flight crew with the assumption that they were cleared to taxi to the 32L run-up pad and could cross Runway 27L without danger of a collision with aircraft using that runway.
_	The population is divided into compartments, with the assumption that every individual in the same compartment has the same characteristics.
_	The committee concluded that the board had been established on the assumption that psychological strategy could be conducted separately from official policy and actions, an assumption the committee disagreed with.
_	Although Thompson left a society never seeking to become a market leader, it was steeped in genuine integrity, which continued to practice on the assumption that the reason for its existence was to guarantee the quality of its goods and services.
_	You just have to buy into the assumption that 'channeling' works.
_	The offshore bioregions were defined based on the assumption that the marine biota of the deeper waters is more homogeneous than on the continental shelf, as the deeper water has more consistent temperature.
_	However, most bayesian spam detection software makes the assumption that there is no "a priori" reason for any incoming message to be spam rather than ham, and considers both cases to have equal probabilities of 50%:
_	"...such men... say they have authority from Joseph, or the First Presidency, or any other Presidency of the Church; and thus, with a lie in their mouth, deceive and debauch the innocent, under the assumption that they are authoriz’d from these sources?
_	Modern mathematical cosmology is based on the assumption that the Cosmological principle is almost, but not exactly, true on the largest scales.
_	In particular, the assumption that "T" maps "C"("X") into itself
_	Speaking later that week the Secretary of State for Scotland, David Mundell, said that the bill needed to invoke Article 50 would not require consent, but also said he was working under the assumption that the "Great Repeal Bill" needed to remove European legislation from UK statutes would require co-operation from the devolved bodies.
_	However, their language, often called Serer-Noon on the assumption that it is a Serer dialect, is not closely related to the principal language of the Serer population, Serer-Sine.
_	The designation 'NCS-1' came from the assumption that the protein was expressed only in neuronal cell types, which is not the case.
_	However, a reduction in the wage share is not possible in neoclassical models due to the assumption that wages equal the marginal product of labour.
_	Unfortunately, this map showed a fictitious mountain range, north of the Old Spanish Trail to Los Angeles and running roughly east-west across central Nevada, and it may have been this non-existent mountain range that contributed to the emigrant's decision to chance leaving the established trail, under the assumption that water, and grass for the oxen, would be easier to locate along the base of the mountains.
_	This approach was based on the assumption that there are at least two firms producing a homogenous product with constant marginal cost (this could be constant at some positive value, or with zero marginal cost as in Cournot).
_	Furthermore, many lattice-based constructions are known to be secure under the assumption that certain well-studied computational lattice problems cannot be solved efficiently.
_	The relationship between the believer and God must be based on the assumption that God exists.
_	Another social topic is legal responsibility (The Atlantic Monthly; Feb 1995; pg. 88) which, Staddon argues, is perfectly compatible with the assumption that individual behavior is causally determined.
_	Pollard gives the time complexity of the algorithm as formula_38, based on a probabilistic argument which follows from the assumption that "f" acts pseudorandomly.
_	Sluggish schizophrenia or slow progressive schizophrenia (, "vyalotekushchaya shizofreniya") was a diagnostic category used in Soviet Union to describe what they claimed was a form of schizophrenia characterized by a slowly progressive course; it was diagnosed even in a patient who showed no symptoms of schizophrenia or other psychotic disorders, on the assumption that these symptoms would appear later.
_	COHRE’s work was based on the assumption that the role of the affected communities is of crucial importance in addressing housing rights violations.
_	Implicit in the concept is the assumption that the homes of the victim and the offender form "anchor points" that govern the crime location.
_	Producing an estimate of the complete size of "A. fragillimus" requires scaling the bones of better-known species of diplodocid (a family of extremely long and slender sauropods) in the assumption that their relative proportions were similar.
_	NASA's Aerospace Safety Advisory Panel also took issue with the report, saying in May 1995 that "the assumption that the Space Shuttle systems are now 'mature' smacks of a complacency which may lead to serious mishaps."
_	Against the assumption that parallax can measure all visible objects:
_	Reflecting on actions contrary to their beliefs, he noted, "(i)ntriguing as their dissonance may be, what is especially revealing is that every one of these people has a career that is predicated on the assumption that information is sufficient to generate change – an assumption that a moment's introspection would show them was deeply flawed."
_	The peripheral attack model holds well for several classes of macrocycles, though relies on the assumption that ground state geometries remain unperturbed in the corresponding transition state of the reaction.
_	So, under the assumption that the theory is consistent, there is no such number.
_	Most theories were based upon the assumption that color was simply a modification of light varying between whiteness and blackness.
_	To a large degree the indeterminacy result relies on the assumption that the results of bargaining are indeterminate or, at the very least, outside the realm of economic speculation.
_	At first, the Oberkommando des Heeres considered this a Soviet deception plan, since it believed that such large-scale activations were unlikely, reckoning on the assumption that from every million population one could form but two divisions at full wartime strength.
_	First, note that under the assumption that there are no arbitrage opportunities (the prices are arbitrage-free), two portfolios that always have the same payoff at time T must have the same value at any prior time.
_	The biggest difficulty facing female rappers is that they must overcome the assumption that MCing is a masculine activity and that hip hop is associated with gangs and violence.
_	Tying back into the previous examples, the media plays upon the assumption that an individual desires acceptance from others.
_	Computing the new equilibrium rate of growth and the new price formula_13 gives under the assumption that a new general rate of profit is established:
_	With the assumption that no particle with momentum is present in the "out" state, that is, we are ignoring forward scattering, we can write:
_	The Ottoman Empire rejected Montefiore's plan on the assumption that it would mainly serve Christian missionary interests.
_	Within a few years, however, it was clear that this rarely produced good results because of short deadlines and the assumption that VJ’s could work the same way and on the same stories.
_	Research has yet to define a correlation between these ridges and the evidence of turbinates, mostly based on the assumption that they were probably cartilaginous and difficult to preserve.
_	The analysis is based on the assumption that companies consist of four managerial disciplines – directorship, leadership, management and assurance – in competitive tensions between each other.
_	Most contemporary linguists work under the assumption that spoken data and signed data are more fundamental than written data.
_	She described that for fans of the show, "the comic is largely boring," and added that for readers who have not seen the show, the comic book "runs the risk of being difficult to follow as information is glossed over with the assumption that the reader is familiar with what’s going on already."
_	The Commerce Department's cautious approach toward power increases was based on the assumption that transmitters were located in heavily populated areas.
_	This approach hinges on the assumption that agents (bank and the borrower) have different attitudes towards risk.
_	In factor analysis, the researcher makes the assumption that an underlying causal model exists, whereas PCA is simply a variable reduction technique.
_	Jarrige notes "the assumption that farming economy was introduced full-fledged from Near-East to South Asia," and the similarities between Neolithic sites from eastern Mesopotamia and the western Indus valley, which are evidence of a "cultural continuum" between those sites.
_	Early developments of biological inclusive fitness theory and the derivative field of Sociobiology, encouraged some sociobiologists and evolutionary psychologists to approach human kinship with the assumption that inclusive fitness theory predicts that kinship relations in humans "are indeed" expected to depend on genetic relatedness, which they readily connected with the "genealogy" approach of early anthropologists such as Morgan (see above sections).
_	Accordingly all previous editors (Wasserschleben, Haddan–Stubbs and Finsterwalder) have printed the two-book version, and all previous scholarship has been predicated on the assumption that the author of the "Paenitentiale Umbrense" created a work divided into two books.
_	Shankara's Advaita school and Ramanuja's Vishishtadvaita school are premised on the assumption that all souls can hope for and achieve the state of blissful liberation; in contrast, Madhvacharya believed that some souls are eternally doomed and damned.
_	Prior to his invasion in 1807, Napoleon Bonaparte proposed the establishment of a French-backed puppet Kingdom of Northern Lusitania as one of the successor states to Portugal under the assumption that such a campaign would result in an easy French victory.
_	It is difficult to resist the assumption that at least some part of this happy combination was inherited, through Attwood, from Mozart.
_	The year 1490 is often proposed based on the assumption that he was 14 when he came to study in Kraków in 1504.
_	As to (2) above—that is to say, as to the plaintiff's purported cancellation of the contract some five months later—the court found, on the assumption that the first defendant had to be placed in "mora" ("ex persona"), that the question for decision was whether this had been done.
_	He invoked the Declaration of Independence as free from racial discrimination; and he challenged the assumption that slaves could be regarded as machines and lacking in morality.
_	He determined the distance using a novel astrophysical method based on the observed rotational velocities of the galaxy, which depends on the total mass around which stars are rotating, and on the assumption that the luminosity per unit mass was the same as that of our galaxy.
_	This action was presumably taken on the assumption that the growing movement was merely a product of self-interested Europeans agitating the native Samoans.
_	But both are based on the assumption that genes and environment have large independent effects.
_	This model starts from the assumption that an ensemble of instantons cannot be described by a mere sum of separate instantons.
_	The Nobel Prize Committee stated that Krugman's main contribution is his analysis of the effects of economies of scale, combined with the assumption that consumers appreciate diversity, on international trade and on the location of economic activity.
_	In regression and time-series modelling, basic forms of models make use of the assumption that the errors or disturbances "u" have the same variance across all observation points.
_	The IPO model of teams is a systems theory, as it rests on the assumption that a team is more than one-to-one relationships between variables, and more than the sum of its members.
_	Supervised methods are based on the assumption that the context can provide enough evidence on its own to disambiguate words (hence, common sense and reasoning are deemed unnecessary).
_	Until that day, there is no need to reject the assumption that the theory is true.
_	After the July riots he was arrested along with other black leaders, based on the assumption that they must have been promoting discontent among the black populace.
_	Random effects meta-regression rests on the assumption that formula_7 in formula_16 is a random variable following a (hyper-)distribution formula_17
_	In the resulting report, Access Economics warned that the claim of net benefit to artists was: "based upon extremely unrealistic assumptions, in particular the assumption that seller and buyer behaviour would be completely unaffected by the introduction of RRR [ARR]" and that, "Access Economics considers that the results of this analysis are both unhelpful and potentially misleading."
_	This rule was intended as a constitutional safeguard, protecting a defendant from "the assumption that [he] was guilty of the crime charged because he had committed other, similar crimes in the past."
_	The factor of 2 was included on the assumption that radiation emitted by the cell goes in both directions.
_	Also, a new process is always inserted at the tail of the top level queue with the assumption that it will complete in a short amount of time.
_	Anne for an adulterous liaison under the assumption that and were away camping.
_	Working on the assumption that the discoveries at the Acheron could challenge the traditional assumptions about the "Odyssey"<nowiki>'</nowiki>s geography,
_	OML theory is defined with the assumption that the electron Debye length is equal to or larger than the size of the object and the plasma is not flowing.
_	This is the assumption that outcomes of measurements that are not performed are just as real as those of measurements that were performed.
_	This is based on the assumption that the axis of alignment of an archaeological site is meaningfully oriented towards an astronomical target.
_	On the assumption that the beam is connected with the probable number of photons in it, we should have half the total number going into each component.
_	An organizational bureau was created and this developed a system of representation on the assumption that around 500 people would attend the congress.
_	This creates backward compatibility issues, however, as some software was designed with the assumption that the service is running in the same session as the logged-in user.
_	It has not yet been established the Huamango constructors cultural affiliation, although ethnic-historical sources information allow the assumption that these are groups of Otomi origins, ancestors of the current Otomi living in the place.
_	Nearby, the two Roman roads, the one between Bingen and Koblenz and the one between Oberwesel and Treis, crossed each other, leading to the assumption that the complex was likely built in Roman times.
_	However, in 2005 the evolutionary zoologist Tim Caro could still observe that the assumption that eye masks served as camouflage had not been tested systematically.
_	More than two weeks later, Machado was missing and the Brewers said they that they were planning for 1992 with the assumption that Machado would not be on the team.
_	Williams claimed she was set up to be held by the six suspects under the assumption that she was going to a party.
_	The above formulas for the derivative of a vector function rely on the assumption that the basis vectors e,e,e are constant, that is, fixed in the reference frame in which the derivative of a is being taken, and therefore the e,e,e each has a derivative of identically zero.
_	His method of treatment was based on the assumption that the mentally deficient did not suffer from disease.
_	The United States State Department had prepared for the diplomatic consequences of the war's ending on the assumption that there would have been an explicit statement of unconditional surrender of the German state in accordance with the agreed EAC surrender text.
_	Alternatively, one may institute the assumption that a page view is a result of a click, and therefore log a simulated click that lead to that page view.
_	Wright defines progress using the Victorian terms "the assumption that a pattern of change exists in the history of mankind...that it consists of irreversible changes in one direction only, and that this direction is towards improvement".
_	The exclusion of the mixed state in Manousakis’ model may be due to the assumption that the mixed state is transitional, bridging two dominance states.
_	The FBI launched a money-laundering investigation under the assumption that the JDL was extorting money from Ruthless Records to fight their causes.
_	In one incident, she was approached to participate in a store-wide "Holiday Girl" contest with the assumption that she would easily win; but she refused, mainly because one of the prizes was a vacation aboard the yacht of Old Mr Grace, who had previously tried to assault her indecently.
_	A second proof of Eisenstein's criterion also starts with the assumption that the polynomial is reducible.
_	For example, Amy Ansell of Bard College argues that color-blindness operates under the assumption that we are living in a world that is "post-race", where race no longer matters.
_	Following this performance, UK Athletics reviewed athletes funding and Turner's basic lottery grant of around £12,000 was cut, based on the assumption that he would not be a medal hopeful for the following year's World Championships.
_	Determination of congestion falls primarily on the miners, so this network rests on the assumption that honest miners will not organize a 51% attack.
_	"Khyātivāda" is based on the assumption that misperception is not simply the human failure to perceive correctly but is something which occurs due to some peculiar special circumstances, and that cognition can be either correct ("pratyaksha") or incorrect ("apratyaksha") depending upon the cognizing activity of the mind.
_	However, cognitive science and psychology do not require the mind to be irreducible, and operate on the assumption that it has physical basis.
_	One particular focus of the Spanish and Portuguese inquisitions was the issue of Jewish anusim and Muslim converts to Catholicism, partly because these minority groups were more numerous in Spain and Portugal than they were in many other parts of Europe, and partly because they were often considered suspect due to the assumption that they had secretly reverted to their previous religions.
_	Bell proved Bell's theorem (see p. 14 in Bell), in which he showed that, if they are to agree with the empirical predictions of quantum mechanics, all such "hidden-variable" completions of quantum mechanics must either be nonlocal (as the Bohm interpretation is) or give up the assumption that experiments produce unique results (see counterfactual definiteness and many-worlds interpretation).
_	Ancient Greek theology was polytheistic, based on the assumption that there were many gods and goddesses, as well as a range of lesser supernatural beings of various types.
_	Recently, the traveler's dilemma was tested with decision undertaken in groups rather than individually, in order to test the assumption that groups decisions are more rational, delivering the message that, usually, two heads are better than one.
_	In order to interact with games, algorithms must operate under the assumption that games all share common characteristics.
_	The principle argument rests on the assumption that gender and class always operate together, that consciousness of class always takes a gendered form."
_	However, after he attacks Mrs. Andrews on the assumption that she's an alien, Patricia and Fabian are forced to tell Alfie about the treasure and the quest before being made a member of Sibuna.
_	However, the ongoing continuation is predicated on the assumption that the observational analysis is not an "ill-posed" one.
_	An alternative estimate could be found by multiplying the proportion of men who are over 6 feet in height with the proportion of men who prefer strawberry jam to raspberry jam, but this estimate relies on the assumption that the two conditions are statistically independent.
_	Therefore, the assumption that formula_1 is regular must be incorrect.
_	Activity theory is predicated on the assumption that a person's frameworks for thinking are developed and carried out in specific settings, and that these settings mediate cognitive development.
_	Instead, key points of the story are mentioned in order to bring out an important faith-based lesson from the story, with the assumption that the audience already understands the underlying narrative.
_	In David Hawkes's article, 'Sodomy, Usury, and the Narrative of Shakespeare's Sonnets', he "argues that by using the language of 'unnatural' usury to expound the merits of 'natural' marriage and procreation, Shakespeare is ironically undermining the assumption that, because homosexual sex is non-reproductive, homoerotic desire is 'unnatural'."
_	First, Meadow's calculation was based on the assumption that two SIDS deaths in the same family are independent.
_	The van 't Hoff plot is linear based on the assumption that the enthalpy and entropy are constant with temperature changes.
_	This is the same as checking whether formula_2 is true in a world of a model, in the assumption that formula_9 is also true in the same world of the same model.
_	With the assumption that everything is finite-dimensional, Ψ is a unital CP map between spaces of matrices
_	Key to this step is the assumption that the (partial) trace adequately summarizes the system from Bob's point of view.
_	Since in the Norse sagas the "king of Vindland" is always "Burislav", this is reconcilable with the assumption that her father was Mieszko (not his son Bolesław).
_	This geographic issue related to Canon 6 was highlighted by Protestant writer, Timothy F. Kauffman, as a correction to the anachronism created by the assumption that each bishop was already presiding over a whole diocese at the time of the council.
_	The 1st Canadian Infantry Brigade of the 1st Canadian Infantry Division began its arrival at Brest on 11 June and was sent to Sablé-sur-Sarthe, on the assumption that two fresh divisions would be enough to allow the Tenth Army and attached British troops to retreat through them and take up positions prepared around the Brest peninsula.
_	Holm actually becomes the main protagonist for the middle third of the novel, as at one point the Saint is incapacitated and Holm is led to the assumption that he is dead.
_	Schilling also argued that the assumption that allocation is a transfer of wealth from households to industry may also be incorrect.
_	Collaborative filtering is based on the assumption that people who agreed in the past will agree in the future, and that they will like similar kinds of items as they liked in the past.
_	The term Caucasian as a racial label for Europeans derives in part from the assumption that the tribe of Japheth developed its distinctive racial characteristics in the Caucasus area, having migrated there from Mount Ararat before populating Europe.
_	The proclamation was made with the assumption that the barons would make the same concessions to their tenants as the king had promised to them.
_	If we make the assumption that combustion goes to completion (i.e. formula_15 and formula_16), we can calculate the adiabatic flame temperature by hand either at stoichiometric conditions or lean of stoichiometry (excess air).
_	Bornemann wrote that artillery battery observation posts had been left unmanned, on the assumption that they had been superseded by artillery liaison officers in the front line.
_	They argue that the Stolper–Samuelson theorem is "dead" because following trade liberalization in some developing countries (particularly in Latin America), wage inequality rose, and, under the assumption that these countries are labor-abundant, the SS theorem predicts that wage inequality should have fallen.
_	For example, if both Aces of Acorns are played, the trick goes to the player who went first (under the assumption that no-one has trumped).
_	On 6 August, just three days before the start of the season, the CNSOF ruled that CFA 2 club Olympique Saumur would be allowed promotion to the CFA on the assumption that the club was ranked second behind Les Herbiers VF in terms of the promotion chart following a current CFA club's relegation by means of a federation ruling.
_	This theory operates under the assumption that the specific males keep a memory of past mates, under a desire to perpetuate their own genes
_	Another form of sacrifice involves the burning of Hell Bank Notes, on the assumption that images thus consumed by the fire will reappear—not as a mere image, but as the actual item—in the spirit world, and be available for the departed spirit to use.
_	For these draws (or in any cases where the result of a tie in the previous round was not known at the time of the draw), the seeding was carried out under the assumption that the team with the higher coefficient of an undecided tie advanced to this round, which means if the team with the lower coefficient was to advance, it simply took the seeding of its defeated opponent.
_	The question was based on the assumption that such programmes (cyber-attacks or other forms of sabotage which could render parts of the nuclear programme inoperative without starting or provoking a war) already existed.
_	The Therrien and Henderson study has been criticized for the choice of theropods used for comparison (e.g., most of the theropods used to set the initial equations were tyrannosaurids and carnosaurs, which have a different build than spinosaurids), and for the assumption that the "Spinosaurus" skull could be as little as in length.
_	Historians have suggested that David's mission may have targeted communities in Southern India, on the assumption that an existing church there - either descended from the missionary work of the apostle Thomas, or founded by migrant Christians from elsewhere in the region - was in difficulties and required support.
_	under the assumption that time formula_100 is selected such that the integration constant is zero.
_	Or rather, the assumption that states do not adapt and will respond similarly to similar constraints and opportunities.
_	Defence planning was based on the assumption that Germany would land a 70,000-strong main force south of the Thames, in East Anglia or in Lincolnshire, and then attempt to march on London.
_	Dormers were removed from the central portion of the house with the assumption that they were added later.
_	under the assumption that both the unstressed state and the initial deformation state are static and thus formula_55.
_	Indeed the assumption that formula_9 is the well-known Continuum Hypothesis, which was shown to be independent of the standard ZFC axioms for set theory by Paul Cohen.
_	Modernization in rural communities, such as the spread of chemical and mechanical aids to farming, has encouraged the assumption that every activity is done in exchange for cash.
_	An analysis by "FiveThirtyEight" shows that, under the assumption that Scalia's vacant seat on the Court will not be filled, and taking account of the advanced age of three of the sitting justices, that a Trump presidency would move the Supreme Court "rightward toward its most conservative position in recent memory".
_	After making the assumption that frictional dissipation is negligible, Sverdrup obtained the simple result that the meridional mass transport (the "Sverdrup transport") is proportional to the curl of the wind stress.
_	Where many current calculations get it wrong is in the assumption that more stringent [climate mitigation] measures will necessarily raise the overall cost, especially when there is substantial unemployment and underuse of capacity as there is today."
_	The notion of common sense as a sense in which the other five were fitted to a common world ceded to a conception of common sense as an inner faculty with no relationship to the world, and the assumption that all humans had faculties like this in common became necessary to get theories going, but without the assumption of a common world, the assumption of faculties in common lost some warrant.
_	Under the assumption that the dimer interface is preserved in the functional integrase multimer, at minimum a tetramer of integrase must be required for the complete integration reaction to proceed.
_	This leads to Bruns' (2008) idea of "equipotentiality: the assumption that while the skills and abilities of all the participants in the produsage project are not equal, they have an equal ability to make a worthy contribution to the project" (p. 25).
_	Research by the Librarian at Lincoln's Inn in 2016 into the relationship between it and the property of John Thavy, St Andrew's benefactor, has cast doubt on the assumption that the later Inn of Chancery was based there.
_	However, this figure relies on the assumption that space can be subdivided indefinitely.
_	Retcons are used by authors to increase their creative freedom, on the assumption that the changes are unimportant to the audience compared to the new story which can be told.
_	Hyde gives up soon after, prompting the assumption that he was more infatuated with Donna and not in love with her and they remain close friends.
_	When the assumption that the Lie group be compact is dropped, a similar result holds, but with the conclusion that infinite-volume Gibbs states do not exist.
_	Like the Europeans, the American Romantics demonstrated a high level of moral enthusiasm, commitment to individualism and the unfolding of the self, an emphasis on intuitive perception, and the assumption that the natural world was inherently good, while human society was filled with corruption.
_	Note the sign difference, which follows from the assumption that the operator is stationary and the state is time-dependent.
_	The older method was justified by the assumption that desk service would avoid tempting people to buy more than planned.
_	His philosophical interest is primarily centered on the problem of human alienation and on the fundamental philosophical issues and problems directly related to the metaphysical questions of God, his existence, good and evil in the context of the assumption that a good and wise God has created the world.
_	However, American support for a merger was based on the assumption that all existing NHL teams would share the expansion fees equally; this did not go over well with the league's Canadian owners.
_	The distinction between phrasal movement and head movement relies crucially on the assumption that movement is occurring leftward.
_	Ecological selectionism refers to the assumption that humans are highly flexible in their behaviors.
_	Initial Western intelligence estimates of "K-278"’s speed were based on the assumption that it was powered by a pair of liquid-metal lead-bismuth reactors.
_	The Eisenhower administration, in agreement with the American media and Congress, did this with the assumption that "Cuba [would] remain in the U.S. sphere of influence".
_	In 1907, Fecht expressed the assumption that it must be spiropentane, a constitutional isomer of vinylcyclopropane.
_	However, these values are based on the assumption that the availability and digestibility of the nutrients are not variable, although in reality, this is not the case.
_	If this reading is the original one, it would confirm the assumption that the editor was a Babylonian, since the name "Meṭaṭron" occurs only a few times in the sources from Israel, the name "Michael" being found instead (e.g., Targ.
_	Death by those diseases was tabulated on the assumption that if radiation exposure had a life-shortening effect it would likely show up there, but it did not.
_	The Royalty Relief approach is based on the assumption that if a company did not own the trademarks that it exploits, it would need to license them from a third party brand owner instead.
_	The distinction between CRS type 2 and CRS type 4 is based on the assumption that, also in advanced and chronic disease, two different pathophysiological mechanisms can be distinguished, whereas both CKD and HF often develop due to a common pathophysiological background, most notably hypertension and diabetes mellitus.
_	New research published at The University of Oxford revisits the assumption that all shareholder activism is the same, characterizing Bill Ackman's activities with Canadian Pacific Railway as paradigmatic of "engaged activism" – which is longer term in nature with correlated benefits to the real economy, as distinct from shorter term "financial activism".
_	We make the assumption that something in his breath, when it comes in contact with flame, causes combustive ignition.
_	Most experiments involving the relevance of brain size to intelligence hinge on the assumption that complex behavior requires a complex (and therefore intelligent) brain; however, this connection has not been consistently demonstrated.
_	Later, as the FBI comb the crime scene, Jack Bauer quietly infiltrates the apartment but is surprised by Wayne, who is under the assumption that Bauer was responsible for carrying out the assassination.
_	It is obtained from the above system of equations by integration of the Poisson equation under the assumption that the potential must vanish at infinity.
_	It is used for understanding and evaluating educational curriculum under the assumption that the purpose of education is to "help a person become whole."
_	Elite boarding school students are brought up with the assumption that they are meant to control society.
_	Dickens wished to educate readers about the working conditions of some of the factories in the industrial towns of Manchester, and Preston, to "strike the heaviest blow in my power," and as well to confront the assumption that prosperity runs parallel to morality.
_	This equation always has a definite solution under the assumption that formula_6 is diagonal in the eigenbasis of formula_3.
_	The National Police targets street children specifically under the assumption that they are drug users and criminals.
_	These three types are usually under the assumption that complete information is available in the sense that the probability distributions of the random variables involved are known in advance.
_	The American Psychiatric Association (APA) opposes psychiatric treatment "based upon the assumption that homosexuality "per se" is a mental disorder or based upon the "a priori" assumption that a patient should change his/her sexual homosexual orientation" and describes attempts to change sexual orientation by practitioners as unethical.
_	On December 9, 1902, the regents voted to lease rather than sell, although one strip on the northwest corner of the site was sold to the U.S. government for a federal building, on the assumption that this building would increase the value of the rest of the tract.
_	Walt is under the assumption that his father is still alive and living on the island.
_	By the assumption that "f" is "G"-linear, for every "g" in "G" and choice of "x" in formula_10.
_	The definition has been criticized by some academics for relying on the assumption that power is a zero-sum game, and for not accounting for the lack of uniformity in prejudicial attitudes.
_	Slayton spoke with Worden on the assumption that the covers referred to were among the group of 144, but Worden told him this was not necessarily the case, and that he should talk to Scott. Slayton did talk to Scott in mid-April, just before the launch of Apollo 16, and Scott told him that there had been 400 covers not on the approved list, and that 100 had been given to a friend.
_	Hughes, he pointed out that the structure of quantum mechanics may be derived to a large extent from the assumption that microscopic phenomena cannot be dissociated from their experimental context.
_	It is also based on the assumption that the points at both ends are massless, as in the case when transferring between two orbits around Earth for instance.
_	There are two reasons Abraham indicted for the decision behind separation, first, the freedom of local churches and second, the assumption that an apostolic faith life will not be possible by being with Cook.
_	It (could be) programmed, I have a right of way, on the assumption that whatever is moving will yield the right of way."
_	In the second part of the correspondence, the assumption that "G" is simply connected cannot be omitted.
_	The law was written under the assumption that, by the time it came into force, the upper house would have become an indirectly-elected body representing regions, with greatly reduced powers, thus making a reform of its electoral system unnecessary.
_	Early theories of cargo cults began from the assumption that practitioners simply failed to understand technology, colonization, or capitalist reform; in this model, cargo cults are a misunderstanding of the systems involved in resource distribution, and an attempt to acquire such goods in the wake of interrupted trade.
_	Quality-driven architecture design relies on the assumption that architectural patterns and styles, and also design patterns, embody different quality attributes.
_	Cantor's paradox is the name given to a contradiction following from Cantor's theorem together with the assumption that there is a set containing all sets, the universal set V.
_	Vakoch suggests that the detection of extraterrestrials in a standard SETI scenario may be less clear-cut than usually assumed: "I think the assumption that one day someone is going to announce that we’ve discovered extraterrestrial intelligence, and now the world knows, is a fallacy, because there’s going to be much more ambiguity in the process."
_	Eventually it was decided to make both arms tentacles and work under the assumption that in the previous appearance she had been wearing something similar to a human flesh colored glove.
_	There is some limited evidence in favour of the assumption that the Philistines were originally either Indo-European-speakers from Greece or Luwian speakers from the coast of Asia Minor, on the basis of some Philistine-related words found in the Bible not appearing to be related to other Semitic languages.
_	Indeed, after the attack, propaganda to American forces operated on the assumption that Americans would regard Pearl Harbor as a defensive act, forced on them by "Roosevelt and his clique".
_	Richard Kayne's theory of Antisymmetry derived X-bar theory from the assumption that there was a tight relation between structure and linear order; and Noam Chomsky's paper "Bare Phrase Structure" attempted to eliminate labelling (i.e., bar-levels) from syntax and deduce their effects from other principles of the grammar.
_	However, RAIM is predicated on the assumption that a majority of the GPS constellation is operating properly, and so it is much less useful when the entire constellation is perturbed by global influences such as geomagnetic storms.
_	The linear superposition integral is based on the assumption that fluorophores in each infinitesimal volume formula_96 experience an incoherent, stochastic emission process, considering their rapid, random fluctuations.
_	Something that thus goes to the very structure of our federal system in its distribution of power between the United States and the state is not a mere bit of red tape to be cut, on the assumption that this Court has general discretion to see justice done...".
_	Both sides could have agreed that the entire game would air only on Versus or begin earlier in the day, but the NHL wanted at least one Eastern Conference Finals game to air on NBC, and said that it does "not" schedule with the assumption that games will go into overtime.
_	David goes back to work under the assumption that Huck is protecting him.
_	However, most discussions of the dating depend on the assumption that Newton's title reflects Milton's intentions, which may not be true.
_	Therefore, the full formula for formula_18 is equivalent (under the assumption that a valid circuit "c" exists) to the formula
_	She soon enough turned her vow reality as she confronted the new X-Factor team during a conference press about the terrible things Quicksilver did under the assumption that it was a Skrull in disguise.
_	The 2017 Netflix-Univision series, "El Chapo", depicts Joaquín "El Chapo" Guzmán's incarceration and experience in the prison, and his escape through a tunnel on July 11, 2015, which disproved the assumption that the prison was impenetrable.
_	On A's death a distribution could not be made to his or her children: they would have to await the death of B – on the assumption that B could have additional children, and thereby consequently all grandchildren (of both A and B) would be entitled to less than one fifth each.
_	The proposed fear pattern theory builds on Hovland, Janis and Kelley’s fear-as-acquired-drive (drive-reduction) model that was one of the earlier major theories of how fear appeals work, based on the assumption that it is fear reduction that makes such an appeal effective.
_	The concept of the "incidentaloma" has been criticized, as such lesions do not have much in common other than the history of an incidental identification and the assumption that they are clinically inert.
_	Additionally, many dot-com business plans were predicated on the assumption that by using the Internet, they would bypass the distribution channels of existing businesses and therefore not have to compete with them; when the established businesses with strong existing brands developed their own Internet presence, these hopes were shattered, and the newcomers were left attempting to break into markets dominated by larger, more established businesses.
_	The clock hypothesis is the assumption that the rate at which a clock is affected by time dilation does not depend on its acceleration but only on its instantaneous velocity.
_	Applying Bernoulli's principle from the draft tube entrance "e" to the lower free surface 0, under the assumption that the kinetic energy at 0 is negligible, that the fluid is inviscid, and that the fluid density is constant:
_	The model is based on the assumption that the questions we ask will tend to focus our attention in a particular direction, that organizations evolve in the direction of the questions they most persistently and passionately ask.
_	Public interest groups have challenged that ruling stating that the action taken by the Board was based on the unsupported assumption that toxic discharge from agriculture did not pose a threat on the environment, or the public and with the assumption that farmers would self-regulate.
_	The mSign consortium created the standards on the assumption that a WAP phone with a WAP 1.2 implementation and digital keys stored on the SIM card (i.e. WIM) would be used to generate a mobile (digital) signature.
_	A non-authentic royal charter from that year confirms the assumption that Archbishop Lawrence simultaneously functioned as royal chaplain and was responsible for issuing royal diplomas.
_	The earliest documentation of the "Chapter a Day" title referring to the narration of an entire book is found for July 25, 1932 and lists the name of Marianne Smith, a member of the University of Wisconsin class of 1932, leading to the assumption that she was the reader.
_	This may lead to the assumption that the bridges told to have been destroyed by a storm were used by Herodotus only as a pretext for his vivid description in all details of an outburst of rage of the great king Xerxes and even to quote his furious speech in full.
_	Aganduru wrote the medical manual to help ordinary Filipinos, with the assumption that such commoners could read the text of the book that was written in Spanish.
_	On the other hand, a global warming period of finite duration (based on the assumption that fossil fuel use will cease by the year 2200) will probably only impact the glacial period for about 5,000 years.
_	Passing over the appeal to final causes involved in this passage, as well as the assumption that the "moral sense" has had no growth or history, but was "implanted" in man exactly as found among the more civilized races (an assumption common to both Hutcheson and Butler), his use of the term "sense" tends to obscure the real nature of the process of moral judgement.
_	A widespread misconception is the assumption that it is a variety of Dutch.
_	The screenplay was revised by Kazuki Ōmori after the release of "Godzilla vs. Biollante", though the project was ultimately scrapped by Toho, under the assumption that Mothra was a character born purely out of Japanese culture, and thus would have been difficult to market overseas unlike the more internationally recognized Godzilla.
_	It was designed to test the assumption that the presence (or potential presence) of police officers in marked cars reduced the likelihood of a crime being committed.
_	This was built into the law under the assumption that the amount of uncompensated care would decline substantially under the ACA due to expanded coverage.
_	In the words of Philip Schaff: "The contradictory reports are easily reconciled by the assumption that Lucian was a critical scholar with some peculiar views on the Trinity and Christology which were not in harmony with the later Nicene orthodoxy, but that he wiped out all stains by his heroic confession and martyrdom".
_	Underlying the notion of the learner as an active processor is "the assumption that there is no one set of generalised learning laws with each law applying to all domains".
_	is the assumption that you live within a given system and you have two cows.
_	Some scholars have argued that the sources could have derived their dates from lines 773–82 under the assumption that these refer to Harpagus's attack on Ionia in the reign of Cyrus The Great.
_	Automatizability results are not in contrast with the assumption that the polynomial hierarchy does not collapse, which would happen if generating a proof in time polynomial in the size "of the formula" were always possible.
_	The limitations are caused by the assumption that only one pointer exists.
_	The difficulty arises mostly from the assumption that the ladder is rigid (i.e., maintains the same shape).
_	In a given branch of industry, a technical improvement is introduced, and then the new "equilibrium" growth path is established under the assumption that the new technique is generally adopted by the capitalists of that branch.
_	He wrote the film with the assumption that it would offend the diamond industry, particularly De Beers, and so made sure to portray the industry truthfully, aware that he could potentially be sued by De Beers and other powerful mining corporations.
_	Hume argued that beliefs about causality are based on experience, and experience similarly based on the assumption that the future models the past, which in turn can only be based on experience – leading to circular logic.
_	Eriksson, Balzano and Nowak have considered the problem of completing a matrix with the assumption that the columns of the matrix belong to a union of multiple low-rank subspaces.
_	For a gay male relationship, this might lead to the assumption that the "wife" handled domestic chores, was the receptive sexual partner, adopted effeminate mannerisms, and perhaps even dressed in women's clothing.
_	This vagueness had led to the assumption that the character was imaginary, although many Liverpudlians claimed to have seen him in person.
_	Formal analogies are made with the assumption that, as Paul Lane describes, "because two objects or contexts share a similar appearance or shape, they are likely to share other properties as well, typically that of function."
_	This approach operates under the assumption that local interactions play a large role in stabilizing the overall protein conformation.
_	Based on the assumption that it would trigger a chain of rulings that would ultimately result in the original sentence being overturned, he then filed several "lis pendens" on the properties.
_	For example, the Lenstra-Lenstra-Lovász lattice basis reduction algorithm (LLL) has been used in the cryptanalysis of many public-key encryption schemes, and many lattice-based cryptographic schemes are known to be secure under the assumption that certain lattice problems are computationally difficult.
_	The crowding-out hypothesis is the assumption that when a government experiences a deficit, the choice to borrow to offset that deficit draws on the pool of resources available for investment and private investment gets crowded out.
_	Australian academic and supporter of compulsory voting, Lisa Hill, has argued that a prisoner's dilemma situation arises under voluntary systems for marginalised citizens: it seems rational for them to abstain from voting, under the assumption that others in their situation are also doing so, in order to conserve their limited resources.
_	Circlework is based on the assumption that the root causes of violence and war lie within us, and that our own consciousness is where change must begin.
_	In his book "This Is Your Brain On Music", Levitin argues that music could provide adaptive advantage through sexual selection, social bonding, and cognitive development; he questions the assumption that music is the antecedent to language, as opposed to its progenitor, noting that many species display music-like habits that could be seen as precursors to human music.
_	More precisely, search theory studies an individual's optimal strategy when choosing from a series of potential opportunities of random quality, under the assumption that delaying choice is costly.
_	According to George Landow, who developed Holloway's model, sage writing can be distinguished from traditional wisdom literature in that "Whereas the pronouncements of traditional wisdom literature always take as their point of departure the assumption that they embody the accepted, received wisdom of an entire society, the pronouncements of the biblical prophet and Victorian sage begin with the assumption that, however traditional their messages may once have been, they are now forgotten or actively opposed by society."
_	Of particular importance is the assumption that introducing and supporting VLOM is an easier task for government than running a centralized maintenance service.
_	Then by the assumption that all paths which lead to the same ending node have the same risk-neutral probability, a "path probability" is attached to each ending node.
_	He relies on the assumption that boundary conditions supply degrees of freedom that, instead of being random, are determined by higher-level realities, whose properties are dependent on but distinct from the lower level from which they emerge.
_	It was based on the assumption that a bacterial cell is equivalent to a sexually reproducing multicellular organism.
_	Values outside the spectral locus are maintained with the assumption that they will later be manipulated through color timing or in other cases of image interchange to eventually lie within the locus.
_	It rests on the assumption that anyone involved in the Hollywood film industry can be linked through their film roles to Bacon within six steps.
_	Unlike other theories concerning media consumption, UGT gives the consumer power to discern what media they consume, with the assumption that the consumer has a clear intent and use.
_	Under the assumption that Laura is in England, John is shocked when later that day he spots her on a boat that is part of a funeral cortege, accompanied by the two sisters.
_	However, distinct differences in foot and toe morphology from its African relative have led some authorities to speculate that even the assumption that it nests in burrows could be incorrect.
_	"Miller works from the assumption that Dickinson sees herself 'oppositionally, defining her position in the world negatively, by distance from some social construct or law'.
_	It is relevant to models where the network modulates transfer of goods between known start and end points, under the assumption that such transfer seeks the shortest available route.
_	Also, the assumption that "X" be transitive automatically holds when formula_6.
_	German anti-Nazis could not accept the assumption that the entire German nation was guilty of Nazi crimes.
_	Lord showed that under the assumption that formula_60 is normally distributed, discrimination in the 2PL model is approximately a monotonic function of the point-biserial correlation.
_	Kohlberg's approach begins with the assumption that humans are intrinsically motivated to explore, and become competent at functioning in, their environments.
_	This approach was based on the assumption that each genre is organically associated with a particular social and historical situation.
_	The purpose was the same, to make the driver of the first lorry slow down, on the assumption that Barry was a British officer.
_	When Simon came to the assumption that Robinson would not get one shilling of her family's wealth, he began to have affairs and soon abandoned her completely.
_	The book's point of divergence is the assumption that it is the Arab air forces which on June 5, 1967 launch a surprise attack and destroy the Israeli Air Force, rather than the other way around as it happened in actual history.
_	A. T. Steegman of the Department of Anthropology at State University of New York investigated the assumption that Allen's rule caused the structural configuration of the Arctic Mongoloid face.
_	Back at the dance, Harry's group are outside and take the assumption that they have been abandoned by Harry because he has not showed up.
_	This leads to the assumption that corresponding pixels should have the same color.
_	Harm reduction begins with the assumption that it is not reasonable to assume that individuals make healthy decisions.
_	The concept may extend also to expressions that foster a climate of prejudice and intolerance on the assumption that this may fuel targeted discrimination, hostility and violent attacks.
_	On the outbreak of the Franco-Prussian War of 1870, Andrássy resolutely defended the neutrality of the Austrian monarchy, and in his speech on 28 July 1870 warmly protested against the assumption that it was in the interests of Austria to seek to recover the position she had held in Germany before 1863.
_	The DNMS is an ego state therapy based on the assumption that the degree to which developmental needs were not adequately met is the degree to which a client may be stuck in childhood.
_	The assumption of the existence of a strongly inaccessible cardinal is sometimes applied in the form of the assumption that one can work inside a Grothendieck universe, the two ideas being intimately connected.
_	Cheques (or "checks" as they are known in the United States) are usually handled by banks as a cash item, on the assumption that the payor bank will honor the check.
_	Scientific literature focuses on the psychology of female orgasm significantly more than it does on the psychology of male orgasm, which "appears to reflect the assumption that female orgasm is psychologically more complex than male orgasm," but "the limited empirical evidence available suggests that male and female orgasm may bear more similarities than differences.
_	Like the Europeans, the American Romantics demonstrated a high level of moral enthusiasm, commitment to individualism and the unfolding of the self, an emphasis on intuitive perception, and the assumption that the natural world was inherently good, while human society was filled with corruption.
_	Kurt is also openly gay, which causes quite a stir in the office when he casually reveals as much in the breakroom and quickly dispels the assumption that he is pursuing a romantic relationship with Peggy.
_	Hence the assumption that the Kadamba ruler Vijayaditya who styled himself as the 'torch for the jewels of the land of Konkan' had annexed the Silahara kingdom appears to have no basis.
_	The seeding in these draws (or in any cases where the results of a tie in the previous round were not known at the time of draw) was carried out under the assumption that the higher-ranked teams of the previous round would advance to this round, which means if a lower-ranked team were to advance, it would simply take the seeding of its defeated opponent.
_	This fact, the finding of three bronze coins with the image of Seuthes III at the beginning of the corridor and the extraordinary similarity of the bronze head with the images on the coins of this Thracian ruler are the reasons why the discoverer G. Kitov makes the assumption that this is the tomb of the founder of Sevtopolis.
_	At that time, the budget for the project was estimated at US$600,000, based on the assumption that the existing boiler could be saved.
_	Because this agent started out with the assumption that both accepting and rejecting are equally viable options ("p" = 0.5), the observation of an signal will allow him to conclude that accepting is the rational choice.
_	Graves was not available to be consulted when questions from his family arose regarding the whereabouts of the buck-eye (in 1957) and the beneficiaries of Graves' Estate later made the assumption that the painting purchased by Mr. Joseph Wallace King (the Chicago Version) in 1964 was this 'missing' buck-eye painting.
_	The few records of Hose’s civet from across its range have been mainly from montane forest sites, giving rise to the assumption that it is a montane species.
_	Direct perception in the cognitive sense is related to the philosophical notion of naïve or direct realism in that it is predicated on the assumption that what we perceive is what is actually in the world.
_	Underlying this search was the early recognition of the importance of leadership and the assumption that leadership is rooted in the characteristics that certain individuals possess.
_	The fair market value is based on the typical selling price for property on which the buyer and seller can agree, with the assumption that the property is being used or will be used at its highest and best use after the sale.
_	This term has been greatly developed by Andreas Wimmer and Nina Glick Schiller, who specifically define methodological nationalism as "understood as the assumption that the nation/state/society is the natural social and political form of the modern world".
_	The phrase "Regrets only" refers to the assumption that a declination will be worded with some variation of "We regret we cannot attend...".
_	Narrative modelling relies on the assumption that human beings frame their experiences in terms of various classes of “story”, and the notion that people will respond more positively to a story which they can easily recognise and follow.
_	It is important to avoid the assumption that site preparation of a particular designation will have a particular silvicultural outcome.
_	It rejects the assumption that certain and necessary laws of organization and change govern the social, political, and economic institutions of human activity and thereby limit human freedom.
_	For these draws (or in any cases where the result of a tie in the previous round was not known at the time of the draw), the seeding was carried out under the assumption that the team with the higher coefficient of an undecided tie advanced to this round, which means if the team with the lower coefficient was to advance, it simply took the seeding of its defeated opponent.
_	William left Normandy to Robert, and the custody of England was given to William's second surviving son, also called William, on the assumption that he would become king.
_	The first, known as 'Rankin C (Norway)' was based on the assumption that all German forces occupying Norway would surrender as part of a more general unconditional surrender by Germany.
_	Under the assumption that all symptoms are independent we can calculate the expected relative frequency of a configuration "c" = ("c" , ..., "c") by:
_	The connection of this "Valerius Flaccus" to Gaius Valerius Flaccus has been contested under the assumption that Martial was referring to the friend's financial strife, and that Gaius Valerius Flaccus was a member of the College of Fifteen, and therefore likely to have been wealthy.
_	This yields the Bekenstein–Hawking luminosity of a black hole, under the assumption of pure photon emission (no other particles are emitted) and under the assumption that the horizon is the radiating surface:
_	Most current models in word recognition take the assumption that bilingual lexical access is nonselective, which also take into account the demands of task and context dependence of processing.
_	Hope has a run-in with an undercover American agent, under the assumption that Hope conspires with his brother.
_	A title song, sung by Betsy Jones-Moreland, was added by Hellman on the assumption that a film called "Creature from the Haunted Sea" should have a title song.
_	Angela contemplates leaving the Jeffersonian at one point, under the assumption that her work does not contribute to cases in a meaningful way.
_	The Norman Layout, like Workman, deprioritizes the central columns but gives more load to the right hand with the assumption that the right hand is more capable than the left.
_	Taking into account the assumption that it is a round coil with an inner diameter of 8 mm, then, the outer diameter is 11.72 mm.
_	"I'm not even sure it would be possible for her to abort the pregnancy at this point, but the show's working on the assumption that having a child in a world where death literally lurks around every corner is an unequivocal good.
_	The twin earth argument hinges on the assumption that experience with an imitation water would cause a different mental state than experience with natural water.
_	Some authors add the assumption that the starting space "X" be Tychonoff (or even locally compact Hausdorff), for the following reasons:
_	Prior to 1914, colonial governments encouraged European settlement on a grand scale, based on the assumption that this was a prerequisite to long-term development and economic growth.
_	This was similarly the conclusion of Herbert Goldstein of Columbia University using IAEA release factors, the lethal contamination would be confined to a close proximity to the reactor and small amounts of radiation would be detectable in Baghdad under the assumption that winds were blowing in that direction.
_	Because of Walter's profoundly feminine behaviour, some critics have lead to the assumption that Walter is actually gay.
_	In a discussion in the Jewish Agency he said that he wanted a Jewish-Arab agreement "on the assumption that after we become a strong force, as a result of the creation of the state, we shall abolish partition and expand to the whole of Palestine."
_	implicitly making the assumption that all interactions become negligible when particles are far away from each other.
_	Questions have been raised over the underlying assumptions of density and growth projections, including concerns over the assumption that growth will continue to occur at a high rate in the region.
_	Italian authorities had misjudged the growth of an Albanian national consciousness during the Zog years with the assumption that Albanian nationalism was weak or could be directed by the Italians.
_	In mathematical terminology, this corresponds to the assumption that the win-loss outcomes of each bet are independent and identically distributed random variables, an assumption which is valid in many realistic situations.
_	The history of ideas marks points of discontinuity between broadly defined modes of knowledge, but the assumption that those modes exist as wholes fails to do justice to the complexities of discourse.
_	Many 2 inch Quadruplex videotape master copies of "Play School" editions were wiped by the BBC in 1993 on the assumption that they were of no further use and that examples of some other episodes were sufficient.
_	It was established by dividing the first equation above by the second, under the assumption that the U/Pb system was undisturbed.
_	For example, Hot Desert Knights (HDK) was one of the studios that initially operated on the assumption that all of their bareback models were HIV positive.
_	In return, DIX agreed to provide a free connection for his time server under the assumption that the bandwidth involved would be relatively low, given the limited number of servers and potential clients.
_	However, they have never manifested in the laser spectra, which leads to the assumption that XeH is not formed under the experimental conditions.
_	Realino began his philosophical studies and medicine in Bologna but altered this midcourse to law; it was said that a woman he fell in love with persuaded him to do so on the assumption that Realino would be good at practicing law.
_	On August 4, 2017, his permanent residence in Singapore was cancelled, and he and his wife were denied re-entry, on the assumption that he was "an agent of influence of a foreign country".
_	Similarly, applications and utilities bundled by Apple with the operating system (e.g. Safari) are not transferred, based on the assumption that the newer machine has the same or newer version already installed.
_	Ecklund and Scheitle concluded, from their study, that the individuals from non-religious backgrounds disproportionately had self-selected into scientific professions and that the assumption that becoming a scientist necessarily leads to loss of religion is untenable since the study did not strongly support the idea that scientists had dropped religious identities due to their scientific training.
_	The actor explained of the change to the story, "I went on the assumption that if you were willing to allow Walter and Kitty to grow... you had the potential for a love story that was both tragic and meaningful."
_	The concept of studying abroad was based on the assumption that graduates would return to their homeland to serve colonial administration once they had developed skills and absorbed the values of the colonial rulers.
_	For example, the assumption that on average there occurs an equal number of collisions from the right as from the left falls apart once the particle is in motion.
_	With each person sent into the holodeck also becoming lost, Captain Janeway sends in the Doctor (Robert Picardo) to investigate, under the assumption that as an immaterial hologram, he cannot be dematerialized in the way the missing crew had been.
_	A default can be used to derive its conclusion under the assumption that its justifications are consistent with what is currently believed.
_	The Chajoma capital has been investigated archaeologically, under the assumption that it was the Poqomam capital.
_	Baldauf discovered parallels between the historical books of the Old Testament and the works of the mediaeval Romance genre as well as Homer's "Iliad" that were string enough to lead him to the assumption that the text of both the "Iliad" and the Bible date from the late Middle Ages.
_	Instead, a player can act under the assumption that some percentage of the population fits each archetype, and act accordingly to find the best response.
_	Another reason for municipal mergers is the assumption that larger municipalities are more efficient in performing their tasks than smaller ones.
_	A barotropic model tries to solve a simplified form of atmospheric dynamics based on the assumption that the atmosphere is in geostrophic balance; that is, that the Rossby number of the air in the atmosphere is small.
_	He demanded four parachutes to force the assumption that he might compel one or more hostages to jump with him, thus ensuring he would not be deliberately supplied with sabotaged equipment.
_	The approach to engineering design to account for damage tolerance is based on the assumption that flaws can exist in any structure and such flaws propagate with usage.
_	Otherwise and would also be proportional, and thus equal since as monoid homomorphisms they satisfy: , which contradicts the assumption that they are distinct.
_	The Shapley–Shubik measure centers on the assumption that a player makes a commitment to stay upon joining a coalition.
_	"Titanic"s discoverer Robert Ballard has commented that the assumption that the ship had suffered a major breach was "a by-product of the mystique of the "Titanic".
_	We first make the assumption that α and α are both 1.
_	Likelier, though, is the assumption that it arose much later, perhaps only in the 10th or 11th century, as a hamlet ("Weiler" in German).
_	Evans produces relies on the assumption that terms precisely denote vague objects, the implication is that the assumption is false, and so the vague-objects view is wrong.
_	In our own town, we are gratified to testify, no such cruelties and privations are, to our knowledge, practised in any one establishment; and the neat, clean, and wholesome appearance of the numerous young females in particular, (whose constitutions would most likely be readily affected by inordinate labour) warrant the assumption that they are not subjected to the hardships complained of in the cases alluded to.
_	This can be justified by making the assumption that the source starts to radiate at a particular time, and then by making "R" large enough, so that when the disturbance at P is being considered, no contributions from "A" will have arrived there.
_	Turkish security policy in 1939 was based on the assumption that the Soviet Union would also join the "peace front' with the expectation that the Soviets would bear the brunt of the fighting in Eastern Europe, and the signing of the Molotov-Ribbentrop pact threw such a wrench into Turkish planning that İnönü opted for neutrality.
_	The security of many cryptographic protocols rely on the assumption that integer factorization is hard (i.e. cannot be solved in polynomial time).
_	The school's finances depended on rising values for the land it had purchased, based on the assumption that the growth of the Dallas area would push residential development towards Plano and hopes that portions of the land could be rezoned for commercial use, both of which would drive up the value of the land.
_	Trevor-Roper noted the contradiction in Irving's argument, based on the assumption that it was Hitler who ordered Himmler to spare the people aboard that train and the claim that Hitler was unaware in the fall of 1941 that the SS were rounding up German and Czech Jews to be sent to be shot in Eastern Europe (the first gassings via gas vans started on 8 December 1941).
_	Instead, union-negotiated rates were used, on the assumption that those rates prevailed.
_	The SSRI's usage is due to the assumption that the biological dynamics of these conditions derives from low levels of serotonin in brain synapses, and that the efficacy of this type of therapy will be relevant to kleptomania and to other comorbid conditions.
_	Under the assumption that these two branches would cooperate, there was no system of checks and balances.
_	The reason why Laymann is often represented as an advocate of the horrible cruelties practised at trials for witchcraft lies in the assumption that he is the author of a book entitled "Processus juridicus contra sagas et vene fico" (Cologne, 1629).
_	Selective exposure relies on the assumption that one will continue to seek out information on an issue even after an individual has taken a stance on it.
_	The torpedo station people had come to the assumption that this ship, not her sister ship the , was used in the movie "Mr. Roberts".
_	Barth bases his argument on the assumption that coercion and physical violence were prevalent in the credit-ticket system.
_	It can be defined as societal beliefs and customs that promote the assumption that the products of a given culture, including the language and traditions of that culture are superior to those of other cultures.
_	On the other hand, CBC mode can be proven to be secure under the assumption that the underlying block cipher is likewise secure.
_	Therefore, based on the assumption that the French public was more fascinated by scientific developments in America, Ruyer published the book "The Gnosis of Princeton".
_	The discovery in the parish registers of Saffron Walden of the entry of the birth on 14 March 1647 of Robert Winstanley (a nephew of William and a younger brother of Henry Winstanley) has led to the assumption that he, rather than his kinsman William Winstanley, was the writer of "Poor Robin's" works, but it is very improbable that the almanacs, which date from 1662, were devised by a boy of fifteen; and apart from the resemblance between the names of Robin and Robert, there is no ground for associating Robert Winstanley with the 'Poor Robin' literature.
_	Furthermore, regimes have proven adept at co-opting and neutralizing many civil society organizations, which calls into question the assumption that support for civil society should "be equated with support for democratization, given that civil society has also played a role in normalizing authoritarianism in the postindependence period."
_	Burgoyne made his advance under the assumption that he would be met in Albany by Howe or troops sent by Howe.
_	In geometry, a source of confusion is the assumption that a finite extension is infinitely divisible or contains an infinite number of parts.
_	In 2010 Gregory S. Paul, on the assumption that specimen NMC 8547 represented "Anchiceratops", estimated its length at 4.3 metres, its weight at 1.2 tonnes.
_	Such a theory would be true with higher probability, because it cannot be attacked so easily: to falsify the first one, it is sufficient to find that the sun has stopped rising; to falsify the second one, one additionally needs the assumption that the given day has not yet been reached.
_	The near-universal practice in education has traditionally been to act on the assumption that they were "not" work for hire.
_	To explain this preference, SIT introduced a formal coding model starting from the assumption that the perceptually preferred interpretation of a stimulus is the one with the simplest code.
_	It also challenges the negative attitudes towards people who hear voices and the assumption that hearing voices, in itself, is a sign of mental illness.
_	Failure to tap the card upon disembarking ("missed tap-off") will cause the maximum fare to be deducted, under the assumption that the passenger travelled to the point furthest away from the origin point.
_	Specifically, in the Thomas case the film pushes against the assumption that innocent people will not confess to a crime that they did not commit.
_	Central to this process is the assumption that the gospel's development should be understood as a reaction to various developing needs of the early church.
_	Specifically, these cases allow tests of location to be made where the assumption that sample observations arise from populations having a normal distribution can be replaced by the assumption that they arise from a Gaussian scale mixture distribution.
_	It is common folklore that an amendment that would have criminalised lesbian acts was rejected by Queen Victoria because she refused to believe that some women did such things; but it is likelier that those presenting the amendment excluded it (as did the House of Lords 40 years later) on the assumption that it would give women ideas.
_	The function that uses this rule to map a configuration of the cellular automaton into its successor configuration is necessarily equivariant with respect to the shift map, by the assumption that all positions use the same update rule.
_	On 3 April 1967, the Laurentian Society made a statement pointing out "that the controversy about the ban on Catholics attending Trinity College resulting from Hierarchial [sic] legislation had led to the assumption that the problem consisted of a conflict between the university and the Hierarchy.
_	However, this relies on the assumption that the observed mannikins also had reliable information that indicated the feeding spot was an ideal one.
_	The set-point theories of hunger and eating are a group of theories developed in the 1940s and 1950s that operate under the assumption that hunger is the result of an energy deficit and that eating is a means by which energy resources are returned to their optimal level, or energy set-point.
_	Coercive deficiency is a phrase that originated in study of the executive branch of the American federal government, where it described the process by which budget holders could allow themselves to run out of money prior to the end of a fiscal period, on the assumption that Congress would then feel morally obligated to supply the missing funding in order to prevent cessation of services or breach of contracts.
_	Specifically, the book questions the assumption that morality rules out certain actions (such as harming innocent people) even in situations where doing so might create greater good, and the assumption that individuals are "not required to make our greatest possible contribution to the overall good."
_	Gender historians are also interested in how gender difference has been perceived and configured at different times and places, usually with the assumption that such differences are socially constructed.
_	Also, access to and travel within the conservation park was via tracks suitable only for four-wheel drive vehicles and that no visitor facilities had been provided on the assumption that visitors will be “self-reliant.
_	After locking her servants in the root cellar on the assumption that one of them destroyed all of his beloved art, Edward ends up being killed sacrificed by the Roanoke colonists.
_	The approach to citizen interface was based on the assumption that all direct Government – citizen interactions can be IT-enabled and can be categorised as making payments, getting entitlements, getting providing information and grievance redressal, etc.
_	The plot is furthered easily with the assumption that the object has no bounds of possibility.
_	Value-added theory (also known as social strain theory) was first proposed by Neil Smelser and is based on the assumption that certain conditions are needed for the development of a social movement.
_	The determination of shear number requires the assumption that each amino acid in one strand of a beta sheet is adjacent to just one amino acid in the neighboring strand (this assumption may not hold if, for example, a beta bulge is present).
_	For the solvency ratio, the pension liabilities are measured using stringent rules including the assumption that the plan will be close immediately so must purchase of annuities to transfer responsibility of the pensions to another party.
_	Possible problems of twin studies are: (1) errors in diagnosis of monozygocity, and (2) the assumption that social environment sharing by DZ twins is equivalent to that of MZ twins.
_	Despite the committee's support of Leeson (and general support of the Trustees for appointing the most suitable candidate regardless of gender), the Minister for Public Instruction was unwilling to approve the appointment due to the assumption that the Mitchell Librarian would deputise for the Principal Librarian and an unwillingness to see a woman in that role.
_	While the assumption that a solid has independent oscillations is very accurate, these oscillations are sound waves or phonons, collective modes involving many atoms.
_	Most mid to low-tier restaurants operate under the assumption that customers bring their own napkins or tissue packs when dining.
_	Minear explains that he decided to open this episode with the assumption that Lilah's offer of taking over Wolfram & Hart happened off-screen during the commercial break.
_	Much commentary has been based on the assumption that the French paradox is real and is not the statistical distortion posited by Law and Wald.
_	The first, "Westergaard", is based on the assumption that the pavement is an elastic plate supported on a heavy fluid base with a uniform reaction coefficient known as the K value.
_	The "self-assessment motive" is based on the assumption that people want to have an accurate and objective evaluation of the self.
_	Physical anthropologists throughout the first half of the 20th century viewed this relationship from a racial perspective; that is, from the assumption that typological human biological differences lead to cultural differences.
_	Their study questions the assumption that increased knowledge of other people and relationships will help social actors to function effectively in the social world.
_	The first invasion was during the Revolution, under the assumption that French-speaking Canadians' presumed hostility towards British colonial rule combined with the Franco-American alliance would make them natural allies to the American cause; the Continental Army successfully recruited two Canadian regiments for the invasion.
_	Given the assumption that these networks exhibit small world properties, often as the result of real-world or acquaintance relationships, it should be possible to recover an embedded Kleinberg small-world graph.
_	Almost all of "The Tonight Show" with Jack Paar and the first ten years hosted by his successor Johnny Carson were taped over by the network, with Carson's blessing, under the assumption that the broadcasts were of no real value.
_	According to him, the assumption that Hindus and Muslims could live under one state if they were distinct nations was but "an empty sermon, a mad project, to which no sane man would agree".
_	Such an understanding was based on the assumption that Western Christians live in a Christian society and the Christian missionary task was to take our faith and culture to those areas where it was not known."
_	Here they define their terminology; interstate relations are those channels assumed by realists; transgovernmental relations occur when one relaxes the realist assumption that states act coherently as units; transnational applies when one removes the assumption that states are the only units.
_	The difference quotients converge pointwise to the partial derivative "f" by the assumption that the partial derivative exists.
_	The z-score method is based on the assumption that the measured values (usually fluorescent intensity in log scale) of all investigated compounds in a plate have a normal distribution.
_	The philosophy is most closely associated with the theory of supply side economics and the assumption that employers will respond positively to tax incentives and reduced government regulation.
_	Measuring the trace velocity of the reflected microbarom signal at the surface gives the propagation velocity at the reflection height, as long as the assumption that the speed of sound only varies along the vertical, and not over the horizontal, is valid.
_	Those projections, however, are based on the assumption that tax and spending policies unfold as specified in current law.
_	When the 4 alternatives (i.e., the previous 3 plus the copy) were evaluated, and under the assumption that the criteria weights are exactly the same as before, it was observed that now the indication of the best alternative can change.
_	Well known in philosophy and mathematics, the so-called "paradox of Tristram Shandy" was introduced by Bertrand Russell in his book "The Principles of Mathematics" to evidentiate the inner contradictions that arise from the assumption that infinite sets can have the same cardinality—as would be the case with a gentleman who spends one year to write the story of one day of his life, if he were able to write for an infinite length of time.
_	While the extant 18th-century manuscripts present the concerto in a form for two harpsichords and strings, the assumption that it originated as concerto for violin and oboe has become widely accepted since the late 19th century.
_	He was summoned to Constantinople on the assumption that his uncle had been in possession of the treasures of the Armenian kings which the emperor wanted, but Peter did not have any of it.
_	This classification is based on the assumption that the unique physical characteristics of the genus reflect an early divergence from other hornworts.
_	Under the assumption that the conditions for uniqueness and convergence of the iterative solution are met, the generalized constrained iterative restoration solution is given as
_	We start with the assumption that
_	Both of Bem's parents worked throughout her life, so she grew up with the assumption that she would always be working.
_	With the assumption that Dunheved (now known as Launceston) was the seat of the Celtic Kings of the area and that when Constantine became a monk he gave his territory to the Celtic Church, the Parish, along with North Petherwin and Lawhitton (Landwithan), would have been administered by the Celtic Bishop from St German's Priory.
_	The journal, along with FARMS, operated from the assumption that the "Book of Mormon" was historically ancient and divine scripture.
_	As opposed to "formalists," substantivists insist that economic life is produced through cultural rules that govern the production and distribution of goods, and therefore any understanding of economic life has to start from cultural principles, and not from the assumption that the economy is made up of independently acting, "economically rational" individuals.
_	The Chu limit gives the minimum Q, and by implication the maximum bandwidth, for an antenna of a given size on the assumption that it is lossless.
_	The party-list proportional representation system works under the assumption that the citizens vote primarily for parties.
_	Until 1974 the Daddah government supported self-determination for the Western Sahara, to be exercised by means of a referendum, under the assumption that the Sahrawis would choose to join with Mauritania.
_	C-SPAN announced that they were troubleshooting the incident and were "operating under the assumption that it was an internal routing issue."
_	Russell is careful to indicate that his support for nationalisation rests on the assumption that it can be accomplished under the auspices of a robust democracy, and that it may be safeguarded against statist tyranny.
_	The original 1969 derivation will not be given here since it is not easy to follow and involves the assumption that the outcomes are all +1 or −1, never zero.
_	The findings sparked immediate controversy due to several issues: the study's reliance on secondary data; the assumption that all wines contributing to that data were representative of the countries stated; and the grouping together of poorly understood high-concentration ions, such as vanadium, with relatively low-level, common ions such as copper and manganese.
_	The equation is derived under the assumption that formula_8.
_	On his spectrum of theistic probability, which has seven levels between 1 (100% certainty that a God or gods exist) and 7 (100% certainty that a God or gods do not exist), Dawkins has said he is a 6.9, which represents a "de facto atheist" who thinks "I cannot know for certain but I think God is very improbable, and I live my life on the assumption that he is not there."
_	This would seem to make irrelevant a number of time-honored scholarly approaches, fundamental to which were, first, the "literally true" vs. "literary fictions" debate, and, second, the assumption that there was a unified line of development from the established Eucharist of later centuries back close to the time of the historical Jesus.
_	Examples show that the assumption that the group be countable cannot be removed.
_	The uncertainty principle isn't only a statement about the accuracy of our measuring equipment, but, more deeply, is about the conceptual nature of the measured quantities – the assumption that the car had simultaneously defined position and speed does not work in quantum mechanics.
_	For example, every single bit of inputs to the RSA function is a hard-core predicate of RSA and blocks of "O(log |x|)" bits of "x" are indistinguishable from random bit strings in polynomial time (under the assumption that the RSA function is hard to invert).
_	He also promised that students and faculty would never be chosen based on quotas of "genetic or ethnic or economic distribution" because choices based on quotas "are based on the assumption that there are standard population strains, on the belief that the ideal American must look and act like an eighteenth-century Puritan, that the melting pot of America must mold all who all who live here into such a pattern."
_	If the assumption that Fiannamail ua Dúnchado was a grandson of the earlier king Dúnchad mac Conaing is correct, then it may be that Dúnchad Bec belonged to this segment of the Cenél nGabráin, probably descended from Conaing son of Áedán, which appears to have contested with the main line, descended from Eochaid Buide.
_	His farm manager, Jacob Palmer, learned that Jayhawkers planned to murder Jefferys, ostensibly under the assumption that he had assisted the local rebel guerrillas and for his ownership of slaves.
_	Prone to the assumption that Japanese artists follow Western artist, Yoshihara insisted Gutai artists create an extremely distinguished style.
_	DNA sequencing theories often invoke the assumption that certain random variables in a model are independent and identically distributed.
_	This fact explains the frequent breakdowns of sophisticated financial instruments, which are modeled on the assumption that a Gaussian relationship is appropriate to, for example, stock price movements.
_	This argument has been criticized by those who do not ascribe to the assumption that there is a linear path of development that all countries follow.
_	In 1960, American parasitologist Don E. Eyles and his supervisor, G. Robert Coatney (1902–1990) worked under the National Institutes of Health to carry out experiments on rhesus macaques in a Memphis laboratory with the assumption that humans were not susceptible to “monkey malaria.”
_	This was based on the assumption that hybridization, producing fertile offsprings, is an indicator of lack of speciation.
_	Mayhew's model rests on the assumption that all members of congress are single-minded seekers of reelection.
_	The Fermi surface of the pure metal is constructed under the assumption that the wave vector k of the Bloch electron is a good quantum number.
_	Another variant, called complete induction, course of values induction or strong induction (in contrast to which the basic form of induction is sometimes known as weak induction) makes the inductive step easier to prove by using a stronger hypothesis: one proves the statement under the assumption that "P"("n") holds for all natural "n" less than ; by contrast, the basic form only assumes "P"("m").
_	Under the assumption that a Sulzer manuscript would be impossible to obtain, he demanded just that from his synagogue committee.
_	During his term as Royal Commissioner, Heydon was invited to deliver the 6th Sir Garfield Barwick Address, a fundraising event organised by a branch of the Liberal Party, on the assumption that the Commission would have completed its inquiries.
_	If not, then, on the assumption that one key factor in a decision to enhance oneself is one's own personal development, we should regard the enhancement in question as undesirable.
_	The thickness of the roof was chosen on the assumption that Allied bombs were incapable of penetrating such a depth of concrete; the Germans, however, were unaware of the British development of earthquake bombs.
_	However these curves are estimated, it is the assumption that they are intrinsically smooth that often defines a functional data analysis.
_	"Khyber Pakhtunkhwa region was chosen to carry out this experimentation, based on the assumption that being devout Muslims, the Pakhtuns would support the reformist movement."
_	He was the main architect of the Ten Year Rule, a principle that allowed the Treasury to dominate and control strategic, foreign and financial policies under the assumption that "there would be no great European war for the next five or ten years".
_	It is designed to teach spelling based on the assumption that spelling is a memorization (as opposed to rule-based) task.
_	Often, behaviorist experiments using humans and animals are built around the assumption that subjects will pursue pleasure and avoid pain.
_	In this capacity, he helped reduce the workload for MBAs, on the assumption that they had previously been bombarded with too much information they could not take in.
_	He questions the assumption that promiscuity is or ought to be a central aspect of gay liberation and attacks the idea that liberated gay men will always default to multipartnerism, citing historical examples.
_	The scheme of manoeuvre was based on the assumption that the Viet Cong position was a camp as previously reported, and not a defensive position, yet with visibility in the thick vegetation limited to between , few of the men from A Company had actually seen much of the position during the earlier fighting.
_	Whatever the consequence to Hippasus himself, his discovery posed a very serious problem to Pythagorean mathematics, since it shattered the assumption that number and geometry were inseparable–a foundation of their theory.
_	The proof that τ is a vector space topology makes use of the assumption that each "X" is locally convex.
_	Although Hot's membership: the African-American Owens, the white Carson and the Hispanic Curiel, had assembled on the assumption that this multiracial personnel would attract attention, the group received little noticeable promotion, beyond their million selling single "Angel in Your Arms".
_	In this case, by making the assumption that the lower-order terms, and the parts of the leading-order terms that are the same size as the lower-order terms (perhaps the second or third significant figure onwards), are negligible, a new equation may be formed by dropping all these lower-order terms and parts of the leading-order terms.
_	Such phenomena are sometimes offered to validate the viewpoint that the Written Law has always been transmitted with a parallel oral tradition, illustrating the assumption that the reader is already familiar with the details from other, i.e., oral, sources.
_	Later discoveries changed this to the assumption that the dynasty ran entirely in parallel to the others.
_	The judge noted that since the Office of Fair Trading was unable to provide any evidence of breaches since early 2006 then Miller was to be sentenced on the assumption that no breaches had taken place since then.
_	Under the assumption that formula_102, these equations become equivalent to the momentum balance.
_	Much of fracture mechanics is predicated on the assumption that fracture toughness is a material property.
_	This is an accurate interest model only based on the assumption that the borrower pays only the amount due each month.
_	The resulting strategy is to then play the low card first, with the assumption that you will lose the trick to the player holding the ace of that suit, and then when you have regained control of the table the king is played under the assumption that it will be a winning card.
_	This is because of the assumption that the surface of air that is exposed is under the droplet and is the only other substrate in the system.
_	Second, since the theory is anchored in the assumption that "homo individualis"—in contrast to "homo economicus" and to "homo politicus"—situated in an overarching social and natural environment, it is also at odds with the conventional view of economic man, the isolated individual entering an impersonal market at a particular point in time.
_	Coming to prominence during one of the most precarious times for the "pink film", these directors worked under the assumption that each film could be their last, and so largely ignored their audience to concentrate on intensely personal, experimental themes.
_	Napoleon's original plan for 16 June was based on the assumption that the Coalition forces, who had been caught napping, would not attempt a risky forward concentration; he intended therefore to push an advanced guard as far as Gembloux, for the purpose of feeling for and warding off Blücher.
_	These measures were constructed under the assumption that BIS, BAS and associated traits Anxiety and Impulsivity are independent.
_	This provided support for a phenomenon called reactive devaluation, which involves dismissing a concession from an adversary on the assumption that the concession is either motivated by self-interest or less valuable.
_	In places where the design of the plug and socket cannot ensure that a system neutral conductor is connected to particular terminals of the device ("unpolarized" plugs), portable appliances must be designed on the assumption that either pole of each circuit may reach full main voltage with respect to the ground.
_	The determination is also based upon the assumption that the opposition will double the sacrifice bid thereby increasing the penalty points.
_	It is based on the assumption that a complex concept should be reasonably relevant to the context in which it is used.
_	It operates on the assumption that if students have become fully disengaged they will either exit prematurely, or remain disaffected and derive minimal benefit from their time there.
_	This was the case with many inhumane acts taken by the former Nazi members; as Wildt says, the assumption that National Socialism was synonymous with the “German Dictatorship rendered indivisible” the murderous acts that the party had taken in eastern and southern Europe and the Soviet Union.
_	In 1902, Max Abraham published a theory based on the assumption that the electron was a rigid, perfect sphere, with its charge being distributed evenly on its surface.
_	described the genus "Metriaclima", dismissing the pre-existing "Maylandia" on the assumption that it lacked a type species and a diagnosis.
_	The proof of the symmetry axiom d(g,h) = d(h,g) for a metric uses the assumption that the generating set S is closed under inverse.
_	This type of scaling was offered under the assumption that by keeping all other factors consistent (esp. string thickness and tension) and changing only length, the sound of the instrument would be homogeneous across its full range.
_	Third, he has identified a key assumption that might be responsible for generating the entire problem: the assumption that a declarative sentence, by its nature, can declare-something-about anything."
_	Dated 1510, this is the earliest full-length portrait in Western painting—on the assumption that it is a portrait, as seems likely.
_	This of course rests on the assumption that the noise associated with each judgment is (at least somewhat) statistically independent.
_	Speech patterns for comedy would not be appropriate for tragedy, and even actors were restricted to their genre under the assumption that a type of person could tell one type of story best.
_	The Court of Appeal had admitted the evidence on the assumption that Daubert did not apply to technical evidence, only scientific evidence.
_	They adopted a modernist, secular approach and disagreed with the assumption that Arabic was an immutable language because of its association with the Qur'an.
_	This model is based on the assumption that carrying capacity does not change.
_	The visioning process is based on the assumption that images of the future lead peoples’ present behaviours, guide choices and influence decisions.
_	Essentially, the Orlov algorithm tries to spread out "top-level" directories, on the assumption that they are unrelated to each other.
_	Over the field of real numbers, the assumption that the function "f" is a polynomial can be weakened, but it cannot be weakened all the way down to mere continuity.
_	Ptolemy argued that the Earth was a sphere in the center of the universe, from the simple observation that half the stars were above the horizon and half were below the horizon at any time (stars on rotating stellar sphere), and the assumption that the stars were all at some modest distance from the center of the universe.
_	Based on the assumption that the masked character, rather than the actor, was the true star of "The Lone Ranger," the program's producers fired Moore (presumably over salary differences) and replaced him with Hart, who was of a similar build and had a comparable background in Westerns.
_	Around 1478, Willem van der Haegen settled in Ribeira da Cruz, where he built homes, developed agriculture (primarily wheat), collected more woad species for export, and explored for tin, silver or other minerals (under the assumption that the islands were part of the mythic "Ilhas Cassterides", "the islands of silver and tin").
_	For these draws (or in any cases where the result of a tie in the previous round was not known at the time of the draw), the seeding was carried out under the assumption that the team with the higher coefficient of an undecided tie advanced to this round, which means if the team with the lower coefficient was to advance, it simply took the seeding of its defeated opponent.
_	Using the assumption that the cross-shore velocity "v" is zero at the coast, "v" = 0, one may solve a frequency relation for the phase speed of coastal Kelvin waves, which are among the class of waves called boundary waves, edge waves, trapped waves, or surface waves (similar to the Lamb waves).
_	For these draws (or in any cases where the result of a tie in the previous round was not known at the time of the draw), the seeding was carried out under the assumption that the team with the higher coefficient of an undecided tie advanced to this round, which means if the team with the lower coefficient was to advance, it simply took the seeding of its defeated opponent.
_	Fluency shaping therapies do not address attitudes, feelings, and self-concept issues under the assumption that eliminating the stuttering will eliminate these issues.
_	A great number of intertwined environmental and social components together create the framework for comprehensive human security under the assumption that neither of those two categories is attainable in the long run without synergy between the two.
_	These were not intentionally created as direct satellite broadcasts to home viewers, but often had been left unencrypted (in the clear) on the assumption that few people were watching.
_	Here Leopold describes the death of a she-wolf killed by his party during a time when conservationists were operating under the assumption that elimination of top predators would make game plentiful.
_	In fact, this debate rests on the assumption that Toyota is a monolithic company with a single unified practice.
_	For Overy, the problem with Mason's thesis was that it rested on the assumption that in a way not shown by records, information was passed on to Hitler about the "Reich"'s economic problems.
_	Games of the day had been programmed under the assumption that the player's viewpoint would always be completely contained within sealed areas.
_	In the first act of the film, both the viewer and every character except Michael is left to make the assumption that Fuzzbucket is an imaginary friend.
_	Additionally, the Laffer curve depends on the assumption that tax revenue is used to provide a public good that is separable in utility and separate from labor supply, which may not be true in practice.
_	Chadwick's group at Liverpool dealt with thermal diffusion, which worked based on the assumption that different isotopes of uranium are attracted to different temperatures.
_	The real investments are determined by the assumption that the production system tries to swallow up all available production factors.
_	Dempsey's reasons for believing that they were on shaky ground was because although the 1986 "United States v. Freitas", 800 F.2d 1451 (9th Cir.), and 1990, United States v. Villegas, 899 F.2d 1324 (2d Cir.) circuit opinions were premised on the assumption that notice was not an element of the Fourth Amendment, "Wilson v. Arkansas", 514 U.S. 927 (1995) Justice Thomas of the Supreme Court found that notice is part of the Fourth Amendment.
_	They had the task of establishing secure borders between Masovia and the Prussians, with the assumption that conquered territories would become part of Masovia.
_	The above theories operate on the assumption that the segregated atoms are non-interacting.
_	Daenerys is beginning to gain confidence in her new role as Drogo's wife and gains the respect of the exiled knight Ser Jorah Mormont, but her relationship with her brother Viserys becomes strained when he angrily assaults her under the assumption that she is giving him commands.
_	However, this relies on the assumption that supporters of a minor party will mark preferences for another party based on the advice that they have been given.
_	Despite the "observer" in this experiment being an electronic detector—possibly due to the assumption that the word "observer" implies a person—its results have led to the popular belief that a conscious mind can directly affect reality.
_	Speaking of Israel in an interview, Berman commented of anti-Zionism that its "true origin ... is anti-Semitism, the assumption that the Jews are the center of the world and therefore the center of the world's evil."
_	The theoretical foundation of this method is the assumption that when either one of the reactants is present in excess amounts over the other reactant, the characteristic electronic absorption spectra of the other reactant will be transparent in the collective absorption/emission range of the reaction system.
_	The father of the family decides on burying the body in the woods, under the assumption that no one would believe this to be a suicide.
_	However, critics say that the assumption that there are no possible legal systems between the extremes of "forbidden" and "allowed" is the central weakness of the MPC.
_	This method was established by Bott in 1959, based on the assumption that direction and sense of slip occurs on the fault plane are the same with those of the maximum resolved shear stress, hence, with known orientations and senses of movements on abundant faults, a particular solution T (the reduce stress tensor) is attained.
_	Little is known of the production, but a review in "The New York Dramatic Mirror" made the assumption that the scenes were shot in the morning.
_	The basic model is the mixed mating model, which is based on the assumption that every fertilisation is either self-fertilisation or completely random cross-fertilisation.
_	In 2006, the journal introduced open peer review, a system in which authors and reviewers know each other's identities on the assumption that this improves openness in scientific discourse.
_	Theological statements on the position of women from down the centuries testify not only to the assumption that it is men who have the authority to define women, but to the precautions that have been taken to ensure that women do not claim too much real equality with men – in this life at least".
_	This led to the assumption that 1,3-dibromopropane could have reacted with GSH after administration and gave rise to 1-bromo-3-propyl-S-glutathione, which ultimately form the urinary metabolite.
_	Here they define their terminology; interstate relations are those channels assumed by realists; "transgovernmental" relations occur when one relaxes the realist assumption that states act coherently as units; "transnational" applies when one removes the assumption that states are the only units.
_	While she never discouraged the assumption that her mother was the pioneering American businesswoman who established the "Katharine Gibbs" chain of vocational schools, Francis was actually raised in the hardscrabble theatrical circuit of the period.
_	Previous studies allow the assumption that this prehispanic city submitted was occupied from the late preclassical horizon (200 BC) to the early classic (0 to 200 AD), which makes it one of the oldest cities of the country.
_	Barton O'Connor and Isaacs JJ declined to express a view on whether the common rule provisions were invalid, holding that on the assumption that the common rule provisions were unconstitutional, they were severable from the Act.
_	BAN logic starts with the assumption that all information exchanges happen on media vulnerable to tampering and public monitoring.
_	Thymidine incorporation measures growth based on rates of DNA synthesis, using the assumption that only growing cells can incorporate the radioactive thymidine to synthesize DNA.
_	The staff worked under the assumption that the flagellate (motile) stage could be separated permanently from the benthic spherical stages, which is not so, as these are stages of a single lifecycle.
_	Under the assumption that Peach herself is trying to find the Crystal Stars, he uses the map in an attempt to locate her.
_	During the 1960s, the theory of plate tectonics—initially based on the assumption that Earth's size remains constant, and relating the subduction zones to burying of lithosphere at a scale comparable to seafloor spreading—became the accepted explanation in the Earth Sciences.
_	But he was relieved to find that Lenoir still operated under the assumption that the hieroglyphs were mystic symbols and not a literary system expressing language.
_	He argues that the interpretations were based on the later presence (after Ghana's demise) of nomadic interlopers on the assumption that they were the historic ruling caste, and that the writers did not adequately consider contemporary accounts such as those of al-Yakqubi (872 A.D.) al-Masudi (c. 944 A.D.), Ibn Hawqal (c. 977 A.D.), al-Biruni (c. 1036 A.D.), as well as al-Bakri, all of whom describe the population and rulers of Ghana as "negroes".
_	Autologous hematopoietic stem cell transplantation (HSCT) is based on the assumption that autoimmune diseases like systemic sclerosis occur when the white blood cells of the immune system attack the body.
_	Condorcet in 1792 drew up plans for universal schooling, but it was based on the assumption that the historic endowments would be available.
_	Date rejected the assumption that she would retire after her injury, stating "I didn’t want to just quit because I was hurt.
_	In the US, OSHA requires that exposure to blood-borne pathogens be limited as much as possible due to the assumption that the blood and biological material is infectious.
_	Sölle's critique is against the assumption that God is all-powerful and the cause of suffering; humans thus suffer for some greater purpose.
_	This was not a popular decision as many of the Squadron were ex-aircrew who had been made redundant after the war, and who had joined the armoured car companies on the assumption that they would remain independent of the Regiment.
_	He was the main architect of the Ten Year Rule, a principle that allowed the Treasury to dominate and control strategic, foreign, and financial policies under the assumption that "there would be no great European war for the next five or ten years".
_	By the assumption that formula_5 converges, it follows that the last term tends to 0 when formula_16, for every arbitrary formula_13.
_	These balance equations arise from applying Isaac Newton's second law to fluid motion, together with the assumption that the stress in the fluid is the sum of a diffusing viscous term (proportional to the gradient of velocity) and a pressure term—hence describing "viscous flow".
_	The script of the Tugu inscription and the Cidanghyang inscription bear striking similarity, such as the script "citralaikha" written as "citralekha", leading to the assumption that the writer of these inscriptions was the same person.
_	During the experiment, semantic associations remain fixed showing the assumption that semantic associations are not significantly impacted by the episodic experience of one experiment.
_	On the assumption that he was the son of Hector, he may have received the appellation Catanach from his mother's people, Clan Chattan, with whom he was fostered.
_	This term is used to describe a handful of other manuscripts of the time, due to the assumption that they were written and told by Spielmänner (a kind of jester).
_	The seeding in each draw is carried out under the assumption that all of the highest-ranked clubs of the previous round are victorious.
_	He calculated the capacity of various skulls by pouring substances into them and then noting the volume consumed, on the assumption that a larger space for a brain equated to a more developed intellect.
_	They too lack sidewalks, mostly to reduce costs but also on the assumption that resident traffic is low enough for the road pavement to be shared by all without risk.
_	Due to the contact between British Standard English and Nigerian English, which have two very different sets of grammatical, pronunciation, and spelling rules, there has arisen a predominant occurrence of "faulty analogy" (the assumption that because one grammatical feature resembles another in usage, the rules applying to the former also apply to the latter) in what Okoro refers to as "substandard" varieties of Nigerian English.
_	Although the puzzle is not posed as an impartial game, the assumption that captures are mandatory implies that a player's moving in any file results only in the removal of that file and its neighbors (if any) from further consideration, with the opposite player to move.
_	Jones and Davis make the assumption that, in order to infer that any effects of an action were intended, the perceiver must believe that (1) the actor knew the consequences of the actions (e.g., the technician who pushed that button at Chernobyl did not know the consequences of that action), (2) the actor had the ability to perform the action (could Lee Harvey Oswald really have shot John Kennedy?), and (3) the actor had the intention to perform the action.
_	X-ray measurements of the Carpometacarpii lead to the assumption that it was flightless.
_	The use of the tank was primarily based on the assumption that, once they were able to eliminate the German trench lines with their machine gun and Infantry support gun positions, the Allied infantry would follow and secure the breach, and the cavalry would exploit the breach in the trench lines by attacking into the depth of German-held territory, eventually capturing the field artillery positions and interdicting logistics and reserves being brought up from the rear areas.
_	The starting point for the framework was the assumption that it makes economic sense for development aid projects to allocate resources to women as well as men, which will make development more efficient – a position named the “efficiency approach".
_	In 2008 he co-authored a book with Jennie Bristow published by the think tank Civitas titled "Licensed to Hug: How Child Protection Policies Are Poisoning the Relationship Between the Generations and Damaging the Voluntary Sector", arguing that the growth of police vetting (see Criminal Records Bureau) has created a sense of mistrust and advocating a more common-sense approach to adult/child relations, based on the assumption that the vast majority of adults can be relied on to help and support children, and that the healthy interaction between generations enriches children's lives.
_	The SCA relies on the assumption that a matrix of attributes or significant features of a property drive its value.
_	The writer Rupert Gould, in a lengthy essay on New South Greenland published in 1929, queries the assumption that the sighting was simply invented by Morrell, partly on the grounds that very little weight is given to the discovery in Morrell's 500-page account.
_	However, with Zyuganov still leading in numerous other polls, Communists continued operating under the assumption that Zyuganov was still the favorite to win.
_	His Labour government provided the foundations of the post-war consensus, based upon the assumption that full employment would be maintained by Keynesian policies and that a greatly enlarged system of social services would be created.
_	This number is then multiplied by 2 with the assumption that both legs produce relatively the same force.
_	When first uncovered, the objects were found stuck together by an unidentifiable black mass, leading to the assumption that the hoard might have been covered in some kind of organic material (e.g. cloth or leather) prior to being interred.
_	The products of incomplete combustion can be calculated with the aid of a material balance, together with the assumption that the combustion products reach equilibrium.
_	We've now created a situation where the suggested protocol leads one general to attack and the other not to attack—contradicting the assumption that the protocol was a solution to the problem.
_	He rejects the assumption that the wagtail carries the eggs of "D. aspasia" to India.
_	In many contexts, the assumption that we are interested in the growth rate as the variable "x" goes to infinity is left unstated, and one writes more simply that
_	As the identity of the winners of the previous round is not known at the time of the draws, the seeding is carried out under the assumption that the team with the higher coefficient of an undecided tie advances to this round, which means if the team with the lower coefficient is to advance, it simply take the seeding of its opponent.
_	Generally speaking, people assume the testimony of an adult to be more credible and accurate, based on the assumption that adults are better memory reporters.
_	In contrast, optimal control optimises the flow, given a cost function, under the assumption that formula_31 (i.e., the flow is curl free or has detailed balance).
_	In the early months of 2011, a great number of sightings of a 'panther' in Shotts, North Lanarkshire, stirred locals and began to be reported in the local press, after a couple of months, these reports ceased with the assumption that the 'panther' had moved onto pastures new.
_	"The Lives of the Novel" narrates the history of the novel from its Ancient Greek origins to the present, based on the assumption that older as well as more recent narratives are all about human beings, their values, their passions, and their actions, thus being comprehensible across the borders of time and cultures.
_	In fact, current conceptualizations of the deterrence argument are also paramount, insofar as they implicitly operate under the assumption that the media and publicity are integral to shaping individuals' awareness and understandings of capital punishment.
_	Olson thus challenges the assumption that simple interests in common are all that is necessary for collective action.
_	Thus, the assumption that the modern diversity started to evolve in the late Paleogene, continuing throughout the Miocene and onwards, must also be considered hypothetical given the lack of robust evidence.
_	No conclusive statistics being available for the levels of exposure usually found in homes, the risks posed by domestic exposures is usually estimated on the basis of observed lung-cancer deaths caused by higher exposures in mines, under the assumption that the risk of developing lung-cancer increases linearly as the exposure increases.
_	The Americans were operating on the assumption that the Japanese had nothing to match their new centrimetric SG radar; they knew that their older meter band radars could not differentiate between the surface ships and the island and presumed Japanese radars were no better.
_	Explanations which do not involve CP violation are less plausible, since they rely on the assumption that the matter–antimatter imbalance was present at the beginning, or on other admittedly exotic assumptions.
_	It differed from BNOB as it mainly drew from the community and "was based on the assumption that all areas of the city would be rebuilt," and planned to recover every neighborhood.
_	In analysis with p-adic numbers, Mahler's theorem states that the assumption that "f" is a polynomial function can be weakened all the way to the assumption that "f" is merely continuous.
_	Parts of the system are supplied from different phases on the assumption that the total loads of the three phases will even out.
_	American individualism coupled with the assumption that disability is associated with lower socioeconomic status and race plus the failure of the Americans to develop a comprehensive universal healthcare and welfare system led to the development of the ugly laws.
_	Passages of the 1973 Endangered Species Act (ESA) carried with it the assumption that endangered species would be delisted as their populations recovered.
_	If these symptoms are present for a period of two weeks or longer, it is safe to make the assumption that the child, or anybody else for that matter, is falling into major depression.
_	Neolithic circular enclosures suggest the assumption that the plain was continuously settled from about 6000 BC onwards.
_	Because these models are necessarily simplifying natural conditions (often based on the assumption that weeds, disease and insect pests are controlled), it is not clear whether the results they give will have an "in-field" reality.
_	Wittig writes, "Lesbians are not women", under the assumption that the term "woman" is defined by men.
_	On the assumption that the marginal utility of one is diminishing, and the other is not increasing, all else being equal, an individual will demand an increasing ratio of that which is acquired to that which is sacrificed.
_	Underlying this inquiry is the assumption that women "should" be receiving the same treatment as others with similar capabilities, a formal equality assumption.
_	One of the typical explanations, given by Paul Krugman, depends on the assumption that all firms are symmetrical, meaning that they all have the same production coefficients.
_	In 1923, Joffe signed an agreement with Sun Yat-Sen in Shanghai on aid to Kuomintang on the assumption that the latter would cooperate with Chinese Communists, presumably with Lenin's approval.
_	Quantitative research uses data that is numerical and is based on the assumption that the numbers will describe a single reality.
_	This value would correspond to a coincidence of the sidereal with the tropical zodiac in or near the year 285 AD, roughly compatible with the assumption that the tradition of the tropical zodiac as current in Western astrology was fixed by Ptolemy in the 2nd century.
_	Matthew Herrick who is suing gay dating app Grindr for failing to stop a user from sending sexually aggressive men to his home and job under the assumption that they were going to have violent sex.
_	The boundary with New Hampshire was of some controversy, since the original boundary definition in colonial charters (three miles north of the Merrimack River) had been made on the assumption that the river flowed predominantly west.
_	Both Hunt and Lusieri had been working on the assumption that the marbles were destined for restoration in Italy: but William Richard Hamilton argued against that, on security grounds.
_	The model explains economic boom and bust by the assumption that investors are only influenced by output (known as the accelerator principle); this is now believed to be correct.
_	Wilson's work is based on the assumption that people are not always aware of "why" they feel the way they do.
_	[These studies are] based on the assumption that these issues depend on the functioning of the media, as if the functioning of the media was an external reality to the experience of the world and society that invented and uses them.
_	Based on the assumption that only particular species with qualities ideal for "early succession" can colonize the newly exposed landforms after an ecological disturbance.
_	Using the assumption that activation energy is independent of applied stress, the equation can be used to relate the difference in rupture life to differences in temperature for a given stress.
_	The unusual task was possible, said Larry Silverstein, because it was designed to allow for "entire portions of floors to be removed without affecting the building's structural integrity, on the assumption that someone might need double-height floors."
_	Historian Andy Merrills uses the large amounts of African red slip ware discovered across the Mediterranean dating from the Vandal period of North Africa to challenge the assumption that the Vandal rule of North Africa was a time of economic instability.
_	Therefore, the identity created for people with disabilities is widely perceived as incompatible with the assumption that they should work.
_	After several schools of the philosophy of mathematics ran into difficulties one after the other in the 20th century, the assumption that mathematics had any foundation that could be stated within mathematics itself began to be heavily challenged.
_	The race name change was done on the assumption that Zenyatta would retire at the end of 2009.
_	The security of most cryptographic algorithms and protocols using PRNGs is based on the assumption that it is infeasible to distinguish use of a suitable PRNG from use of a truly random sequence.
_	Thus a cycle is generated, which contradicts the assumption that social preference is transitive.
_	The reviewer from "Pyramid" noted the prestige classes in the book, and felt that it offered "some jim-dandies in this one", including the thief-acrobat, and the Fang of Lolth, "which starts with the assumption that a PC tries to access an artifact not meant for humanoids with a Use Magic Device roll.
_	Anomalistic psychology is the study of human behaviour and experience connected with what is often called the paranormal, without the assumption that there is anything paranormal involved.
_	There is an ancestral hoatzin, "Hoazinoides", from the Early or Middle Miocene of Colombia, which would at least not contradict the assumption that "Foro panarium" was an ancient member of the hoatzin lineage or its predecessor.
_	Accordingly, the assumption that a wife might not want to give up her marital rights may have been one of the factors contributing to the eventual universal practice in the Latin Church of ordaining only unmarried men.
_	Under the assumption that natural boundaries can limit species distributions in varying degrees (for example, a mountain can present absolute elevational limits), Collwell and Lees explained the mid domain effect with geometric theory.
_	In an attempt to make GBM more realistic as a model for stock prices, one can drop the assumption that the volatility (formula_34) is constant.
_	By applying one axiom of the quantum mechanics and the assumption that preferred-basis depends on the total Hamiltonian, a unique set of equations is obtained from the collapse equation which determines the preferred-basis for general situations.
_	This was in the context of a threatened, later realised, boycott of the elections by Sunnis in Iraq potentially leading to a Shia-dominated government and the assumption that a Shia Iraq might fall under the influence of Shia Iran.
_	Popular neoliberal thought supports the destruction of public spheres in favor of the privatization of public institutions such as education and health based on the assumption that the market best determines public needs.
_	Size and extent of the two squares correspong approximately to the area requirement of a village at the time, which supports the assumption that at the time of certification a settlement was under construction, which should be legitimized by this donation and later, as in similar cases, has adopted th name of the original settlement.
_	Given the limits of our cognitive abilities, we will never be able to master the whole of the English (or Italian or German) language, even on the assumption that languages are static and immutable entities (which is false).
_	According to Jesper Ryberg's 2011 article "Racial Profiling And Criminal Justice" in the "Journal of Ethics", "It is argued that, given the assumption that criminals are currently being punished too severely in Western countries, the apprehension of more criminals may not constitute a reason in favor of racial profiling at all."
_	In an example of retroactive continuity, "Going for the Gold" is based on the assumption that the first film has been moved from 1992 to 1984.
_	Vertical flows (in z-direction) are described (a) with a 1-dimensional flow equation, or (b) derived from a water balance of horizontal flows converting the excess of horizontally incoming over the horizontally outgoing groundwater into vertical flow under the assumption that water is incompressible.
_	The local committee of the YCP took the collaborationist position, based upon the assumption that the Bulgarian army liberated Vardar Macedonia from serbianisation.
_	Cost-benefit models are given under the assumption that there is a set amount of energy potentially available for an organism, which leads to trade-offs when energy is allocated to certain functions to maximize competitive ability and fitness.
_	Both solutions develop a Gaussian Plume and are virtually identical under the assumption that the variances in the x,y,z directions are related to the eddy diffusivity.
_	Dr. Johnny Benjamin stated his belief that soccer kicks could cause serious injury, based on the assumption that an MMA fighter would be able to generate the same amount of force in a soccer kick as a professional association football player.
_	Similarly, without considering the presence of a trap, conservationists might mistakenly preserve trap habitat under the assumption that an organism's preferred habitat was also good quality habitat.
_	"Generalization" in this case is measured by means of confusion error, while the use of "distance" depends on the assumption that stimuli will be compared in some kind of psychological space (the latter being typical of Shepard's work).
_	Wilhelm Dilthey (1833–1911), in contrast, fought strenuously against the assumption that only explanations derived from science are valid.
_	Rommel was a suitable candidate, since the manner of his death had led to the assumption that he had not been a supporter of Nazism.
_	A tighter upper bound yet for this sum of masses, , was reported in March 2013 by the Planck collaboration, whereas a February 2014 result estimates the sum as 0.320 ± 0.081 eV based on discrepancies between the cosmological consequences implied by Planck's detailed measurements of the Cosmic Microwave Background and predictions arising from observing other phenomena, combined with the assumption that neutrinos are responsible for the observed weaker gravitational lensing than would be expected from massless neutrinos.
_	The ocean has a long history of human waste disposal on the assumption that its vast size makes it capable of absorbing and diluting all noxious material.
_	The editors of the 1986 Oxford Edition of Shakespeare make the assumption that Wilkins was the co-author of "Pericles" and draw heavily upon "The Painful Adventures" in their controversial reconstructed text of the play.
_	He argues that if one makes the assumption that any mathematically coherent model is metaphysically possible, then it can be shown that an infinite temporal chain is metaphysically possible, since one can show that there exist mathematically coherent models of an infinite progression of times.
_	Burgess' anchor mode is the product of alternative evolution on Earth, predicated on the assumption that, had the creatures of the Burgess Shale survived the Cambrian period, evolution might never have given rise to chordates.
_	As an alternative, Francesca Stavrakopoulou remains sceptical about the significance and interpretation of the inscription and claims that it does not necessarily support the assumption that the Bible's David was a historical figure since "David" which can also be translated as "beloved" could refer to a mythical ancestor.
_	The Komatsu analysis does not evaluate the impact of the considerable erosion observed in this basin during the flood (or floods) – hence the assumption that the flood hydraulics can be modeled using modern-day topography is an area which warrants further consideration – earlier narrower constrictions at places such as Wallula Gap and through the Columbia Gorge could be expected to produce higher flow resistance and correspondingly higher floods.
_	One school starts with the assumption that the Supreme Almighty, Immanent Soul is the only reality and the rest of existence is an illusion, Maya.
_	The appearance of the door is not clear from the photograph from the beginning of the 20th century, but the width allows for the assumption that it might have been a two-way door.
_	For many years, AT&T had been permitted to retain its monopoly status under the assumption that it was a natural monopoly.
_	This stems from the assumption that the unexpected may be predicted by extrapolating from variations in statistics based on past observations, especially when these statistics are presumed to represent samples from a normal distribution.
_	The most significant is the assumption that the concentration of the acid and its conjugate base at equilibrium will remain the same as the formal concentration.
_	Johannes Weiss... acknowledges that in all his inquiries he "starts with the assumption that the gospel story in general has an historical root", that it has grown out of the soil of the life of Jesus, goes back to eye-witnesses of his life, and comes so near to him that we may count upon historical reminiscences...
_	Christaller also erred in the assumption that cities "emerge".
_	Newton, and most of his contemporaries, with the notable exception of Huygens, worked on the assumption that classical mechanics would be able to explain all phenomena, including light, in the form of geometric optics.
_	He carries out a series of unethical tasks for Rais under the assumption that he will be rewarded with two crates of Antizin.
_	First, we prove a few elementary properties from formula_7 satisfying formula_60 and the assumption that formula_7 is not identically zero:
_	Lago's techniques, including use of barges to move heavy equipment around, made the cost of drilling on water lower than that of drilling on land, although taxes and royalties had been set lower by the government on the assumption that costs would be higher.
_	The research is primarily based on the assumption that "people's responses to framed messages may not always be a simple reflection of the presumed risky nature of screening behaviors, but rather shaped by their individual beliefs about risk."
_	Early scholarship held that the Athenians were responsible for its creation, on the argument that the quality of material and execution did not equal the other known buildings of Hadrian in Athens, and on the assumption that an emperor who loved
_	If the axiom of choice holds, this is true without the assumption that "V" has finite dimension.
_	The least distinctiveness criterion relies on the assumption that when stories are passed from person to person, the peripheral, least distinct elements may be distorted, but the central element remains unchanged.
_	Third, Owsley's non-Native argument hinged on the assumption that Kennewick Man's skull was a reliable means of assessing ancestry.
_	Based on the assumption that low levels of protein C are involved in the underlying mechanism, common treatments in this setting include fresh frozen plasma or pure activated protein C.
_	This policy was based on the assumption that it would encourage visitors to prolong their stay and to make numerous return visits so as not to miss seeing favourite performers.
_	The balance of power struck between the members of the Balkan League had been on the assumption that no Albanian polity would be formed and Albanian territory would be split between them.
_	In the article Playing with Power: Ballcourts and Ritual in Southern Mesoamerica with John Gerard Fox, John H. Blitz, Susan D. Gillespie, Stephen D. Houston, Ted J.J. Leyenaar, Joyce Marcus, Jerry D. Moore, Patricia A. Urban, Edward M. Shortman, and David Webster, Ashmore challenges the assumption that ballcourts functioned as public architecture in ancient Maya society.
_	Tracking companies rely on the assumption that address anonymization is akin to encryption.
_	On 30 September 1956 secret Franco-Israeli talks on planning a war started in Paris, which were based on the assumption that Britain would not be involved.
_	A mis-spelling of his name as Jessie in the historical record appears to have led to the assumption that he was a woman.
_	Hecht always worked on the assumption that it was the preservation and study of ancient art that really mattered, not provenance.
_	However, since these measurements are based on the assumption that the speed of light is constant, they can also be used as tests of special relativity by analyzing potential distance and orbit oscillations.
_	The microcanonical ensemble is based upon the assumption that, when such an equilibrated system is probed, the probability for it to be found in any of the microscopic states with the same total energy have equal probability.
_	This is a comprehensive protocol that tests the reliability of a child witness’s memory of an event or situation which relies on the assumption that false memories are of weaker quality then truthful and accurate memories.
_	In behavioral psychology, the assumption of generality is the assumption that the results of experiments involving schedules of reinforcement, conducted on non-human subjects (often pigeons), can be generalized to apply to humans.
_	Moody argued the "predestine nation myth" used by the IRA simply ignored the Unionism felt by the much of the Protestant community in Northern Ireland as it was based on the assumption that if only the British Army withdrew from Northern Ireland, then the Protestants of Ulster would all happily join the Republic of Ireland.
_	Scholar Peter Aucoin, writing about the Canadian Westminster system, has raised concerns in the early 2000s about the centralization of power; an increased number, role and influence of partisan-political staff; personal-politicization of appointments to the senior public service; and, the assumption that the public service is promiscuously partisan for the government of the day.
_	In this model, because of the assumption that M>F, the male will desert first when the payoff of deserting (V+M) is greater than the benefits of investing in offspring (V).
_	The main complaints were that the series was only announced to be airing in Canada, and the assumption that it would be changed in order to appeal to viewers not familiar with internet culture.
_	Meanwhile, land was being advertised in Inverurie, on the assumption that construction of the canal would result in factories and other public works being built.
_	LPC starts with the assumption that a speech signal is produced by a buzzer at the end of a tube (voiced sounds), with occasional added hissing and popping sounds (sibilants and plosive sounds).
_	The journalist Matt Ridley, writing in "" (1993), argued that Symons's ideas about the evolution of gender differences had revolutionary implications, since "the overwhelming majority of the research that social scientists had done on human sexuality was infused with the assumption that there are no mental differences" between the sexes.
_	This description of the system in terms of modular rules relies on the assumption that only a subset of features or attributes are relevant for a particular reaction rule.
_	Thus the main portions of the theories of Crick and Koch, Edelman and Tononi, and Cotterill seem to be compatible with the assumption that birds are conscious.
_	Earlier archeologists worked on the assumption that agriculture was a prerequisite to a sedentary lifestyle, but excavations in Israel and Lebanon surprised science by showing that a sedentary lifestyle actually came before agriculture (see the Natufian culture).
_	This is contrasted with build to order, where the constructor builds an item to the buyer's exact specifications, or when an incomplete product is sold with the assumption that the buyer would complete it.
_	Blackburn approaches this work with the assumption that the history of Buddhist texts and practices should not be divorced from the history of other forms of life with which they are closely connected, and through which they have been constituted.
_	Under the assumption that both recordings preceded the Hangmen, Guernsey and Berberich would have been the only two members of the Reekers that played on the cuts as the Edgewood sessions were done after Triplett and Henley left that group.
_	Due to the numerical inferiority of the German fleet and the assumption that naval battles would take place at relatively close range in the North Sea, the design placed great emphasis on stability and armor protection.
_	These trains were designed with emergency exits at each end, under the assumption that the trains would eventually be used for limited express service between Narita Airport and Haneda Airport: the Toei Asakusa Line has no emergency walkways along its sides, so it was necessary to allow evacuation from the ends of the train.
_	A major plot point throughout the series is Plankton failing to steal the Krabby Patty formula with the help of his computer wife, Karen, under the assumption that they would be able to replicate the burgers and put the Krusty Krab out of business.
_	More recently, empirical studies have become popular which are mostly based on the assumption that the generated expressions should be similar to human-produced ones.
_	The "center" of the channel is based on the assumption that the bandwidth of SSB transmissions are 3 kHz, at most.
_	Among other criticisms were the scene's excessive length, the repetition of the dramatic approach, and the assumption that viewers were not going to pay attention when presented with a long exposition that did not include sex.
_	Without the Kimes' cooperation, there was the assumption that she could be buried there and that the Kimes were familiar with the property.
_	This approach gave a sufficiently accurate analysis of the structure given the assumption that the structure was sufficiently ductile to handle the resulting deformation (Buonopane, 2006).
_	Without the assumption that the input is a metric space, no finite approximation ratio is possible.
_	The first simply restricts the motion and deformation of the bodies by the assumption that no penetration can occur.
_	The so-called Children's Crusade in 1212 recruited thousands of children as untrained soldiers under the assumption that divine power would enable them to conquer the enemy, although none of the children entered combat.
_	The division took over in Cyrenaica, on the assumption that the Italians could not begin a counter-offensive until May, even with German reinforcements.
_	The above recurrence risks are based on the assumption that an affected male or carrier female will have children with an unaffected or non-carrier individual.
_	In a more general way, reformism is the assumption that gradual changes through and within existing institutions can ultimately change a society's fundamental economic system and political structures; and that an accumulation of reforms can lead to the emergence of an entirely different economic system and form of society than present-day capitalism.
_	While with Washoe, the Gardners and Fouts were careful to communicate only in ASL with Washoe, rather than using vocal communication, on the assumption that this would create a less confusing learning environment for Washoe.
_	The third approach focuses on interpersonal interactions with the assumption that individuals are members of networks in which political information spreads through communication.
_	In the 2014–15 season, on November 2, 2014 David Leggio, at the time with the Isles' AHL affiliate Bridgeport Sound Tigers, earned a degree of notoriety for strategically dislodging his goal net (literally moving the goalposts) during a two player breakaway, under the assumption that the penalty shot he would face as a result of the flagrant foul would be easier to defend than the breakaway (although, ironically, the 2-on-0 was swiftly marred by a mishandled pass during its fast-paced approach to the net).
_	One is the fallacy of textual holism: the assumption that if one or a small number of passages are problematic, then the overall attribution of authorship must be in error. …
_	It is common practice supported by decided cases to assume a hypothetical tenancy, and the rateable value is an estimated annual rent which would have been agreed between a hypothetical landlord and a hypothetical tenant, on the assumption that the property in its actual physical state was vacant and to let.
_	Political attitudes towards homosexuals in Nazi Germany were based on the assumption that homosexuals were destroying the German nation as "sexual degenerates".
_	Also, the third codon position in a coding nucleotide sequence is particularly labile, and is sometimes downweighted, or given a weight of 0, on the assumption that it is more likely to exhibit homoplasy.
_	Fet’s theorem states the existence of at least two non-recurrent closed geodesic arcs under the assumption that all closed geodesic arcs are non-degenerate.
_	The equation of the present Via Dolorosa with the biblical route is based on the assumption that the Praetorium was adjacent to the Antonia Fortress.
_	The Ten Year Rule was a British government guideline, first adopted in August 1919, that the armed forces should draft their estimates "on the assumption that the British Empire would not be engaged in any great war during the next ten years".
_	In law, there is a known exception to the assumption that moral culpability lies in either individual character or freely willed acts.
_	When Warlpiris marry Europeans, they tend to extend the subsection system to their inlaws, starting with the assumption that the European spouse is of the correct subsection.
_	Though Bishop Hobart was one of the greatest preachers of antebellum America, the "Evangelical" connoted not the New Means of the camp meetings but, simply, the assumption that the Gospel rightly and forthrightly proclaimed has the power to convert the world to Jesus Christ.
_	By the 10th year, disposable income would increase by 11.8% resulting in a corresponding increase in consumption of 11.7% over what it would be if the current tax system remained in place, and these results are based on the assumption that businesses use only the tax savings achieved from no longer having to pay the employer share of payroll taxes "(for more details, see Promotion of economic growth)".
_	Gill's explanation of the "Philosopher" has been criticized for relying excessively on the assumption that all of Plato's later philosophy was strongly Aristotelian, but her close analyses of many of the significant passages in the three dialogues her book covers has been lauded as well worthwhile.
_	This choice rests on the assumption that the previous player announced a lesser value than they rolled, which may be a sensible choice if they want to get at a player further down the line.
_	Keynes argued that both Say's Law and the assumption that economic actors always behave rationally are misleading simplifications, and that the classical economics was only reliable at describing a special case.
_	Recover proceeded under the assumption that all directory information included on a disk or disk partition was hopelessly corrupted, but that the FAT and non-directory areas might still contain useful information (though there might be additional bad disk sectors not recorded in the FAT).
_	This decision caused concern within the Firebird database project due to the assumption that users and Internet search engines would be confused by a database and a web browser both using the name Firebird.
_	Cicero fails to produce much evidence, but denies the assumption that the father relegated his son to the farm because the younger Roscius had incurred too much debt.
_	Factual allegations must be enough to raise a right to relief above the speculative level, on the assumption that all the allegations in the complaint are true (even if doubtful in fact)."
_	On the other hand, young children are frequently ignored within this area, based on the assumption that they might not have a clear pattern of setting a goal or they even do not own a goal when starting a task.
_	In this context, rejection of the assumption that opinion polls show actual links between opinions is considered important.
_	Matei Cazacu made the assumption that Janja was a relative to Mahmud Pasha's mother.
_	Unsupervised anomaly detection techniques detect anomalies in an unlabeled test data set under the assumption that the majority of the instances in the data set are normal by looking for instances that seem to fit least to the remainder of the data set.
_	There is a faint halo that extends about 18″ beyond the bright rim giving a complete diameter of around 190″ under the assumption that this emission is uniform around the planetary nebula.
_	This model is based on the assumption that “workers with active jobs are more likely to seek challenging situations that promote mastery, thereby encouraging skill and knowledge acquisition”.
_	System Optimum is based on the assumption that routes of all vehicles would be controlled by the system, and that rerouting would be based on maximum utilization of resources and minimum total system cost.
_	However, both the original derivation and the later corrections leading to nonexistence of the transition – due to Thomas–Reiche–Kuhn sum rule canceling for the harmonic oscillator the needed inequality to impossible negativity of the interaction – were based on the assumption that the quantum field operators are commuting numbers, and the atoms do not interact with the static Coulomb forces.
_	Mbusas operate under the assumption that less interference during the laboring process is better.
_	Anwar states that the lack of properly trained physicians and the assumption that CRC does not have a relatively early age of presentation in Pakistan may lead the physicians to diagnose the patient as having hemorrhoids rather than CRC.
_	One of the greatest limitations to understanding the cycle of spring phytoplankton blooms is the assumption that loss rates of phytoplankton in the vertical water column are constant.
_	"We consider the underlying fallacy of the plaintiff's argument to consist in the assumption that the enforced separation of the two races stamps the colored race with a badge of inferiority.
_	If a change in government policies induces changes in consumers' behaviour on the same time scale, the assumption that consumer behaviour remains unchanged while policy changes is inadmissible as a substantive isolation (Lucas critique).
_	Baconians often use "Shakspere" or "Shakespeare" for the glover's son and actor from Stratford, and "Shake-speare" for the author to avoid the assumption that the Stratford man wrote the work.
_	In 1970, four separate companies simultaneously applied for new stations in Sudbury: J. Conrad Lavigne, who owned the existing CBC affiliate CFCL-TV in Timmins, and Hyland Broadcasting, which owned the existing CBC affiliate CJIC-TV in Sault Ste. Marie, each applied for a rebroadcast transmitter in Sudbury to transmit their existing programming, predicated on the assumption that CKSO would then switch its affiliation to CTV; the Canadian Broadcasting Corporation itself applied for its own owned-and-operated station in the city, also predicated on the same assumption; and a fourth company, North Star Broadcasting, applied to launch a new CTV affiliate.
_	There, they encountered Diogo Mendes de Vasconcelos leading an expedition of 4 ships and 300 men, sent by King Manuel I to trade directly with Malacca, based on the assumption that Diogo Lopes de Sequeira had been successful in opening trade with that city the previous year.
_	Some doubt has been expressed, however, based on the assumption that the only proper Gaelic form of the word for horse is ech:
_	Instead, the typical test yields a p-value, which is the probability of the "evidence" being such as it is, under the assumption that the hypothesis being tested is true.
_	The systems are based on the assumption that all manual tasks can be analysed into basic motions of the body or body members.
_	Several important algorithms in public-key cryptography base their security on the assumption that the discrete logarithm problem over carefully chosen groups has no efficient solution.
_	Some 2 inch Quadruplex videotape master copies of "Take Hart" episodes were irretrievably junked by Adam Lee of the BBC archives in 1993 on the assumption that they were 'no use' and that examples of some other episodes were sufficient.
_	This study is based on the assumption that “Chinese Buddhist institutions are fundamentally local institutions and temple-building activities are spontaneous endeavors initiated at the local level by harnessing local resources.
_	Spamborder has been designed around the assumption that very little spam originate from a user's own geographic area, while a disproportionately high proportion of the user's legitimate mail does originate their own geographic area.
_	The existence of these strategies has important consequences in descriptive set theory, as the assumption that a broader class of games is determined often implies that a broader class of sets will have a topological property.
_	The general interpretation of the work is that the soft watches are a rejection of the assumption that time is rigid or deterministic.
_	On the assumption that every quantum interaction splits the universe into two copies that evolve along separate historical tracks, Norton postulated a mechanism that enables people to travel between alternate versions of the same world and even meet alternate versions of themselves.
_	Central to the biofilm concept is the assumption that bacteria form a three dimensional structure, dormant bacteria being in the center to serve as a constant nidus of infection.
_	All the values above are determined with the assumption that planet HAT-P-33b has an irregular, or eccentric, orbit.
_	The stunt was approved by ABC lawyers under the assumption that the motorcade would be stopped at the first security checkpoint and denied entry.
_	He did not accept the assumption that there is "some implicit hostility between 'Sinology’ and the disciplines of history and social sciences.”
_	Yet even that higher level could still be considered flawed, as it would be based almost entirely on food costs and on the assumption that families still spend a third of their income on food.
_	The "concept" was based on the assumption that Egypt would only attack if it had the air-power to take on the Israeli Air Force.
_	Excavations at hillforts in the first half of the 20th century focussed on the defenses, based on the assumption that hillforts were primarily developed for military purposes.
_	Germany, which up until the 1953 Debt agreement had to work on the assumption that all the Marshall Plan aid was to be repaid, spent its funds very carefully.
_	BCS theory starts from the assumption that there is some attraction between electrons, which can overcome the Coulomb repulsion.
_	Later in 2015, Murphy further explained that the PAC's strategy was based on the assumption that Trump's campaign would inevitably fail, and so the PAC would instead concentrate on defeating other GOP candidates, "candidates in our lane that we can overcome."
_	This hypothesis is predicated on the assumption that there is no air resistance.
_	The attacking divisions continued their preparations on the assumption that the original plan would be agreed and Rawlinson considered that the plans of the 9th and 3rd divisions for the night approach were satisfactory.
_	Dupré tries to escape this problem by rejecting determinism, and the assumption that there is a physical cause for each and every event.
_	Another method uses deep HI observations in the Milky Way and/or Local Group with the assumption that the distribution of HVCs in the Local Group is similar to that of the Milky Way.
_	I work from the assumption that you need to have both.
_	Cannon, Bryant and Lacher established that the conjecture holds under the assumption that formula_1 be a manifold except possibly at a set of dimension formula_4.
_	This is based on the assumption that if a ringfort is a status symbol, then it is not in the interests of a dynasty to allow the lower echelons to construct their own, in particular as most ringforts, with the exception of multiple banked ringforts, fail to clearly highlight the varying levels of society.
_	On 22 March, the day of the attack, the Metropolitan Police said it believed the attack was inspired by "international terrorism" and that they were working under the assumption that it was "Islamist-related terrorism".
_	Thus, any inquiry into knowledge starts with the assumption that "man as the knower is a part of the world as it is known."
_	The maximum and minimum is based on the normative assumption that all countries with maternal mortality ratio's above 1,000 do not differ in their ability to support for maternal health as well as the assumption that all countries below 10 do not differ in their abilities.
_	However, if we assume we are very close to resonance (formula_7), then these values will be slowly varying in time, and we can make the assumption that formula_8, formula_9 and formula_10, formula_11.
_	Sendhil Mullainathan and Andrei Shleifer of Harvard University construct a behavioural model, which is built around the assumption that readers and viewers hold beliefs that they would like to see confirmed by news providers.
_	Thus the use of cardinal utility imposes the assumption that levels of absolute satisfaction exist, so that the magnitudes of increments to satisfaction can be compared across different situations.
_	Magma generation rates during the pulses are about , based on the assumption that for each of arc there is one caldera.
_	At one time this fortlet was known as Milefortlet 26, on the assumption that there had been a dislocation of the pattern of fortlets and towers due to the presence of the Alauna fort.
_	Kurzweil surveys the philosophical, mathematical and technological roots of artificial intelligence, starting with the assumption that a sufficiently advanced computer program could exhibit human-level intelligence.
_	R. Brown disputes the assumption that crowds are homogenous, suggesting instead that participants exist on a continuum, differing in their ability to deviate from social norms.
_	The fundamental misunderstanding of this paradox is the assumption that the projected image caused by the light ray is a physical object, and therefore must follow physical law.
_	This claim depends on the assumption that the Lurianic Kabbalah is a dogma of Judaism binding upon all Jews.
_	When he fails to answer the call, the officers in the station make the assumption that he has wandered out of radio range.
_	One of the book’s main critiques is that macroeconomic models or theories such as the efficient-market hypothesis rely on the assumption that the economy can be viewed as being at or near equilibrium.
_	This leads to the assumption that the mentioned "Argedava" was Burebista's capital of the Dacian kingdom.
_	However, this idea was based on the assumption that the teeth of "Mesosaurus" were numerous and close together in the jaws.
_	Its many application domains often lead to the assumption that M&S is pure application.
_	The Polanyi potential adsorption theory is based on the assumption that the molecules near a surface move according to a potential, similar to that of gravity or electric fields.
_	The costs below are given under the assumption that the alphabet is constant.
_	However, the assumption that the lowest WCD accurately represents the total yield is violated in several difficult cases, e.g. with nonlinear specifications or in case of many highly competings specifications.
_	Another new public service model is what has been called New Public Governance, an approach which includes a centralization of power; an increased number, role and influence of partisan-political staff; personal-politicization of appointments to the senior public service; and, the assumption that the public service is promiscuously partisan for the government of the day.
_	By the de Bruijn–Erdős theorem (with the assumption that the axiom of choice is true), the chromatic number of the plane is the same as the largest chromatic number of any of its finite subgraphs; until the discovery of a family of 5-chromatic unit distance graphs in 2018, no subgraph of the infinite unit distance graph had been found that requires a larger number of colors than the Moser spindle.
_	The specs are written based on the assumption that the interface between MAC and PHY will be a MII but they do not require it.
_	However, this calibration crucially relies on the assumption that hypercapnia has no effect on neuronal function, which is a matter of debate.
_	Plankinton filed suit, claiming that the 1971 state law had implicitly removed the assumption that brothels are public nuisances "per se".
_	The NNC represented one of the first efforts of the 20th century to bring together under one umbrella black secular leaders, preachers, labor organizers, workers, businessmen, radicals, and professional politicians, with the assumption that the common denominator of race could weld together such divergent segments of black society.
_	The sentence structure of polysynthetic languages has been taken as a challenge for linguists working within Noam Chomsky's generative theoretical framework that operates with the assumption that all the world's languages share a set of basic syntactic principles.
_	Both of these remarks, of course, are made only for the present, on the assumption that both these outstanding and devoted Party workers fail to find an occasion to enhance their knowledge and amend their one-sidedness.
_	The Ten Year Rule was introduced in August 1919, which stipulated that the British Armed Forces should draft their estimates "on the assumption that the British Empire would not be engaged in any great war during the next ten years".
_	RSA is based on the assumption that factoring large numbers is computationally intractable.
_	The approximation is built upon the assumption that the orientation of maximum principal stress (σ) most probably passes through the greatest number of P-quadrants.
_	In order to meet Octopus's revenue target of 20% from all assets, Rollo institutes a "fierce creatures" theme on the assumption that dangerous and violent animals will attract more visitors.
_	Many scholars might have the assumption that the original traditions of Eloquentia Perfecta have been erased in the later century, both through religious and academic teachings.
_	However, on the assumption that Hadrian's Wall terminated at Bowness, it is assumed that any structures to the west of Bowness would be part of the Cumbrian Coast defences beginning with Milefortlet
_	Such alignment is based on the assumption that the DNA translation frame is not interrupted for the whole DNA strand.
_	Such a program is written with the assumption that it is running in "isolation" from other executing programs, i.e., when running, its accessed data (after the access) are not changed by other running programs.
_	On 7 October 2008, Meyler met the Wexford County Board to discuss plans for 2009 under the assumption that he was still manager.
_	Whereas the comparative method compares variations between languages, such as in sets of cognates, under the assumption that they descend from a single proto-language, internal reconstruction compares variant forms within a single language under the assumption that they descend from a single, regular form.
_	Such hypotheses are based on the assumption that heredity can be traced through linguistic relatedness, although it must be kept in mind that language shift and ethnic admixture, a relatively frequent and common occurrence both in recorded history and most likely also in prehistory, confuses the picture and there is no straightforward relationship, if at all, between linguistic and genetic affiliation.
_	His reasoning was based the assumption that Lochner developed from the early idealised forms usually associated with early 15th century Cologne, and later absorbed the techniques and realism of the Netherlandish painters.
_	This approach is based on the assumption that there is a stable and predictable relationship between money, output and inflation.
_	The film's premise is that U.S. private industry will mobilize, finance, and manufacture the first spacecraft to the Moon, while making the assumption that the U.S. government will then be forced to purchase or lease this new technology to remain the dominant power in space and on the Moon.
_	However, when he made the assumption that her son, J.J., was theirs, Julia revealed that she'd only gone with his assumptions because his doctor asked her to.
_	In these circumstances, we must proceed to determine the issues on the assumption that "General Electric" continues as a precedent.
_	Hayek makes the assumption that competition will favor currencies with the greatest stability in value since a devalued currency hurts creditors, and an upward-revalued currency hurts debtors.
_	A meta-analysis has confirmed the assumption that optimism is related to psychological well-being: "Put simply, optimists emerge from difficult circumstances with less distress than do pessimists."
_	Exclusion of birthplace, together with the assumption that formula_17 is uncorrelated with education produces a misspecified model.
_	While this technique makes the assumption that artists scaled the models appropriately, it is useful to get some sense of how large these ships and boats may have been in real life.
_	During this period, music was given importance, based on the assumption that it could humanize, refine, and elevate our elementary learning communities through listening and singing (Greata).
_	“As Patrick Hopkins has argued, heterosexism and homophobia are founded on and sustained by binary gender categories, specifically the assumption that there are distinct and proper masculine and feminine gender roles and identities against which deviation is measured.”
_	A Defra statement published in October 2012, stated that "The aim of this monitoring is to test the assumption that controlled shooting is a humane culling technique."
_	Many fail to appreciate this eg Robert Holden's 1905 article devotes considerable energy to defending the Earl of Argyle on the assumption that as Colonel he participated in Glencoe.
_	Various analysts disputed the report's findings regarding Honduran constitutional law, in particular the assumption that Congress can interpret the Constitution (which they claim is a privilege reserved to the Supreme Court by a Supreme Court ruling on 7 May 2003), though the later "Decree 241-2003" of 20 January 2004, signed by the President of the Republic on 31 January 2004, ratified a change to Article 205(10) of the Honduran Constitution to allow the Honduran Congress to interpret the Constitution in an ordinary session by a two-thirds vote.
_	This is based on the assumption that there is a particular failure mode, or range of modes, that may occur within a product.
_	Tracy was under the assumption that the husband in question was Luke, but in fact, Jerry returned Larry Ashton to her.
_	The "Einsatzgruppen" operated with the assumption that a "Führer" order ("") existed that provided for and required the mass murder of Jews, Gypsies and others whom the Nazis did not deem racially worthy.
_	The muscle synergy hypothesis is based on the assumption that the central nervous system controls muscle groups independently rather than individual muscles
_	Because the "Serpent's Reach" citation is from the same dubious document noted above, and under the assumption that the "Angel With the Sword" timeline is designed to function in part as a retcon, some readers may conclude that the correct listing for Cerdin is Alpha Hydri II.
_	Airspeed indicators are calibrated on the assumption that they are operating at sea level in the International Standard Atmosphere where the air density is 1.225 kg/m.
_	To obtain that expression we use the assumption that normals to the neutral surface remain normal during the deformation and that deflections are small.
_	Tabor's theory hinges on the assumption that Celsus' information about Jesus' paternity was correct, and a soldier with this name, living at the right period, might have been Jesus' father.
_	The London Spectator pointed out that the expedition was "to embark on the assumption that any force of Europeans however small can beat any force of Chinamen however large."
_	Significance arithmetic rules rely on the assumption that the number of significant figures in the operands gives accurate information about the uncertainty of the operands and hence the uncertainty of the result.
_	with the assumption that the plane wave formula_93 and formula_94 are not explicit functions of formula_99 or formula_100
_	The seeding in each draw is carried out under the assumption that all of the highest-ranked clubs of the previous round are victorious.
_	The above reasoning was made with the assumption that "B" = "A".
_	The model is based on the assumption that the fluid flow obeys the Arrhenius equation for molecular kinetics:
_	In a theoretical sense, the Church-Turing thesis implies that (under the assumption that enough memory is available) any operating environment can be emulated within any other environment.
_	Suppose that a contract would be valid under many potentially relevant laws but not under the "putative" "proper law", and that, until problems arose, the parties have acted in good faith on the assumption that they will be bound by the agreement, some courts might be tempted to ignore the apparent "proper law" and choose another that would give effect to the parties general contractual intentions.
_	The designer of the EMG-5 had based its development under the assumption that the batteries were considered part of the fuel with regard to the FAR 103 regulations and thus not included in the aircraft's maximum empty weight of 254 pounds (115 kg).
_	Racial thinkers such as Arthur de Gobineau relied crucially on the assumption that black people were innately inferior to whites in developing their ideologies of white supremacy.
_	A statue of the Ancient Roman god Mithras was unearthed during the reconstruction, leading to the assumption that a pre-Christian sanctuary existed at that place.
_	That the designing of research-models relies upon the assumption that, if the experimental subject rates options differently in the second survey, then the attitudes of the subject towards the options have changed.
_	Despite his previous actions of breaking into ISIS and hacking the mainframe, Archer is excused from his expenses after Cyril comes to the assumption that Kremenski had been stealing from Archer's account the whole time.
_	Mussolini was aware that Italy did not have the military capacity to carry out a long war with France or the United Kingdom and waited until France was on the verge of imminent collapse and surrender from the German invasion before declaring war on France and the United Kingdom on 10 June 1940 on the assumption that the war would be short-lived following France's collapse.
_	Some critics questioned the assumption that the target audience, those easily able to move, would consult the book for advice on moving, but also found the book provides a valuable insight into the impacts of locational choices on the urbanized world.
_	The index is based on the assumption that increasing the size of the samples will increase the diversity because it will include different habitats
_	The Rayleigh-Gans approximation is a means of interpreting MALS measurements with the assumption that the scattering particles have a refractive index, "n", very close to the refractive index of the surrounding medium, "n".
_	With the assumption that the initial concentration of the guest (G) is much larger than the initial concentration of the host (H), then the absorbance from H should be negligible.
_	Cuneo states that the painting is usually "considered in splendid isolation from its fifteen other companion pieces, based on the assumption that it either metonymically stands in for the entire cycle, or that its perceived aesthetic predominance merits exclusive focus."
_	The stochastic maximum likelihood method is obtained by modeling the signal waveforms as a Gaussian random process under the assumption that the process x(t) is a stationary, zero-mean, Gaussian process that is completely described by its second-order covariance matrix.
_	Under the assumption that the band would record matetial he heard onstage, Turner signed the Paper Garden to a recording contract, ambitious to produce a group he hoped was on the cutting-edge of psychedelia.
_	Others have criticised the assumption that the male which is successful in competition for swollen females (i.e. the most dominant) would also be the females own choice of partner, as it has been observed that some females choose to mate with subordinate males.
_	This stems from the assumption that the natural factional relationship is one of conflict and strife, when in fact, factions are often able to engage in productive co-operation.
_	The fallacy here is the assumption that dividing by 0 is a legitimate operation with the same properties as dividing by any other number.
_	Due to Candace never being able to prove Phineas and Ferb’s antic’s to her mother, some viewers came to the assumption that Candace has schizophrenia, which is why Phineas and Ferb’s inventions always disappear right before she shows her mom.
_	Readership figures are usually higher than circulation figures because of the assumption that a typical copy of the newspaper is read by more than one person.
_	Regarding her foreign policy, Chile tried to separate Bolivia from Peru. Gonzalo Bulnes writes: "The target of the "política boliviana" was the same as before, to seize Tacna and Arica for Bolivia and put Bolivia as a Buffer state between Peru and Chile, on the assumption that Peru would accept the Chilean peace conditions.
_	Immunization starts with the assumption that the yield curve is flat.
_	Chen Shou (陳壽) mentions in the "Records of the Three Kingdoms" that a man named Bing Yuan (邴原) walked upon a string of cash coins while strolling and incapable of discovering the owner hung it up in a nearby tree, as other passerby's noticed this string they also began hanging coins up in the tree with the assumption that it was a holy tree and made wishes for wealth and luck.
_	Project SALVO began in 1951 and was based on the assumption that firing multiple projectiles would increase the probability of hitting the target.
_	However, the assumption that greener ocean water always contains more phytoplankton is not always true.
_	The military was operating under the assumption that if the SNM was active in a particular area, local residents must be supporters of the rebels.
_	Moreover, Precobs´ predictions base on the assumption that crimes which were committed incidentally do not possess a relevant probability of a near repeat.
_	When António Francisco Rosa took over the work in 1818, the project progressed at a slightly accelerated pace, on the assumption that the Royal Family would return.
_	In a stationary economy it is likely to resemble the blue curve in the diagram, with a step shape arising from the assumption that opportunities to invest with yields greater than "r̂"  have been largely exhausted while there is untapped scope to invest with a lower return.
_	An inter-generational contract is a dependency between different generations based on the assumption that future generations, in honoring the "contract", will provide a service to a generation that has previously done the same service to an older generation.
_	According to Mark Chaves, decades of anthropological, sociological, and psychological research have established that "religious congruence" (the assumption that religious beliefs and values are tightly integrated in an individual's mind or that religious practices and behaviors follow directly from religious beliefs or that religious beliefs are chronologically linear and stable across different contexts) is actually rare.
_	A 2014 study revealed that judges subconsciously utilize the assumption that minorities are more likely to recidivate to issue a longer sentencing that will prevent the defendants from reengaging in criminal offenses.
_	Behind this seeming insanity clearly lay the assumption that China would support the KR militarily in such a conflict.
_	He wrote that the conclusions of the SPR about "Blavatsky's "phenomena" make superfluous the assumption that, in addition to the tricks, she could to demonstrate for the benefit of the theosophy some really exceptional psychic abilities."
_	Gregory Woods, author of "We're Here, We're Queer and We're not Going Catalogue Shopping," stated that in companies often do not market men's underwear to straight men on the assumption that they are not interested in buying underwear for themselves; therefore many such advertisements are catered to women, as well as gay men, to convince them to buy underwear for their husbands.
_	He has a cosmological ratio of 300 atoms per million atoms of He (at. ppm), leading to the assumption that the original ratio of these primordial gases in the mantle was around 200-300 ppm when Earth was formed.
_	To prove that this condition is sufficient to guarantee existence of a compatible second-order tensor field, we start with the assumption that a field formula_34 exists such that
_	There was also the dissecting of his works and the assumption that he contradicted himself in his view of what consciousness was and its function.
_	It means modern science limits its hypothesizing about non-physical things to the assumption that there are regularities to the ways of all things which do not change.
_	The leader of the pirate group was lured onto the USS Braindridge under the assumption that his group's leaders were aboard the ship and negotiations were going to be held.
_	Preemptive defense is the assumption that anything approaching the nest is a threat.
_	These systems faced initial skepticism, based on the assumption that applications do not have significant parallelism, because of Amdahl's law, but the success of early systems such as nCUBE and the fast progress in microprocessor performance following Moore's law led to a fast replacement.
_	Full decryption of an RSA ciphertext is thought to be infeasible on the assumption that both of these problems are hard, i.e., no efficient algorithm exists for solving them.
_	Unlike the RTR versions of the Savage, the SS version was supplied without radio gear based on the assumption that drivers already had advanced radio systems perfect for the Savage SS.
_	The glaring deficiencies in the Conformity Act, especially the assumption that a federal court would always sit in a U.S. state, caused severe problems in extraterritorial federal courts such as the United States Court for China.
_	This protocol allows two parties to generate a key only known to them, under the assumption that a certain mathematical problem (e.g., the Diffie–Hellman problem in their proposal) is computationally infeasible (i.e., very very hard) to solve, and that the two parties have access to an authentic channel.
_	The law was written under the assumption that, by the time it came into force, the upper house would have become an indirectly-elected body representing regions, with greatly reduced powers, thus making a reform of its electoral system unnecessary.
_	All studies are consistent with the assumption that promoter escape reduces the lifetime of the sigma-core interaction from very long at initiation (too long to be measured in a typical biochemical experiment) to a shorter, measurable lifetime upon transition to elongation.
_	Police are investigating under the assumption that it was a personal quarrel between the assailant and the dead woman.
_	The theory is founded on the assumption that people do not have elaborate knowledge about political matters and do not take into account all of what they do know when making political decisions — they must consider what more readily comes to mind.
_	Current security proofs work on the assumption that there is a hard limit of the aggregation tree size, possibly enforced by the subtree length restriction.
_	According to an article published in "The Economist", the work of Cavalli-Sforza "challenges the assumption that there are significant genetic differences between human races, and indeed, the idea that 'race' has any useful biological meaning at all".
_	This appears to be in contradiction to the assumption that Weaver was coordinating the efforts to develop Skynet to eradicate humanity.
_	In response to such criticism, evolutionary psychologists often caution against committing the naturalistic fallacy – the assumption that "what is natural" is necessarily a moral good.
_	However, these profits are based on the assumption that the unpaid water charges billed to PAM Jaya will be fully paid to the operators.
_	This problem is "easier" to solve than integer factorization, so the assumption that this problem is hard to solve is "stronger" than the assumption that integer factorization is hard.
_	"The imperial gaze reflects the assumption that the white western subject is central much as the male gaze assumes the centrality of the male subject."
_	The idea of the world stopping rotating was taken up in 1972 by Lester del Rey, who suggested to three SF writers to write stories based on the assumption that God does it in order to unequivocally prove
_	The three stories share the assumption that - the miracle in this case issuing directly from God in person, rather than from Wells' fumbling human protagonist - care was taken to prevent the disastrous results evident in the original Wells story.
_	Though through the features of the inner chambers views could be expressed under the assumption that it is a "‘tempita vihara’", the uniqueness of the construction has been lost in the process.
_	(e) "Indicated partisan breakdown numbers are from the Party Identification by State figures for 2014 from Gallup polling (note: Gallup figures have been rounded to two significant figures on the assumption that figures from polling are less accurate than registration-by-party figures)."
_	Working from the assumption that only a light UN presence would be at the reservoir, the Chinese 9th Corps Army was first to destroy the UN garrisons at Yudami-ni and Sinhung-ni, then push towards Hagaru-ri.
_	When Nanako is chosen as a Sorority member, one of the reasons she was questioned the most for was the assumption that her mother was a homewrecker, which was obviously false.
_	It is based on the assumption that all external flows occur at the half-way point in time within the evaluation period (or are spread evenly across the period, and so the flows occur on average at the middle of the period).
_	Attempts have been made both by J. Gothofredus and Heineccius to restore the law, on the assumption that its provisions are reducible to the two general heads of a Lex Maritalis and Lex Caducaria.
_	with the assumption that: formula_32
_	The contract is guaranteed by the insurer for life on the assumption that those living longest will receive the cross-subsidy of those who die earlier.
_	"Critical distance", the assumption that culture can be positioned outside "the massive Being of capital" upon which left-wing theories of cultural politics are dependent, has become outmoded.
_	Elo is a statistical system based on the assumption that the chess performance of each player in his or her games is a random variable.
_	Assuming even just the lower estimate of £13 trillion on deposit in offshore accounts, if these assets earned an average 3% a year in income for their owners taxable at 30%, then the offshore funds would generate £121 billion in tax revenues, on the assumption that no tax is paid (i.e. no one pays any tax on offshore holdings), and that 100% of those deposits would otherwise have been liable to tax.
_	In 1968, Pierre Mulele, Lumumba's Minister of Education and a rebel leader during the 1964 Simba Rebellion, was lured out of exile in Brazzaville on the assumption that he would be amnestied, but was tortured and killed by Mobutu's forces.
_	Some of them, mainly influenced by form criticism, have tried to reconstruct the original background and meaning of the riddle and of other components in the story, under the assumption that story in its current form is the product of a combination of originally independent traditions; These scholars proposed diverse answers to the riddle, not necessarily related to the answer proposed in the biblical text.
_	This research was based on the assumption that while therapeutic processes will be case-specific, there are also some common and lawful principles that govern how psychotherapy works, or fail to work.
_	Howat cautions against the assumption that Debussy's Ballade (1891) and Nocturne (1892) are influenced by Chopin – in Howat's view they owe more to Debussy's early Russian models – but Chopin's influence is found in other early works such as the Deux arabesques (1889–1891).
_	Starting from the assumption that ‘if the diameter of a circle be unity or one, the circumference of that circle will be 3.0625,’ the writer deduces some fourteen problems relative to circles.
_	In mathematical logic, Rosser's trick is a method for proving Gödel's incompleteness theorems without the assumption that the theory being considered is ω-consistent (Smorynski 1977, p. 840; Mendelson 1977, p. 160).
_	The obvious injustice to Lilith— who seems to have asked no more than her fair half, while Adam was the encroacher, on the assumption that they were created equal —inspired Collier's version of the legend, according to which Lilith leaves Eden voluntarily, rather than submit to dominance, but loses thereby the blessing of motherhood.
_	Perhaps Coleridge-Taylor changed the name of his heroine (and might have changed the name of the opera, had it been produced) to avoid creating the assumption that his work was a treatment of Corelli's then very popular novel.
_	As illustrated below, many of the more modern mass media manipulation methods are types of distraction, on the assumption that the public has a limited attention span.
_	Based on its investigation, NIST reiterated several recommendations it had made in its earlier report on the collapse of the twin towers, and urged immediate action on a further recommendation: that fire resistance should be evaluated under the assumption that sprinklers are unavailable; and that the effects of thermal expansion on floor support systems be considered.
_	When the group is a topological group, it is possible to weaken the assumption that the number of left and right cosets in each double coset is finite.
_	In contrast to the Landau paradigm based on the assumption that the effective mass is constant, in the FCQPT theory the effective mass of new quasiparticles strongly depends on T, "x", B etc.
_	Under the assumption that the population error term has a constant variance, the estimate of that variance is given by:
_	A more complex analysis published in the Journal of Physics A modeled heterogeneous levels of sexism by assuming each person to make sexist remarks according to an independent Poisson process, maintaining the assumption that each sexist remarks is directed to an individual of the opposite sex.
_	The units were moving with insufficient security, on the assumption that the line of retreat was safe; at the same time the Germans captured Polish orders with details of their planned withdrawal routes.
_	Mussolini was aware that Italy did not have the military capacity to carry out a long war with France or the United Kingdom and waited until France was on the verge of imminent collapse and surrender from German invasion before declaring war on France and the United Kingdom on 10 June 1940 on the assumption that the war would be short-lived following France's collapse.
_	At a conference of his corps commanders (8 July) Monro (GOC First Army) said that the Battle of the Somme was progressing “favourably”, but ordered Haking to prepare a plan on the assumption that he was to be assisted by a division of Second Army and some extra artillery (on the same day 4th Australian Division was ordered south to the Somme but instructed to leave behind its artillery).
_	During the Fourth Crusade, Alexius IV still thought this way, and granted Crete to Boniface of Montferrat, under the assumption that the Crusaders would go away if their leader had some land.
_	The high prices of the "high-quality" tranches reflected the assumption that any defaults would be localized and unrelated, so that it was unlikely that much of the portfolio would default at once.
_	Scott too was working on the assumption that the control of education would be in the hands of the Church of England, which brought vigorous opposition from the Presbyterians, Wesleyans and Roman Catholics.
_	The first type uses an attachment to the eye, such as a special contact lens with an embedded mirror or magnetic field sensor, and the movement of the attachment is measured with the assumption that it does not slip significantly as the eye rotates.
_	Traditional Khmer medicine practitioners in that region claim that medicines made from slow lorises can cure 100 diseases, with some practitioners from the National Centre for Traditional Medicine reporting that slow loris are sometimes roasted alive under the assumption that this increases the medicine's potency.
_	Note also that we have not yet used the assumption that "G" is simply connected.
_	State officials were most likely to view acquiescence as "withdrawal," keeping First Nations girls in the system longer under the assumption that they would not internalize "proper" feminine mores.
_	After a day being gifted free clothing and accessories under the assumption that she has the role her agent calls her with the news that ultimately she didn't get it.
_	The basic flaw was the assumption that there was a unified business policy.
_	In contrast to the original DST the TBM propagates the open-world assumption that relaxes the assumption that all possible outcomes are known.
_	This operating area was nicknamed Gonzo Station by the men on the ships operating there, apparently because of its vicinity to Iran and the assumption that war with Iran was likely.
_	Arab television stations reported Hamas-provided statistics for Israeli casualties on the assumption that Israel is distorting its own figures of soldiers killed and wounded.
_	It is based on the assumption that the reaction rate is controlled by turbulent mixing because of the dependence of reaction rate on the mixing of the turbulent eddies.
_	The Others appear to operate on the assumption that cancer is impossible on the Island ("One of Us").
_	She has queried the assumption that all the activities are directed by North Korea's government.
_	Putin had transferred responsibility for fighting fires to those renting state property and the subjects of the federation, with the assumption that owners or renters would invest in whatever was necessary to prevent forest fires.
_	The 1986 Oxford University Press edition of the "Complete Works" and the subsequent individual edition include a "reconstructed text" of "Pericles", which adapts passages from Wilkins' novel on the assumption that they are based on the play and record the dialogue more accurately than the quarto.
_	Based on the given material it is possible to make the assumption that according to the characteristic of the DD network can be evolutionizing.
_	If they wish to assert their claim to Trans-Jordan and to avoid raising with other Powers the legal status of that area, they can only do so by proceeding upon the assumption that Trans-Jordan forms part of the area covered by the Palestine Mandate.
_	It censured the view that Pakistanis needed to be informed by the U.S. what is "good for them" as fraught with imperialist condescension; or the assumption that the Urdu press was less informed than the English press – because the latter was sometimes less critical of the U.S.
_	In particular he is known for having calculated the values of all the projective ordinals (the suprema of the lengths of all prewellorderings of the reals at a particular level in the projective hierarchy) under the assumption that the axiom of determinacy holds.
_	These behaviors were all built on the assumption that women and blacks were inferior.
_	They established that electron emission occurred by a form of wave-mechanical tunneling, now called Fowler–Nordheim tunneling, and, with the help of the assumption that electrons in metals obeyed Fermi-Dirac statistics, derived an (approximate) emission equation.
_	In "Oroonoko" Behn gives herself the position of narrator and her first biographer accepted the assumption that Behn was the daughter of the lieutenant general of Surinam, as in the story.
_	Hence, cooperation seemed to pose a challenging problem to the theory of natural selection, which rests on the assumption that individuals compete to survive and maximize their reproductive successes.
_	However, the assumption that a single large table can capture real database designs is often plagued with a number of difficulties.
_	Some theorists have proposed that workers be allowed to set their own standards, on the assumption that when people establish their own goals, they are more apt to accept and achieve them.
_	The NAES is predicated on the assumption that campaign dynamics matter.
_	The stunt was planned and approved by ABC lawyers under the assumption that the motorcade would be stopped and discovered at the first security checkpoint.
_	He distanced himself from Tony Abbott's social conservatism, saying "I reject the assumption that merit is more located in the brains of men than women" and highlighting the proportion of women in Labor's leadership, with Tanya Plibersek as Deputy Leader and Penny Wong as Senate Opposition Leader.
_	For these draws (or in any cases where the result of a tie in the previous round was not known at the time of the draw), the seeding was carried out under the assumption that the team with the higher coefficient of an undecided tie advanced to this round, which means if the team with the lower coefficient was to advance, it simply took the seeding of its defeated opponent.
_	Some have come to the assumption that the idea of translation itself could be ethically doubtful, while others receive it as a call for considering the relationship between author or text and translator as more interpersonal, thus making it an equal and reciprocal process.
_	This theory makes the assumption that the autocorrelation function of the microscopic fluctuations causing the relaxation is proportional to formula_18, where formula_19 is called the correlation time.
_	This may lead other players to exhaust their higher cards earlier on the assumption that their opponent has almost won.
_	A system can be analysed on the assumption that "W"  is fixed (i.e. that wages are fixed in money terms) or that "W" / "p" is fixed (i.e. that they are fixed in real terms) or that "N"  is fixed (e.g. if wages adapt to ensure full employment).
_	Darwinism was based on the principles of natural selection and variation, Lamarckism was based on the passing down of acquired traits, Orthogenesis was based on the assumption that tendency towards perfection steers evolution, and Saltationism argued that discontinuous variation creates new species.
_	His insertion method, often referred to as "pure insertion", was based on the assumption that inserting a particular complicating requirement into an RT paradigm would not affect the other components of the test.
_	It is on the assumption that he was in his teens on admission that his birth date is estimated; some scholars suspect he may have been ten years or more older; many monks only entered monastic life after pursuing a career in the world outside.
_	Besides the advantages offered by such a plan, in setting immediately before the eyes of the student the final results of the investigation in a more concrete form, and thereby rendering easier his insight into the nature of particular Indo-European languages, there is, I think, another of no less importance gained by it, namely that it shows the baselessness of the assumption that the non-Indian Indo-European languages were derived from Old-Indian (Sanskrit).
_	The Oatman girls lived with the Yavapi until they were traded to the Mojave with whom they lived with until Mary Ann's death and Olive's subsequent rescue on February 22, 1856, Under the assumption that her entire family was deceased and that rescue proved impossible, Olive assimilated to Mojave culture and acquired chin and arm tattoos as a means for identifying herself in the afterlife.
_	His parents' generation had emphasized prioritizing English on the assumption that Fijian could be learned later, but this had resulted in a generation knowing little Fijian, and unless the language was made compulsory at all levels of primary education, it would be lost to the next generation, he said.
_	For instance, very small children may not be held to bargains they have made, on the assumption that they lack the maturity to understand what they are doing; errant employees or directors may be prevented from contracting for their company, because they have acted "ultra vires" (beyond their power).
_	The "born secret" policy was created under the assumption that nuclear information could be so important to national security that it would need classification before it could be formally evaluated.
_	They decide to go to Ireland on the assumption that redheads are well treated there.
_	In their work, ICOR is based on the assumption that socialism in the Soviet Union was destroyed in 1956 and the country was transformed from within into a capitalist system by a "new class of bureaucrats" which had taken over the power.
_	He paid huge advances on the assumption that it only needed spectacular salesmanship to achieve an even vaster readership.
_	However, the comic series has had Dib addressed as "Dib Membrane" multiple times, with the first being in a pre-Issue 0 and in an official Issue 5, leading to the assumption that Jhonen had changed his mind on this idea.
_	All other conditions at the lower boundary follow from the assumption that the –Obukhov similarity theory is valid.
_	Furthermore, I question the assumption that smooth jazz is an unfortunate and unwelcomed evolutionary outcome of the jazz-fusion era.
_	It relies on the assumption that construction standards such as concrete and fire-resistant doors will allow firefighters to contain a fire within one flat.
_	Beginning with the assumption that the current mean size of the human neocortex had developed about 250,000 years ago, during the Pleistocene, Dunbar searched the anthropological and ethnographical literature for census-like group size information for various hunter–gatherer societies, the closest existing approximations to how anthropology reconstructs the Pleistocene societies.
_	There is much evidence that lends basis to the assumption that the Diar Rabia itself was the cradle of their nascency, later spreading to other parts of the Caliphate territories The Kurds' acceptance of the assertion that they derive from Arab origin should come as no surprise, in light of the consideration that the claim would have ensured Kurdish princes converting to Islam reverence and prestige in some circles and accordingly, the extension of their sphere of influence.
_	Obviously, there are an infinite number of solutions to the above expression; consequently, the assumption that formula_36 is a lower triangular matrix is made such that only one solution exists.
_	Phil Hardy is equally unimpressed with "Doctor Blood's Coffin", calling it 'a crude shocker ... with an inane plot' and noting that it 'simply piles up shots of bloody surgery and decayed flesh on the assumption that vivisection or a heart transplant performed in a disused Cornish tin-mine is sufficient to tap into audiences' unconscious fears or taboo fantasies'.
_	Many suggested interpretations are based on the assumption that the word is a derivative of Hebrew verbal root () "fall".
_	It makes no sense mathematically to talk of formula_13 (i.e. of formula_14) except on the assumption that "W"  is a function of the independent variables; and it makes no sense economically to regard the wage rate as a function of the variables representing a single industry.
_	Haldane calculated, using a simple general selection model, the selective advantage necessary for the recorded natural evolution of peppered moths, based on the assumption that in 1848 the frequency of dark-coloured moths was 2%, and by 1895 it was 95%.
_	Under the assumption that little or nothing is known "a priori" about the relative plausibilities of the outcomes, Laplace derived a formula for the probability that the next trial will be a success.
_	These often include the assumption that associations involve a network of connections between “nodes” that represent stimuli, responses, and perhaps one or more “hidden” layers of intermediate interconnections.
_	She argued that there are a disproportionate number of women who are nurses, and that denying admission to men "lends credibility to the old view that women, not men, should become nurses, and makes the assumption that nursing is a field for women a self-fulfilling prophecy."
_	The connection is based on the assumption that the village Taor which is located near Skopje is Tauresium, Justinian I's birthplace, and by the description of Justininiana Prima by Procopius that suits Skopje's fortress (Kale), the Old Bazaar and the aqueduct which are still landmarks of Skopje.
_	Group selection, if it occurs, acts on groups of organisms, on the assumption that groups replicate and mutate in an analogous way to genes and individuals.
_	On the assumption that the primary goal of employers is to maximise profits in the interests of shareholders, codetermination can reorient the company's goals in the interests of workers.
_	instead defines a cube tiling to be any tiling of space by congruent hypercubes, and states without proof that the assumption that cubes are axis-parallel can be added without loss of generality.
_	As theologian John Barton explains, some Christians read the Bible with the assumption that "Scripture is "self-consistent"", and that if there appear to be contradictions between two texts, they believe that "more careful reading is required to show that they really cohere".
_	Most textual-critical scholars would explain the corollary by the assumption that scribes tended to "correct" harder readings and so cut off the stream of transmission.
_	This contradicts the assumption that "c" is an accumulation point of {"f = g"}.
_	Then, journalist David Wolman, in a "Wired" magazine piece, described as "moronic" the assumption that the web "hurts us more than it helps", a statement that was preceded by an overview of the many technologies that had been historically denounced; Wolman concluded that the solution was "better schools as well as a renewed commitment to reason and scientific rigor so that people can distinguish knowledge from garbage".
_	This requires that the tenement must be valued on the assumption that at the relevant date,
_	Empirical studies by Amos Tversky questioned the assumption that investors are rational.
_	The observation that hemispherical two-layer gold clusters with a diameter of a few nanometers are most active for CO oxidation is well in line with the assumption that edge and corner atoms serve as the active sites, since for clusters of this shape and size the ratio of edge atoms to the total number of atoms is indeed maximized.
_	Most of these models were still under the assumption that the bombs would be powered by slow neutron reactions—and thus be similar to a reactor undergoing a meltdown.
_	These groups, along with others such as the Oneota, were once classified as Upper Mississippian cultures under the assumption that they were either Mississippian peoples intruding into these areas or they were heavily influenced by the Mississippian peoples to their south and east.
_	Axiom 1 can be interpreted as the assumption that Ω is an exhaustive description of future states of the world, because it means that no belief weight is given to elements outside Ω.
_	An ideal gas is a simplified "real gas" with the assumption that the compressibility factor "Z" is set to 1 meaning that this pneumatic ratio remains constant.
_	One of the amputated testicles is punctured with a knife so as to permit the insertion of a rope; the rope is then fastened to the new gelding's tail with the assumption that once the testicle has dried, the wound will have finished healing.
_	They explained that Zimmerman disliked the conventional spring training regimen, seeing himself a needing only 50 at-bats to prepare himself for the regular season, and that he had proposed to manager Dave Martinez early in the 2018 edition of spring training that he restrict himself to the back fields and prepare for the regular season at his own pace to ensure that he would be in the best possible health when the season began, and Martinez had approved of the plan under the assumption that, as a veteran, Zimmerman could be trusted to prepare in a way that was best for him.
_	Furthermore, while Holland suggests that people can be "categorized as one of six types," he also argues that "a six-category scheme built on the assumption that there are only six kinds of people in the world is unacceptable on the strength of common sense alone.
_	Region-growing methods rely mainly on the assumption that the neighboring pixels within one region have similar values.
_	But Nicole, his girlfriend, fearing for Dédé's life, deliberately turns him in to the police, who arrest him, on the assumption that he's safer in jail than on the streets.
_	The proposition "Pegasus likes licorice", for example, is often interpreted as having no truth-value given the assumption that the name "Pegasus" fails to refer.
_	In fact, to show that "p" is not provable only requires the assumption that the system is consistent.
_	If they wish to assert their claim to Trans-Jordan and to avoid raising with other Powers the legal status of that area, they can only do so by proceeding upon the assumption that Trans-Jordan forms part of the area covered by the Palestine Mandate.
_	Another limitation of MHD (and fluid theories in general) is that they depend on the assumption that the plasma is strongly collisional (this is the first criterion listed above), so that the time scale of collisions is shorter than the other characteristic times in the system, and the particle distributions are Maxwellian.
_	In fact, we have no evidence to support the assumption that Thutmose hated or resented Hatshepsut during her lifetime.
_	O'Connor's plan was built on the assumption that land could be bought in unlimited quantities and at reasonable rates, and that all subscribers would be successful farmers who would repay promptly.
_	Others charged that PD 59 made it more likely that the United States would initiate a nuclear conflict, based on the assumption that a nuclear war could somehow be limited.
_	Using a similar line of argument, Langley and Hungate (2003) argued that the abundance of chitin in ectomycorrhizal tissues may reduce decomposition rates of these fungi, under the assumption that chitin is recalcitrant.
_	If "s" are the partial sums of the series, then the assumption that the series
_	"Certain African traditions (Frobenius: Erythraa) lead to the assumption that the emphasizing of one or another of the inherent tendencies of the ritual was influenced by the character of the slain king, who in one case may have been feared and in another wanted back again."
_	While it is common to refer to pareto as "80/20" rule, under the assumption that, in all situations, 20% of causes determine 80% of problems, this ratio is merely a convenient rule of thumb and is not nor should it be considered an immutable law of nature.
_	The Kepler team analyzed their characteristics under the assumption that Kepler-14 was a single star.
_	When transmitted directly through the Internet, the colors are typically pre-converted to 8-bit RGB channels for additional storage savings with the assumption that it will only be viewed only on a (sRGB) computer screen.
_	If the assumption that the particles in an ideal gas are indistinguishable is not appropriately taken into account, the calculated entropy is not an extensive variable as it should be.
_	Many Glaswegians purchased the paper under the assumption that the story referred to the popular Celtic player, rather than the far-removed foreign politician.
_	This method requires the assumption that in the past species and their habitat were in equilibrium, which is often unknown.
_	In addition, isometric scaling is based on the assumption that body proportions remain the same, which is not necessarily the case.
_	It has been derived here from the assumption that the inclusions are spherical and it can be modified for shapes with other depolarization factors; leading to Eq. (2).
_	The earliest source stating 25 December as the date of birth of Jesus is likely by Hippolytus of Rome, written very early in the 3rd century, based on the assumption that the conception of Jesus took place at the Spring equinox which he placed on 25 March, and then added nine months – festivals on that date were then celebrated.
_	John Chrysostom also argued for a 25 December date in the late 4th century, basing his argument on the assumption that the offering of incense in Luke 1:8–11 was the offering of incense by a high priest on Yom Kippur (early October), and, as above, counting fifteen months forward.
_	The level to which one may preempt, bid competitively or ultimately sacrifice is heavily influenced by the vulnerability status of each side and the assumption that the defending side will double the contract.
_	Today the mammals are primarily trained to force the diver to the surface using pushing techniques in the assumption that the majority of incursions can be addressed in this manner.
_	CAVEAT: The following word-reconstructions are based on the assumption that the Albanian language is descended from Daco-Moesian.
_	In some cases, plans are made with the assumption that ecosystems within a forest are holding a steady state, separate from the forest that surrounds them.
_	These models rely on the assumption that asset price fluctuations are the result of a well-behaved random or stochastic process.
_	A phenomenon, referred to as the hostile media effect, demonstrates that partisans can view neutral events subjectively according to their own needs and values, and make the assumption that those who interpret the event differently are biased.
_	This allowed the phase transition point in the two-dimensional model to be determined exactly (under the assumption that there is a unique critical point).
_	Chrysler Corporation approved the development of the model on the assumption that Chrysler Europe would sell 60,000 C9 models per year, which translated into a projected 5 percent share of the executive car market.
_	This rests on the assumption that strong
_	First, the calculation is based on the assumption that minerals will continue to be discovered using exactly the same procedures.
_	Under the decentralization plan, regulatory responsibilities were transferred from the central government to mayors and other municipal officials on the assumption that local officials would provide better oversight.
_	If the field formula_8 is not algebraically closed, then the first condition is replaced by the assumption that
_	So the assumption that "ℓ" is not ordinary cannot be true, QED.
_	The previously known "P. micrantha" was listed by the IUCN Red List of Threatened Species as Vulnerable, but that was under the assumption that all three Azorean butterfly orchids comprised a single species.
_	A comprehensive review into the relationship between fibromyalgia and major depressive disorder (MDD) found substantial similarities in neuroendocrine abnormalities, psychological characteristics, physical symptoms and treatments between fibromyalgia and MDD, but currently available findings do not support the assumption that MDD and fibromyalgia refer to the same underlying construct or can be seen as subsidiaries of one disease concept.
_	Having demonstrated that hemoglobin contained four hemes (and therefore binding sites for oxygen), he worked from the assumption that fully saturated hemoglobin is formed in stages, with intermediate forms with one, two, or three bound oxygen molecules.
_	Similar to the sociology of emotions or anthropology of emotions, the history of emotions is based on the assumption that not only the expression of feelings, but also the feelings themselves are learned.
_	Classic democratic theory focused on the assumption that calls on “public policymakers to advance the interests of civically engaged constituents, by an autonomous press” (i.e. classic theory focuses on the policy makers and media) however, it failed to account for points at which larger society of stakeholders could define the range of alternatives available for policy making.
_	Sarrasine is an artist who, functioning under the assumption that all beauty is feminine, regards Zambinella as the epitome of beauty, and therefore as the paradigm of femininity.
_	In the same essay Duncan Black Macdonald (1911) is credited with the opinion that "fruitful investigation of the Prophet's life (should) proceed upon the assumption that he was fundamentally a pathological case."
_	However, this relies on the assumption that a workload can scale up and down across multiple nodes dynamically based on aggregate demand.
_	In the non-propositional case, the completion needs to be augmented with equality axioms, to formalise the assumption that individuals with distinct names are distinct.
_	We ought to have the assumption that everybody here is legal, that nobody here is illegal."
_	While these two methodologies did help to eliminate some of the possible biases of the original studies, they still operated under the assumption that there is a causal link between the emotional experience and the development of the process of social sharing.
_	In the early 21st century, however, the assumption that the various families of squat lobster were closely related began to be questioned.
_	Okishio [1961] establishes this theorem under the assumption that the real wage remains constant.
_	Treasury bond at 2½ percent due on March 15 of 1952 or 1954, with the assumption that 1952 was an option year.
_	As an aside, note that we are building in the equivalence principle from the start, including the assumption that a charged particle falls equally as fast as a neutral particle.
_	This coupled with further evidence (Schimek et al., 2003) has led to the assumption that trisporiods are not strictly species specific and that trisporiods represent the general principle of mating recognition in Mucorales.
_	The screenplay was revised by Kazuki Ōmori after the release of "Godzilla vs. Biollante", though the project was ultimately scrapped by Toho, under the assumption that Mothra was a character born purely out of Japanese culture, and thus would have been difficult to market overseas unlike the more internationally recognized Godzilla.
_	Many times, Roman coins and bricks from Roman times have been found, leading to the assumption that there might be a villa rustica hidden in the ground near the Anishügel.
_	Their method does not make the assumption that amplitudes and position errors are independent or jointly Gaussian, as others do.
_	For example, the assumption that two linear (or non-linear) statistics are identically distributed (or independent, or have a constancy regression and so on) can be used to characterize various populations.
_	After abseiling down, the advance party decide not to wait for their own safety and on the assumption that the rear party will not be able to abseil down.
_	Then, based on the assumption that Sanskrit was the oldest Indo-European language, and the (now known to be untenable) position that Irish Éire was etymologically related to "Aryan", in 1837 Adolphe Pictet popularized the idea that the term "Aryan" could also be applied to the entire Indo-European language family as well.
_	Zeno's mistake is in the assumption that the sum of an infinite number of finite steps cannot be finite.
_	However, Sun-young's boss discards the new playlist on the assumption that Sun-young herself submitted it.
_	The elements (in the numerals "twenty" to "ninety") and (in "hundred") are reconstructed on the assumption that these numerals are derivatives of "*deḱm̥(t)" "ten".
_	Two years later, a similar study was conducted in the province of Kirkuk with findings of 38% FGM prevalence giving evidence to the assumption that FGM was not only practiced by the Kurdish population but also existed in central Iraq.
_	Although Stock began appearing with AAA under the assumption that she would be wrestling, the company had her start out by holding up signs for the crowd at events.
_	Neal Zaslaw printed a reconstruction of this "orchestral draft", stating that the draft contained internal inconsistencies and errors and that the reconstruction was based on the assumption that Mozart was hearing the piece in G minor and B major, but could not write it correctly as he had not yet learned some necessary aspects of musical notation, such as double sharps.
_	This was spurred by the invention of chronophotography and the assumption that this new technology would be able to change the habits of human and animal locomotion from a more aesthetic and "conventional" (incorrect) locomotion to a more natural one.
_	A journalist who traveled frequently, he changed his name to overcome discrimination that he encountered on the assumption that he was a Jew.
_	On October 14, 2011, Limbaugh questioned the U.S. military initiative against Joseph Kony and his Lord's Resistance Army (LRA), based on the assumption that they were Christians.
_	Simon notes, "Most biomedical and clinical research has been based on the assumption that the male can serve as representative of the species."
_	Among the most popular is the assumption that a fort was present here on the shore of the Ottawa River to keep provisions at the portage.
_	For example, if a tax cut is scheduled to expire, the assumption that it will expire as scheduled will appear in the current law baseline.
_	According to philosopher Paavo Pylkkänen, Bohm's suggestion "leads naturally to the assumption that the physical correlate of the logical thinking process is at the classically describable level of the brain, while the basic thinking process is at the quantum-theoretically describable level."
_	Legislatures in limiting freedom of contract between employee and employer by a minimum wage proceed on the assumption that employees, in the class receiving least pay, are not upon a full level of equality of choice with their employer and in their necessitous circumstances are prone to accept pretty much anything that is offered.
_	Since it is conjectured that NP-complete problems do not have quasi-polynomial time algorithms, some inapproximability results in the field of approximation algorithms make the assumption that NP-complete problems do not have quasi-polynomial time algorithms.
_	Since we know that there cannot be such an algorithm, it follows that the assumption that there is a consistent and complete axiomatization of all true first-order logic statements about natural numbers must be false.
_	The assumption that there exists a standard model of ZFC (in a given universe) is stronger than the assumption that there exists a model.
_	These phases are explained by the assumption that the western edge of Baltica collided with an island arc or microcontinent.
_	When Qualchin, toward the end of the Yakima War, was captured and hanged by Col. George Wright, it was under the assumption that he was the murderer of Bolon.
_	Most of the areas classified as cultivable are so considered on the assumption that farmers will practice conservation measures, but many do not.
_	On the assumption that this Gaius Fannius was not the historian who fought in the Third Punic War, in 146 BC he was a member of Quintus Caecilius Metellus Macedonicus’s staff in Macedonia, who sent him as part of an embassy to the Achaean League to convince them not to enter the war against Rome.
_	"For example, women continue to be blamed if they are raped because of how they are dressed, the assumption that women purportedly lie about being raped remains popular, and certain women, such as married women or women of colour, are still considered 'unrapeable'”.
_	Behavioral portfolio theory (BPT), put forth in 2000 by Shefrin and Statman, provides an alternative to the assumption that the ultimate motivation for investors is the maximization of the value of their portfolios.
_	A few days later, "A" texts Rhiannon, asking that she meet "A" alone, and she does, under the assumption that she is meeting Nathan.
_	The procedure depends on the assumption that languages change, in the absence of widespread literacy, at a constant rate.
_	There was an attempt to increase his bail to 8 million usd, on the assumption that anything less would be "virtual pocket change" to the wealthy Saudi.
_	Giving the designer ownership is claimed to improve the productivity of the employee and quality of the product, based on the assumption that people who are given a sense of gratification and ownership over their work tend to work harder and design a more robust product, as opposed to an employee that is assigned a task with little say in the general process.
_	The very premise of the study was based on the assumption that African Americans would not seek treatment for syphilis and that the disease affected them differently than other races.
_	On the assumption that the demographic transition is now spreading from the developed countries to less developed countries, the United Nations Population Fund estimates that human population may peak in the late 21st century rather than continue to grow until it has exhausted available resources.
_	There follows from this stance the assumption that environmental events (stimuli) cause behavioral actions (responses).
_	Its presence can be accounted for by the assumption that they are shorthand for a longer phrase in which the name is a specifier, i.e. "the Amazon River", "the Hebridean Islands".
_	Implicit in the terminology is the assumption that the "mill" has low standards (or no standards) for such accreditation.
_	An argument from silence () is an argument based on the assumption that someone's silence on a matter suggests (an informal fallacy) that person's ignorance of the matter.
_	The concern is that, within the dialectic of Right Realism and Left Realism, a focus on the victim promotes rights selectively for certain victims, and advocates the assumption that some victim rights are more important than competing rights or values in society.
_	But this consequence follows only upon the assumption that the work of the mind is arbitrary, an assumption shown to be unjustified by the results of exact science, with the distinction, universally recognised, which such science draws between truth and falsehood, between the real and "mere ideas."
_	On 6 September 2006, "The Sun" reported that Blair would announce a timetable on 31 May 2007, with his replacement to take office by the end of July, and on 21 April The Guardian reported that the Brown camp were working on the assumption that Blair would announce the candidacy open on 9 May 2007, the day after power-sharing was due to start in Northern Ireland, following which the new Labour leader would be elected on 15 July 2007.
_	Co-founder Mike Bardi challenges the assumption that social therapy is strictly group therapy.
_	Sexual dimorphism, in most works, is measured on the assumption that a random variable is being taken into account.
_	The fact that (5) implies (4) requires the assumption that "G" is σ-compact (and locally compact) (Bekka et al., Theorem 2.12.4).
_	Without the assumption that the Lie algebra is finite dimensional the result can be false.
_	In finance, mean reversion is the assumption that a stock's price will tend to move to the average price over time.
_	Albo rejects the assumption that "creation ex nihilo" is an essential implication of the belief in God.
_	But the bill's sponsor, Marco Sommerville — operating on the assumption that everyone who worked for the city was familiar with the man — scrawled out a quick Post-It Note to the street department requesting signs for the new "V Odom" Boulevard.
_	Both sides could have agreed that the entire game would air only on Versus or begin earlier in the day, but the NHL wanted at least one Eastern Conference Finals game to air on NBC, and said that it does "not" schedule with the assumption that games will go into overtime.
_	The delta method is often used in a form that is essentially identical to that above, but without the assumption that or "B" is asymptotically normal.
_	The letter stated "... machine learning algorithms, when applied to text, rely on the assumption that any language includes an infinite number of possible expressions.
_	Historical attempts to define these languages were often made under the assumption that languages do not generally evolve beyond regional dialects, and at the time of Jubainville's work, the concept of the Indo-European language family was loosely defined and most of the significant work on the subject did not occur until the following century, at which time it became quite clear that the Celtic languages were distinctly Indo-European, and that the hypothesized Ligurian language was clearly derivative of that family of languages.
_	A particular gene or DNA region is then selected as a target for analysis, under the assumption that each microbe species will have a different gene variant (also called a "phylotype").
_	Note that the assumption the v is relatively large is equivalently to the assumption that the thermal diffusivity formula_3 is small compared to formula_16, where L is the ocean width (from mid-ocean ridges to continental shelf) and T is its age.
_	When the Yonge subway was being constructed in the early 1950s, the shell of an east-west station for the Queen line, sometimes called Lower Queen, was built under its Queen station, and passenger flows within the station were laid out on the assumption that it would eventually be an interchange.
_	For reduced homology there is also a Mayer–Vietoris sequence, under the assumption that "A" and "B" have non-empty intersection.
_	An inference based on the assumption that REM sleep is dreaming.
_	Leading Saleh and Afghan intelligence to that conclusion were "thousands of interrogation reports" and the assumption that Bin Laden "a millionaire with multiple wives and no background of toughness would not be living in a tent".
_	This was calculated as the difference from 100% of microprobe results, with the assumption that large quantities of material usually contain some impurities, and the possible oxidation of Fe under heating.
_	While most definitions of diversification in developing countries do work on the assumption that diversification primarily involves a substitution of one crop or other agricultural product for another, or an increase in the number of enterprises, or activities, carried out by a particular farm, the definition used in developed countries sometimes relates more to the development of activities on the farm that do not involve agricultural production.
_	On the assumption that Krieger is still posing as an English officer, but now in France somewhere near the front lines, Luke and Joe are sent to an important transit camp for British troops near the coastal resort of Le Touquet in northern France to continue their pursuit.
_	Unenlightened beings cling to the body, under the assumption that it represents a Self, whereas in reality the body is an impermanent phenomenon formed from the mahābhūta.
_	This effect was pronounced in men, whose satisfaction was especially related to the perception that one's own relationship was superior as well as to the assumption that few others were unhappy in their relationships.
_	On the other hand, women's satisfaction was particularly related to the assumption that most people were happy with their relationship.
_	Muneshige surrendered under the assumption that he could then switch sides and aid the Tokugawa-loyal forces against the Shimazu clan of Satsuma, but Ieyasu forbade this plan from going through.
_	In a document issued to Piotr Winiarczyk, the writer used the phrase ""qui de nocte consurgens"", which supports the assumption that the clerk was asleep and was completely surprised by the arrival of the prince.
_	The name of the theory comes from two central premises; the assumption that people have "control" over their mental content, and the belief that patients who come to therapy are fundamentally motivated to "master" their lives.
_	One study prepared by a joint committee of the Defense Dept., State Dept. and CIA at the direction of President Eisenhower developed possible limited war contingencies in defense of the Offshore [Taiwanese] Islands, but quickly arrived at a consensus assessment: "…the Joint Chiefs, in particular Air Force General Nathan Twining, Chairman of the Joint Chiefs, felt that the use of atomic weapons was inevitable and the planning proceeded on that assumption" and "the study proceeded on the assumption that a Chinese Communist move against the Offshore Islands would involve aerial as well as artillery interdiction followed by American atomic attacks on mainland airfields".
_	Appealing to the "formulaic" nature of oral poetry, especially in tricky and demanding literary forms like sacred Vedic versification, he reasoned that this was direct evidence for the previous existence of an alternant , on the assumption that when (for whatever reason) this *"śras" and other forms like it came to be shunned, the typical collocations in which they would have (correctly) occurred inevitably became obsolete pari passu with the loss of the form itself.
_	Marine mammals, especially seals, are known to feed on other species of skate, so the assumption that New Zealand marine mammals would do the same is not unrealistic.
_	In quantum chemistry and molecular physics, the Born–Oppenheimer (BO) approximation is the assumption that the motion of atomic nuclei and electrons in a molecule can be separated.
_	Cassileth also said, her study group "hypothesized that survival time would not differ between the two groups on the basis of the assumption that the unproved remedy would be no more effective with end-stage disease than conventional care, itself largely ineffective".
_	In previous research, the assumption that talk was subvocal (existing only intrapersonally) was prevalent, without concern for the impact of vocal talk with other individuals.
_	The implementation of CompStat gave precinct commanders more power, based on the assumption that local authorities best knew their neighborhoods and thus could best determine what tactics to use to reduce crime.
_	The basis of this design is the assumption that there will always be overshoot when trying to find the zero crossing at the end of a run-down interval.
_	By contrasting these cognitive portraits with those of entrepreneurs, Monroe used altruism as an analytical tool to reveal significant limitations in political theories predicated on the assumption that human nature is innately self-interested.
_	In 1872, Bernard Lariviere took unlicensed barrels of whiskey to the Indian village of Crookston, Minnesota, to trade with Native Americans under the assumption that the land belonged to the Chippewa tribe and was thus outside of the United States' jurisdiction, and the federal government seized the barrels under the 1834 Nonintercourse Act.
_	Such practice, which involved the assumption that any individual appearing in the designated zones was an enemy combatant that could be freely targeted by weapons, is regarded by journalist Lewis M. Simons as "a severe violation of the laws of war".
_	When Jordan saw the size of the raiding forces entering the battle it was led to the assumption that Israel had another goal of capturing Balqa Governorate to create a Golan Heights similar situation.
_	Curiously, and individually to religious charities, the public benefit requirement is justified by the assumption that, according to Cross J in "Neville Estates v Madden", "some benefit accrues to the public from attendance at places of worship of persons who live in this world and mix with their fellow citizens".
_	We'll drop the assumption that one number is exactly twice the other, we'll just suppose that they are different and positive.
_	However, the assumption that the presence of an evolving body of Mahāyāna scriptures implies the contemporaneous existence of distinct religious movement called "Mahāyāna", may be a serious misstep.
_	In 1945 at the cessation of hostilities the crew along with other naval POW's were transported by ship on the assumption that they were being re-patriated to Germany.
_	This challenge was based on the assumption that his belly wound was inflicted while he was in the moving jeep and not before or afterwards.
_	The February 2007 ruling was based on the assumption that the government would allow speech regarding prostitution through affiliate organizations that did not receive federal funding.
_	On the interplay between design and fabrication methods, she said "the assumption that parts are made from single materials and fulfill predetermined functions is deeply rooted in design... [and] enforced by the way that industrial supply chains work.
_	In direct contradiction to Plato's "Crito" 50d-e, one scholar of ancient Greek music has claimed that "Socrates received no training in "mousikē" in boyhood...", based on the assumption that "[h]is father, a stonemason, was typical of a class that did not receive a training in "mousikē"."
_	Catron's opinion in the Dred Scott v. Sandford case and his stance on slavery at the time would lead to the assumption that in a time of civil war, he would support his residence state of Tennessee and its act of secession.
_	The 2017 reanalysis concluded that the observed decay chains of Ts and Mc were consistent with the assumption that only one nuclide was present at each step of the chain, although it would be desirable to be able to directly measure the mass number of the originating nucleus of each chain as well as the excitation function of the Am+Ca reaction.
_	Repeating the above calculation under the assumption that the DOS near formula_8 is proportional to formula_22 shows that formula_23.
_	Some other proposed reconstructions were deemed even less possible as they included the orthogonal base or upper floor, based on the assumption that stony, garland-like reinforcements are actually remains of the former stone walls.
_	Some scholars have recently questioned the assumption that economic development and fertility are correlated in a simple negative manner.
_	Their model is based on the assumption that "intrinsic neuron dynamics are sufficient to achieve consistent time coding, with no need to involve the precise shape of postsynaptic currents..." contrary to similar models like SpikeProp and Tempotron, which depend heavily on the shape of the postsynaptic potential (PSP).
_	The second test proposed in the paper is a nonparametric one and hence does not rely on the assumption that the errors have a normal distribution.
_	Reform was based on the assumption that the depression was caused by the inherent instability of the market and that government intervention was necessary to rationalize and stabilize the economy, and to balance the interests of farmers, business and labor.
_	The central conflicts are based on the assumption that the face of super-civilization must be defined by its comprehension of the Universe as a whole: the understanding of its elementary, most basic (and thus most deeply and widely operative) laws.
_	Prior to this legislation, female New Zealanders were not permitted to bring their foreign spouses to reside in New Zealand as of right, due to the assumption that women should follow their husbands.
_	Since proof of the writer's malicious intentions is hard to ascertain, proof that the writer knowingly published a falsehood was generally accepted as proof of malice, under the assumption that only a malicious person would knowingly publish a falsehood.
_	Abandonware changes hands on the assumption that the resources required to enforce copyrights outweigh benefits a copyright holder might realize from selling software licenses.
_	Leader development keys in on the assumption that effective leadership occurs through the development of individual leaders, whereas leadership development is a function of the social resources that are rooted in relationships (Day, 2000).
_	Garret Moddel at University of Colorado has highlighted that he believes such devices hinge on the assumption that the Casimir force is a nonconservative force, he argues that there is sufficient evidence (e.g. analysis by Scandurra (2001)) to say that the Casimir effect is a conservative force and therefore even though such an engine can exploit the Casimir force for useful work it cannot produce more output energy than has been input into the system.
_	Peacocks pose a large problem on the farm, so countermeasures have been taken against them, including covering the plants, moving the peacocks to a walnut farm, and planting extra food based on the assumption that a significant fraction will be eaten or damaged by peacocks.
_	POM is also characterized by an effort to identify the appropriate temporal and spatial scale at which to study a pattern, and to avoid the assumption that a single process might explain a pattern at multiple temporal or spatial scales.
_	Another example requires the assumption that formula_57 commutes almost surely with formula_59.
_	Mackay did not share O'Connor's optimism about the prospect of an easy victory and proceeded on the assumption that Bardia would be resolutely held, requiring a well-planned attack similar to that required to breach the Hindenburg Line in 1918.
_	Barrage lifts were determined by a time-table, based on the assumption that delays in the infantry advance, to wait for the barrage to move on were preferable to the risk of it moving too fast and allowing German troops time to emerge from shelters and engage the infantry with small-arms fire.
_	This arbitrage opportunity comes from the assumption that the prices of bonds with the same properties will converge upon maturity.
_	In February 2006 under the assumption that it was the sole responsible trustee of CLO property, the University of Florida Office of Student Affairs attempted to seize control of the property by shutting down CLO operations.
_	Often, a person's birth year was registered with only two digits, on the assumption that either it was not important exactly how old a person is, or that no one lives longer than one hundred years.
_	I had just made the assumption that I was going to be this great guy who took care of Holder and had these heartfelt conversations over coffee about his addiction.
_	The Navier–Stokes equations are based on the assumption that the fluid, at the scale of interest, is a continuum, in other words is not made up of discrete particles but rather a continuous substance.
_	The Laspeyres formula works under the assumption that consumers always buy the same amount of each good in the market basket, no matter what the price.
_	The pope and the king agreed that Sega could convey the biretta to Toledo on the assumption that Toledo could be prevailed upon to accept the appointment.
_	There was a report in "The Wall Street Journal" of a few colleges, such as Franklin & Marshall, that deliberately waitlisted overqualified students on the assumption that, even if accepted, they would almost certainly not enroll.
_	The government he led built the post-war consensus, based upon the assumption that full employment would be maintained by Keynesian policies and that a greatly enlarged system of social services would be created – aspirations that had been outlined in the 1942 Beveridge Report.
_	By corollary, the ruling that such a person is "not guilty" may not be so taken, due to the asymmetry in the assumption that one is assumed innocent until proven guilty, and prefers to take the risk of freeing a guilty party over convicting innocents.
_	Therefore, the average velocity formula_45 of ions arriving into the Faraday cup and their average energy formula_46 can be calculated (under the assumption that we operate with a single type of ion) by the expressions
_	From this experience, and subsequent studies (see specific paragraph), Lombroso formulated the assumption that "violence was a good indicator of barbarism, barbarism, and in turn was a good indicator of racial degeneration" Such racist theories, which may include the view that the generally lower incidence of murders in the eastern half of Sicily was at the local presence of the "richest Aryan blood" ave been branded by Duggan as "a paradigmatic example of the power of prejudice in shaping the supposed impartial observation".
_	This situation is clearly incompatible with the assumption that formula_58 is a Nash-equilibrium flow.
_	After the low fertility rates of the Great Depression were supplanted by the baby boom of the postwar period, environmentalists and left-leaning observers began to forecast mass starvation on the assumption that food production could not keep pace with high population growth rates in the developing world [works such as Paul Erlich's "The Population Bomb" (1968)].
_	Under the assumption that the feasible region is non-empty and bounded, the Charnes-Cooper transformation
_	Allegations include the assumption that Bruyneel was part of a long-running doping conspiracy, including the use of banned methods to augment the performance of the cycling teams which he directed.
_	This makes the assumption that the particle is classical, and doesn't experience relativistic phenomena such as length contraction.
_	Braun and Hammonds (2008) asserts that the misperception of continents as natural population groupings is rooted in the assumption that populations are natural, isolated, and static.
_	This refutes the assumption that T "represents" me, hence I am not a Turing machine.
_	Ballard attacked the idea that stories should follow the "archetypes" popular since the time of Ancient Greece, and the assumption that these would somehow be the same ones that would call to modern readers, as Joseph Campbell argued in "The Hero with a Thousand Faces".
_	Studies show that parents of deaf students prefer to send their children to special schools under the assumption that they will receive better, specialized education, interact with other hearing-impaired students, and use a common language.
_	But the majority of the statements contained in the commentary itself justify the assumption that Ibn Tamim was the author.
_	DRM is designed to be renewable, that is, it is designed on the assumption that it will be cracked and must be constantly updated by Microsoft.
_	The complexity of "DS"("n","s")-sequence has been analyzed asymptotically in the limit as "n" goes to infinity, with the assumption that "s" is a fixed constant, and nearly tight bounds are known for all "s". Let λ("n") denote the length of the longest "DS"("n","s")-sequence.
_	IJN planners assessed their needs to protect Japan's maritime lifelines with the assumption that their most likely opponent would be the United States.
_	The Apostle Paul mentions that his pupil Apostle Titus traveled to Dalmatia so the assumption that he worked in Dalmatia's capital city of Salona, at least for a short time, is probable.
_	Recent Defense policy confirmed the assumption that most considerable operations would be undertaken under international organizations mandates, with Portugal not entering alone in a major military engagement since the 1961–1974 overseas conflict.
_	The tax exemption is based on the assumption that the Duchy estate is inseparable from the tax exempt person of Prince Charles, which is now open to question.
_	Note that cross terms of the form formula_45 are not included due to the assumption that the source is incoherent.
_	Hollander's (1958) original work on idiosyncrasy credit is premised on the assumption that all individuals sharing a common group membership also share common group-based expectations of each other, and failure to fulfil these expectations will result in expulsion from the group.
_	Social proof is considered prominent in ambiguous social situations where people are unable to determine the appropriate "mode of behavior", and is driven by the assumption that the surrounding people possess more knowledge about the current situation.
_	After the end of the Second World War, UK air defences were run down, on the assumption that it would be at least a decade before another war started.
_	The company relied on the assumption that 50% of its customers would neglect to apply for their rebate.
_	The name’s pre-Germanic origins might lead one to the assumption that there was continuous settlement in what is now Konken beginning in Gallo-Roman times.
_	The tracks from "Strictly For Grown Ups" that are included on "The World of Paddy Roberts"" are in stereo, leading to the assumption that the whole album was recorded that way (but never issued that way).
_	The rule of construction against extinguishment, even in the face of overlapping land grants, was based on the assumption that Congress would not lightly extinguish due to its "Christian charity."
_	The early theory was based on the assumption that the economic actions of individuals are largely based on self-interest (invisible hand) and that allowing them to act without any restrictions will produce the best results for everyone (spontaneous order), provided that at least minimum standards of public information and justice exist, e.g. no one should be allowed to coerce, steal, or commit fraud and there is freedom of speech and press.
_	It is, therefore, based on the assumption that in order to motivate personnel, the job itself must provide opportunities for achievement recognition, responsibility, advancement and growth.
_	Besides the assumption that deities of other Baltic peoples must be Latvian as well but were simply lost over time, many new deities were modeled after Greek and Roman deities.
_	The board also said it was an error of judgement to divert the aircraft to Marham on the assumption that they could do a visual landing.
_	While most investigations of extraterrestrial life start with the assumption that advanced life-forms must have similar requirements for life as on Earth, the hypothesis of other types of biochemistry suggests the possibility of lifeforms evolving around a different metabolic mechanism.
_	TSR published this material under the assumption that it was in the public domain, but Arkham House, claiming to hold the copyright, had already licensed it to Chaosium for their "Call of Cthulhu" role-playing game series.
_	Carleton opted for Camp Wadsworth, with the assumption that he would organize and train the 96th Division and then lead it in combat in France.
_	The pedagogical principle in CSCL environments is the assumption that knowledge is constructed through social negotiation and discussion with others.
_	The evidence presented in their common trial was simple: a) the confessions of the executed assassins; b) the murder weapon belonging to the Duke of Aveiro; and c) the assumption that only the Távoras would have known the whereabouts of the king on that evening, since he was returning from a liaison with Teresa of Távora (who was also arrested).
_	Whilst the bell-shaped skirts seen on statuettes from the ancient Minoan civilization are often compared to crinolines, particularly under the assumption that hoops were required to retain their shape, there is no evidence to confirm this and the theory is usually dismissed.
_	At the 8 August 1963 board meeting he recommended that the board start planning on the assumption that Studebaker was going to stop manufacturing cars.
_	Her reappearance and subsequent explanation (including the assumption that she had been held at Wells's house) were the following day printed in the "London Daily Advertiser".
_	Cardinal Pacelli did sound a note of caution in that his satisfaction was based on the assumption that the German Government "remained true to its undertaking", but noted also that Hitler "was becoming increasingly moderate".
_	Theology begins with the assumption that the divine exists in some form, such as in physical, supernatural, mental, or social realities, and that evidence for and about it may be found via personal spiritual experiences or historical records of such experiences as documented by others.
_	However, some players might lay down a hand that is not strictly unbeatable under the assumption that nobody has the set of cards required to beat them.
_	This distinction depends on the assumption that is made about the information and how it has to be put together.
_	A slave's testimony was admissible "only" if extracted by torture, on the assumption that slaves could not be trusted to reveal the truth voluntarily.
_	A first study of automorphic "L"-functions via the theory of Eisenstein Series can be found in Langlands' Euler Products, under the assumption that the automorphic representations are everywhere unramified.
_	Finally, the assumption that "A" be a subring of "B" can be modified a bit.
_	"It is a fallacy and an error of law to proceed on the assumption that any reference to Hindutva or Hinduism in a speech makes it automatically a speech based on Hindu religion as opposed to other religions or that the use of the word Hindutva or Hinduism per se depicts an attitude hostile to all persons practising any religion other than the Hindu religion... and it may well be that these words are used in a speech to emphasise the way of life of the Indian people and the Indian cultural ethos...
_	The L-H-S strategy avoids the assumption that high disturbance, high stress environments lack viable plant strategies, unlike Grime's model.
_	Bell's theorem, derived in his seminal 1964 paper titled "On the Einstein Podolsky Rosen paradox", has been called, on the assumption that the theory is correct, "the most profound in science".
_	The shelves are refilled as products are sold (parts withdrawn) on the assumption that what has sold will sell again which makes it easy to see how much has been used and to avoid overstocking.
_	("You start with the assumption that if a project is that big it must be really well thought through.
_	Thomas noted that Þórmóðr Þórkelsson was married in about 1231, and on the assumption that each generation could be estimated to be 30 years, Thomas gave Þórmóðr's birth at 1201; his (supposed) father, Þórketill, at 1171; Þórketill's father Þórmóðr at 1141; and this man's father at 1111.
_	Since all logical formulae can be converted into an equivalent formula in conjunctive normal form, proofs are often based on the assumption that all formulae are CNF.
_	The results of this survey conclude that there is a 8% limit to the number of disk systems in BL Lac objects and is therefore consistent with the assumption that all BL Lac host galaxies could be elliptical.
_	By 1914 French foreign policy was thus based on an alliance with Russia, and an informal understanding with Britain, all based on the assumption that the main threat was from Germany.
_	Saddened to see his daughter a lunatic, Vani’s father agrees for Kannan to get married to her, and thus Kannan marries the poor Valli, under the assumption that he is marrying the rich heiress Vani.
_	In a review of Humphreys' book, theologian William R Telford points out that the non-astronomical parts of his argument are based on the assumption that the chronologies described in the New Testament are historical and based on eyewitness testimony.
_	It relies on the assumption that the "i"-th hidden variable given the ("i" − 1)-th hidden variable is independent of previous hidden variables, and the current observation variables depend only on the current hidden state.
_	In addition, the Experiments of Rayleigh and Brace intended to measure some consequences of length contraction in the laboratory frame, for example the assumption that it would lead to birefringence.
_	He emphasized that initial conditions which made possible a thermodynamic arrow of time in a universe with a Big Bang origin, must include the assumption that at the initial singularity, the entropy of the universe was low and therefore extremely improbable.
_	The goal was to curb the passage of radical bills, with the assumption that the period of "trinundium" would give the citizens time to understand the proposed law or to be persuaded to vote against it.
_	Elaborate precautions were taken to keep Pierpont and Makley locked up, on the assumption that Dillinger would show, but he didn't, as he had teamed up with Baby Face Nelson.
_	Although the fates of three of them (Peter Gordon, Steve "Moose" Sadler, Gard Jagermeyer) were never made official, it is stated in the novel that the remaining child murders during the summer of 1958 after that of minor character Jimmy Cullum were of all of Henry's friends, creating the assumption that they were attacked and killed by It (possibly as means to worsen Henry's sociopathism).
_	Q̓woxq̣eys had refused, he decided to “ proceed with the work in the same manner as though Charlo [Xweɫxƛ̣ ̓cín], first chief, had signed the contract.” under the assumption that the Salish will change their mind.
_	Bernard Chazelle proved that under the assumption that each bird adjusts its velocity and position to the other birds within a fixed radius, the time it takes to converge to a steady state is an iterated exponential of height logarithmic in the number of birds.
_	Aggregate planning methodology requires the assumption that demand is known with certainty.
_	Thus, the assumption that the experimenter could have decided to measure different components of the spins than he actually did is, strictly speaking, not true.
_	The original team had enough confidence in its log based recovery to release it without an "fsck" style recovery utility on the assumption that the file system journal would always be allocated on mirrored drives.
_	June Schlueter, responding to Tiffany Stern's article, saw no basis for the assumption that "Fratricide Punished" was a play designed for puppets.
_	These calculations are based on the assumption that all chemical reactions are in equilibrium.
_	Its time complexity is analyzed by Korf "et al." under the assumption that the heuristic cost estimate is "consistent", meaning that
_	In answer to the question of why the show is now "so often portrayed as a set of empty, static cartoons, an embarrassment to womankind," Nussbaum wrote: "It's a classic misunderstanding, I think, stemming from an unexamined hierarchy: the assumption that anything stylized (or formulaic, or pleasurable, or funny, or feminine, or explicit about sex rather than about violence, or made collaboratively) must be inferior."
_	As a result, curricula and in particular textbooks are held by educators to provide secure sources of information and of methods to which teachers refer on the assumption that they provide accurate content and reliable didactic and methodological guidelines, which have been compiled by experienced historians, educational experts and authors.
_	Further evidence of a Jurassic origin is the assumption that the extinct "Fruitafossor" consumed termites, judging from its morphological similarity to modern termite-eating mammals.
_	Political opposition to the fishery began in 1885, based on the assumption that bycatch in the Chinese nets was killing large numbers of desirable young fish, especially salmon and striped bass.
_	""Compulsory" means required or obligatory and "heterosexuality" means the assumption that all romantic relationships are between a man and a woman."
_	The conference, held in February 1982, decided to offer three options: election by the party membership, election by the MPs only, and a system in which the first leader would be elected by the membership but subsequent leaders by the MPs (on the assumption that there would be many more of them after the next general election).
_	This overestimate is caused by (1) the assumption that all Jupiter trojans have a low albedo of about 0.04, whereas small bodies may have an average albedo as high as 0.12; (2) an incorrect assumption about the distribution of Jupiter trojans in the sky.
_	Notice that this includes the statement that formula_10 and hence the assumption that formula_1 is normal.
_	Many hotels, resorts, and cruise ships offer Internet access for the convenience of their guests; this can take various forms, such as in-room wireless access, or a web browser that uses the in-room television set for its display (usually in this case the hotel provides a wireless keyboard on the assumption that the guest will use it from the bed), or computer(s) that guests can use, either in the lobby or in a business center.
_	In a lecture of 1973 he warned the church against "subordination to the prevailing circumstances" ("Unterordnung unter die vorgegebenen Verhältnisse") and the assumption that the realities of the DDR had any eternal aspect.
_	Without mentioning the speculations which had been made, he asked Newton what would be the curve described by a planet round the sun on the assumption that the sun's force diminished as the square of the distance.
_	On the assumption that the game can model transactions between two people requiring trust, cooperative behaviour in populations may be modeled by a multi-player, iterated, version of the game.
_	with the assumption that: formula_40
_	Beginning with the assumption that, like crocodilians, "Apatosaurus" did not have a diaphragm, the dead-space volume (the amount of unused air remaining in the mouth, trachea, and air tubes after each breath) has been estimated at about for a specimen.
_	Paige went the distance, shutting out the White Sox, 5–0, debunking the assumption that nine innings of pitching was now beyond his capabilities.
_	As a note of interest, v is sometimes referred to as the "ideal exhaust gas velocity" because it based on the assumption that the exhaust gas behaves as an ideal gas.
_	Countries with parliamentary representation reporting at 0 are counted as 0.1 because of the assumption that women have some level of political influence and that the geometric mean can not have a 0 value.
_	The Spanish and Portuguese inquisitions focused particularly on the issue of Jewish anusim and Muslim converts to Catholicism, partly because these minority groups were more numerous in Spain and Portugal than in many other parts of Europe, and partly because they were often considered suspect due to the assumption that they had secretly reverted to their previous religions.
_	This requires the concept of the length of a module, denoted here by formula_2, and the assumption that
_	Furthermore, Adams took issue with the assumption that the petition was a petition for the abolition of slavery.
_	This proof holds even under the assumption that the pieces may not overlap while swinging, and can be generalised to any pair of three-dimensional figures which have a common dissection (see Hilbert's third problem).
_	The challenge to the assumption that beauty was central to art and aesthetics, thought to be original, is actually continuous with older aesthetic theory; Aristotle was the first in the Western tradition to classify "beauty" into types as in his theory of drama, and Kant made a distinction between beauty and the sublime.
_	As Wolfe once put it, "This whole performance is based on an idiotic assumption, which was natural and indeed inevitable, since Mr. Rowcliff is your champion ass – the assumption that Mr. Goodwin and I are both cretins."
_	Extrapolation from the sample to the 3-D material depends on the assumption that the material is homogeneous.
_	On 22 July 2014, a rebel fighter revealed to an Italian reporter that fellow separatists had told his unit the aircraft had been shot down under the assumption that it was Ukrainian.
_	An Operative Functional Dynamic Historical Model for the Study of Arabic Literature Based on the assumption that no literary critic can deal systematically with literary phenomena without relating them, either implicitly or explicitly, to some framework of facts or ideas, Snir published studies outlining a theoretical framework that would make possible the comprehensive analysis of all the diverse texts that make up modern Arabic literature.
_	Infomediaries operate on the assumption that personal information is the property of the individual described, not necessarily the property of the one who gathers it.
_	Additivity is an important concept here because the TEF method operates under the assumption that the assessed contaminants are dose-additive in mixtures.
_	In the 1879 paper the assumption that reaction rate was proportional to the product of concentrations was justified microscopically in terms of collision theory, as had been developed for gas reactions.
_	ESA, as originally posited by Gabrilovich and Markovitch, operates under the assumption that the knowledge base contains topically orthogonal concepts.
_	It urged immediate action on a further recommendation: that fire resistance should be evaluated under the assumption that sprinklers are unavailable; and that the effects of thermal expansion on floor support systems be considered.
_	In 2008, it was considered to be a dwarf planet based on the its lightcurve amplitude and the assumption that it was larger than in diameter.
_	The criminal investigation was still on the assumption that the two hairs were suitable to identify the perpetrators.
_	By elucidating these systems she spreads education and counters the assumption that First Nation communities are lawless.
_	"Vetulicola cuneata" was originally assigned to the crustaceans on the assumption that it was a bivalved arthropod like "Canadaspis" and "Waptia", but the lack of legs, the presence of gill slits, and the four plates in the "carapace" were unlike any known arthropod.
_	All these mechanisms make the assumption that the act of repeating a message blocks the propagation of Byzantine symptoms.
_	Reservists who are activated, even if they are housed by the military during their mobilization, are still paid BAH on the assumption that a reservist still may have the civilian obligations (like a mortgage) that BAH is designed to offset.
_	His distinction between social groupings is based on the assumption that there are only two basic forms of an actor's will, to approve of other men.
_	Scholarly work from universities surrounding electoral politics tends to focus on improvements, especially electoral reform, based on the assumption that a completely separate alternative could not function in modern society.
_	From the assumption that light travels in straight lines, he showed that illumination was proportional to the strength of the source, inversely proportional to the square of the distance of the illuminated surface and the sine of the angle of inclination of the light's direction to that of the surface.
_	In Einstein's theory of general relativity, the Schwarzschild metric (also Schwarzschild vacuum or Schwarzschild solution), is a solution to the Einstein field equations which describes the gravitational field outside a spherical mass, on the assumption that the electric charge of the mass, the angular momentum of the mass, and the universal cosmological constant are all zero.
_	CLA is based on the assumption that the way in which a problem is formulated changes the policy solutions and the actors in charge of initiating transformations.
_	Syracuse, then engaged against Leontini and Naxos, broke off hostilities to gather a relief army, but the speed of their preparations was dictated by the assumption that Selinus would hold out for a long time against the Carthaginians.
_	His idea was to use Mölders' popularity in Germany by airdropping the "Möldersbrief" (Mölders-letter), a copy of correspondence supposedly written by Mölders to the provost of Schwerin, to create the assumption that Mölders' strong Catholic beliefs led him to oppose the Nazi regime in Germany.
_	In Chapter 5, an explicit reference to the events of Brackett's story "The Beast-Jewel of Mars" (Planet Stories, Winter 1948) has been cut, perhaps on the assumption that readers of the novel would not know or be interested in the earlier story.
_	In the early morning of 12 January 2012, "Patiño" was attacked by Somali pirates, apparently under the assumption that the ship was just a commercial vessel.
_	In 2001 the Department of Trade and Industry's company law review steering group likewise recommended a "charitable incorporated organisation" with a separate legal regime, as company law is aimed at the commercial sector, with corporate governance structured around the assumption that members of a company have a financial interest in it.
_	The British in late 1779 embarked on a new strategy based on the assumption that most Southerners were Loyalists at heart.
_	By setting aside the assumption that thinking has a natural ability to recognize the truth, Deleuze says, we attain a "thought without image", a thought always determined by problems rather than solving them.
_	The gluon is also expected to be massless, although the assumption that it is has not been conclusively tested.
_	At this early stage in the mission, the telescope was deliberately pointed at the Earth for safety under the assumption that the dust cover was present.
_	The CrossRef recommendation is primarily based on the assumption that the DOI is being displayed without being hyper-linked to its appropriate URL – the argument being that without the hyperlink it is not as easy to copy-and-paste the full URL to actually bring up the page for the DOI, thus the entire URL should be displayed, allowing people viewing the page containing the DOI to copy-and-paste the URL, by hand, into a new window/tab in their browser in order to go to the appropriate page for the document the DOI represents.
_	I always make the assumption that I am communicating with him offscreen."
_	Conventional voltage regulation equipment works under the assumption that line voltage changes predictably with distance along the feeder.
_	AIs are typically matched to actual average consumption, with the assumption that there appears to be a need, and that need is met by what people consume.
_	The name is sometimes given by modern editors or translators as Ingvaeones, on the assumption that this is more likely to be the correct form, since an etymology can be formed for it as 'son of Yngvi', Yngvi occurring later as a Scandinavian divine name.
_	At this point, the soldiers, under the assumption that Butler was aware of the ongoing Robin Sage training, attempted to bribe him with "Don" (Pineland currency), which looks similar to Monopoly money.
_	Although the inclusion of cognitive appraisal as one of the elements is slightly controversial, since some theorists make the assumption that emotion and cognition are separate but interacting systems, the component processing model provides a sequence of events that effectively describes the coordination involved during an emotional episode.
_	Building on Waltz's balance of power theory and the assumption that "balancing is more common than bandwagoning", defensive realists assert that states which strive to attain hegemony in the international system will be counterbalanced by other states seeking to maintain the status quo.
_	Nelson closed with the squadron under the assumption that they may be from the allied navies of Naples or Sardinia.
_	Double standards also violate the principle of justice known as impartiality, which is based on the assumption that the same standards should be applied to all people, without regard to subjective bias or favoritism based on social class, rank, ethnicity, gender, religion, sexual orientation, age, or other distinctions.
_	He considered physical traits to be independent of each other, making classification by the assumption that a population shares certain traits incorrect.
_	Hence, there are now religious reasons for Christians to support "transformative" marriage for all people and to dispense with the assumption that same-sex marriage reflects encroaching secularism.
_	This method is predicated on the assumption that advertising causes future sales volume.
_	If we make the assumption that cold dark matter particles have an isotropic velocity distribution, then the same derivation applies to these particles, and their density formula_37 satisfies the non-linear differential equation
_	The judge held that, even on the assumption that the sale of YMS Ltd had been at an undervalue, it was a genuine sale, not "ultra vires" and not an unauthorised distribution of Progress' assets.
_	The fact that in spite of this undoubtedly very close relationship Petrarch did not include his friend Philippe in his "Last Will and Testament" is explained by the assumption that Petrarch could not think of any bequest suitable to a man of such high status as that of a prince.
_	For any "x", the fundamental theorem of calculus, together with the assumption that the derivative of "F" vanishes, implies that
_	Obviously, this value depends on the assumption that the potential goes asymptotically to zero at infinity (formula_21), as is common in physics.
_	Italian authorities had misjudged the growth of an Albanian national consciousness during the Zog years with the assumption that Albanian nationalism was weak or could be directed by the Italians.
_	While the individual was getting paid by an employer prior to accruing a substantial presence, the employer may have been operating under the assumption that the individual would be a nonresident for tax purposes and using the tax deduction laws and reporting requirements associated with employing nonresidents.
_	From then on the Pro World Champion is presumed to be the overall World Champion given the assumption that the Pro class is the most difficult and competitive class in BMX, as it is with any other sport.
_	It uses the assumption that human consciousness is Turing-computable: that consciousness can be produced by a computer program.
_	One of his studies demonstrated that methane is in fact spontaneously formed at high pressure and high temperature environments such as those deep in the Earth's mantle; this finding is an exciting indication of abiogenic hydrocarbon formation, meaning that the actual amount of hydrocarbons available on earth might be much larger than conventionally assumed under the assumption that all hydrocarbons are fossil fuels.
_	The grey world normalization makes the assumption that changes in the lighting spectrum can be modelled by three constant factors applied to the red, green and blue channels of color.
_	Frost reported that of the two cases he studied that featured death from inert gas asphyxiation using a suicide bag, one had "bilateral eyelid petechiae and large amounts of gastric content in the airways and that these findings challenge the assumption that death by this method is painless and without air hunger, as asserted in "Final Exit"."
_	Similarly, a Salishan language equivalent of the English sentence "It was John who called" would not require the assumption that the listener knows that someone called.
_	From an early stage in 1984, before the official announcement of the councils to be rate-capped, Basildon had worked on the assumption that it would have its budget restricted.
_	The martial races theory was a British ideology based on the assumption that certain peoples were more martially inclined as opposed to the general populace or other peoples.
_	Suppose a strict maximum was attained on the interior of "D", the heat at this maximum would be dispersing to the points around it, which would contradict the assumption that this represents the steady state of a system.
_	Reviewing MacDonald's "Separation and Its Discontents" in 2000, Zev Garber writes that MacDonald works from the assumption that the dual Torah is the blueprint of the eventual Jewish dominion over the world, and that he sees contemporary antisemitism, the Holocaust, and attacks against Israel as "provoked by Jews themselves."
_	As Dalrymple says "In the course of my travels I often came across the assumption that intense spirituality was somehow the preserve of what many call 'the mystic East'...
_	Pegg is related to Neely which leads Mrs. Hooper to the assumption that the Henrys' slaves were writing letters in the newspaper.
_	Within a decade, the last phrase of the poem was being used in public discourse without attribution, apparently on the assumption that any literate reader would know its origin.
_	The columns "Average" and "Worst" give the time complexity in each case, under the assumption that the length of each key is constant, and that therefore all comparisons, swaps, and other needed operations can proceed in constant time.
_	Vasey's plan of attack was based on the assumption that the Japanese defenders had no antitank guns.
_	Because potential UTS candidates are required to pass a rigorous entrance examination to attend the school, its curriculum is accelerated on the assumption that its students assimilate information faster.
_	One of the most basic aspects of China's ideological worldview had been the assumption that conflict, though not necessarily military conflict, was omnipresent in the world.
_	That claim "springs from the assumption that individual mental freedom can be constitutionally abridged whenever any majority of this Court finds a satisfactory legislative reason.
_	This argument rests on the assumption that one can have a "moral" discussion on various scales; that is, what is "good" for: a certain part of your being (leaving open the possibility of conflicting motives), you as a single individual, your family, your society, your species, your type of species.
_	It is a fairly simplistic model, employing several simplifying assumptions, most notably the assumption that every fertilisation event may be classed as either self-fertilisation, or outcrossing with a completely random mate.
_	Difference feminism is based on the assumption that women and men are different, that for women to be equal to men means to be like men, which is not desirable.
_	One review noted that it shows the band "supporting the assumption that their ideas are self-contained and firmly Skye-based."
_	The development was built on a speculative basis on the assumption that the office space would be taken by a handful of major corporate tenants.
_	The appraisal theory of emotions centers on the assumption that it is the evaluation of events, and not the events themselves, that cause emotional experiences.
_	Or the assumption that the electron can be treated as free is invalid resulting in the effectively infinite electron mass equal to the nuclear mass (see e.g. the comment below on elastic scattering of X-rays being from that effect).
_	With the assumption that the decision algorithm takes an amount of time that grows at least polynomially as a function of the input size , Chan shows that the threshold for switching to an explicit LP formulation and the number of subsets in the partition can be chosen in such a way that the implicit LP-type optimization algorithm also runs in time .
_	The adding-up restriction stems from the assumption that consumption always takes place at the upper boundary of the household's opportunity set, which is only fulfilled if the household cannot completely satisfy all its wants within the boundaries of the opportunity set.
_	Nevertheless, the common perception has been that the Meiri's works were not available to generations of halachists before 1920; early 20th century authors such as Chafetz Chaim, Chazon Ish, and Joseph B. Soloveitchik write under the assumption that "Beit HaBechira" was newly discovered in their time.
_	Detectives initially worked under the assumption that there were at least two assailants in the truck.
_	The normality of "B" and the assumption that "H" is invariant under "B" imply "K' " is invariant under "B".
_	Like structuralists, they start from the assumption that people's identities, values and economic conditions determine each other rather than having "intrinsic" properties that can be understood in isolation.
_	This is based on the assumption that she was just 14 years old when playing Juliet in a 1905 production of Romeo and Juliet.
_	Liberalism, as a ‘rationality’ of governing was, in Foucault’s mind, unique from other previous technologies of governing, as it had as its foundation the assumption that human behaviour should be governed, in the pursuit of fostering the idea that society be understood as a realm separate from the state, not just something that was drawn off of and violated in order to strengthen the state.
_	To's collaboration with the French was based on the assumption that a temporary peace was necessary for Vietnam to buy time to undertake nation building through Westernization, after which a renewed battle against European imperialism and political domination could be successfully fought.
_	These unequal proportions contribute to the assumption that the common ostrich’s nasal glands do not play any role in salt excretion.
_	However, increasingly many disciplines, including most humanities, set their requirements for coursework, languages, and the expected extent of dissertation research by the assumption that students will take five years minimum or six to seven years on average; competition for jobs within these fields also raises expectations on the length and quality of dissertations considerably.
_	Several titbits add to the assumption that Yashoda and Mohan must have eloped and B.M is right.
_	The film "Easy Rider" (1969) includes the assumption that the two main characters could have their long hairs forcibly shaved with a rusty razor when jailed, symbolizing the intolerance of some conservative groups toward members of the counterculture.
_	He said that the assumption that attackers would both enter and exit from facilities was not valid, since suicide terrorists would not need to exit.
_	Although it did not make the assumption that, if an enactment is to create a crime, it should provide, either expressly or by reference, for a punishment, "I think it improbable that if the lawgiver had intended that the Besluit should create a crime, he would not have taken the precaution of inserting a penalty—more particularly as this is what appears generally to have been done."
_	Protestant preachers wrote exegetical analyses of the curse, with the assumption that it was dark skin.
_	The MSZMP suggested a directly elected semi-presidential system, however this proposal was strongly refused by the sharply anti-communist SZDSZ and Fidesz, because the reformer communist and potential candidate Imre Pozsgay was the most popular Hungarian politician in those months (based on the assumption that Pozsgay would be elected).
_	Although Crown records turn up in the east, they are much less commonly found in the midwest and south, leading to the assumption that they did not have a full nationwide network of dealers, due to Depression conditions.
_	By 1983, the Kings' off ice woes were so bad that the team was one of the few U.S. teams to seriously consider supporting the audacious bid of flamboyant Saskatchewan businessman Bill Hunter to move the St. Louis Blues to Saskatoon, Saskatchewan, presumably on the assumption that the Kings would have switched divisions with Hunter's team and thus joined the mostly American Norris Division.
_	The standards include, among many provisions, a component that protects the right to "opt out" of further processing or transmission of personal data, under the assumption that data may not be further processed in ways inconsistent with the intent for which they were collected.
_	On the assumption that defendants were believers in divine intervention for the innocent, then only the truly innocent would choose to endure a trial; guilty defendants would confess or settle cases instead.
_	The cryptographic security of PGP encryption depends on the assumption that the algorithms used are unbreakable by direct cryptanalysis with current equipment and techniques.
_	Based on the assumption that this is indeed correct it is possible to make a statement about the Higgs boson mass.
_	Nevertheless, many social institutions, such as mass media, still use gender stereotypes, based on the assumption that they are well known to everyone and help the receivers to understand the content of the message.
_	He also dismissed the assumption that FDIs are motivated by the search of low costs in foreign countries, by emphasizing the fact that local firms are not able to compete effectively against foreign firms, even though they have to face foreign barriers (cultural, political, lingual etc.) to market entry.
_	These fragments disappointed Romantic scholars as not matching the writer's great reputation, partly because Fronto's teachings, with their emphasis on studying ancient writers in search of striking words, were not in accordance with current fashion (Italy, where not only Mai but Leopardi enthused over them, was an exception), partly because they gave no support to the assumption that Fronto had been a wise counsellor to Marcus Aurelius (indeed, they contain no trace of political advice), partly because his frequent complaints about ill-health, especially those collected in book 5 of "Ad M. Caesarem", aroused more annoyance than compassion; these adverse judgements were reversed once Fronto was read for what he was rather than what he was not, as already in the sympathetic treatment by Dorothy Brock, "Studies in Fronto and his Age" (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1911).
_	The fuselage was sized based a dimension range of a 5’10”(1.78 m) pilot and the assumption that the pilot could output the necessary power-to-weight ratio to fly the aircraft will be no greater than 1.78 m.
_	It allowed this patent based on the assumption that ayahuasca's properties had not been previously described in writing.
_	Discussing the apparent failure of the cinematic universe's first team-up film, "", to establish a successful equivalent to the MCU, Todd VanDerWerff noted that where the MCU has a television-like "showrunner" in Feige, "the visionary behind Marvel's entire slate", the DCEU has director Zack Snyder, whose DC films "seemingly start from the assumption that people have come not to see an individual story but a long series of teases for other ones.
_	EVE operates under the “central dogma,” the assumption that all biochemical pathways proceed through the following steps: DNA => RNA => protein.
_	Although many geoscientists adopted mobilistic viewpoints as seafloor spreading was documented, most of them did so with the assumption that plates are passive passengers on convection systems driven by heating from the bottom.
_	In 1973 Renfrew published "Before Civilisation: The Radiocarbon Revolution and Prehistoric Europe" in which he challenged the assumption that prehistoric cultural innovation originated in the Near East and then spread to Europe.
_	On the assumption that the same person wrote Waverley and Ivanhoe, the two distinct patterns of characters (meaningful-declarative-sentences)
_	While many of the victims that are a part of human trafficking are forced/kidnapped/enslaved, others were lured in under the assumption that they were getting a better job.
_	An additional problem discovered in mathematical modelling is that the assumption of the identity of total production prices and total values (or the identity of total surplus value and total profits) cannot be maintained simultaneously with the assumption that the rate of profit on production capital is "the same" for all industries—to create a consistent theory requires making additional assumptions.
_	This approach makes the assumption that edges are likely to be in continuous curves, and allows us to follow a faint section of an edge we have previously seen, without meaning that every noisy pixel in the image is marked down as an edge.
_	For the second term we use the assumption that formula_19 is exponentially bounded to see that, for formula_38,
_	This implies that the funerary cult of Peribsen continued at least until the Fourth dynasty, inconsistent with the assumption that Peribsen's name was not allowed to be mentioned.
_	Most ciliates placed here were originally considered advanced trichostomes, on the assumption that they lacked true oral cilia.
_	"The categorization [is] based on the assumption that in tunnels there are three major dangers [that] may cause numerous victims or serious damage to the tunnel structure."
_	The criticism is based on the assumption that the Human Right to Water and Sanitation imply that the government directly has to deliver water and sanitation services to everyone.
_	Physicists began changing the assumption that the Universe was static and unchanging.
_	He began with the assumption that were probably "good apples" in a situation like that of the Stanford prison experiment, where he knew that physically and psychologically normal and healthy people were behaving sadistically and brutalising prisoners.
_	The resulting matrix, minus that column, is a "supersaturated design" for finding significant first order effects, under the assumption that few exist.
_	When used in physics and engineering, the Fourier inversion theorem is often used under the assumption that everything "behaves nicely".
_	To believe in God means to accept life on the assumption that it harbors conditions in the outer world and drives in the human spirit which together impel man to transcend himself.
_	Evidence for the influence of Tula, Hidalgo upon Chichen Itza was mainly based upon the assumption that Tula was older than Chichen, and that Chichen’s ‘mexicanized’ structures were built long after its Maya structures.
_	This idea emphasizes how there is the assumption that the stereotypical attributes of the group are not ideal or fit for the task or job position in question.
_	With the assumption that females require a certain number of copulations before they can conceive, this would suggest that they may achieve this number faster either by having a high number of ovulatory cycles between conceptions, or by appearing more attractive to males around the time of ovulation by having larger swellings.
_	This model functions under the assumption that Archean tectonics were similar to present day plate tectonics.
_	Private lawsuits by Edye Smith and Glenn Wilburn worked on the assumption that Brescia was the "John Doe Number Two" seen in surveillance footage helping McVeigh orchestrate the bombings.
_	The first ionization potential of mendelevium was measured to be at most (6.58 ± 0.07) eV in 1974, based on the assumption that the 7s electrons would ionize before the 5f ones; this value has since not yet been refined further due to mendelevium's scarcity and high radioactivity.
_	Remarking on the way flash-backs appear suddenly during the movie, critic Anthony Lane says that Lonergan "proceeds on the assumption that things are hard, some irreparably so, and that it's the job of a film not to smooth them over."
_	It works on the assumption that what goes against the general tendencies of the early church is historical.
_	A recurrent argument for a ban on homosexuals in the military rests on the assumption that, in the face of potentially homosexual members of their unit, prospective recruits would shy away from military service.
_	The historian Konrad Arneth expressed the assumption that there may be a connection to a (still existing) farmer familybranch from Stübig.
_	She comes to the prison at the request of Aleida to discuss Daya's child under the assumption that she is the child's paternal grandmother.
_	Using the assumption that the noise present in the data was correlated (red noise rather than white noise), Roman Baluev called into question not only the existence of planet g, but Gliese 581d as well, suggesting there were only three planets (Gliese 581b, c, and e) present.
_	Implicit solvents or continuum solvents, are models in which one accepts the assumption that implicit solvent molecules can be replaced by a homogeneously polarizable medium as long as this medium, to a good approximation, gives equivalent properties.
_	This raises the assumption that the city owned his own complex of underwater Channel which led to the river South Morava.
_	"Note": Insert on an unsorted array is sometimes quoted as being "O"("n") due to the assumption that the element to be inserted must be inserted at one particular location of the array, which would require shifting all the subsequent elements by one position.
_	Likewise, the deletion operation is sometimes quoted as being "O"("n") due to the assumption that subsequent elements must be shifted, but in a classic unsorted array the order is unimportant (though elements are implicitly ordered by insert-time), so deletion can be carried out by swapping the element to be deleted with the last element in the array and then decrementing the array size by 1, which is a "O"(1) operation.
_	Practically, this understanding emboldens pedestrians and cyclists to take liberties with cars and trucks, impeding their progress by moving into the flow of traffic under the assumption that larger vehicles will give way.
_	A typical context is a block of statements representing the “launch logic” for a set of mutually independent activities, with the assumption that the end of the block acts as a barrier that cannot be passed before all activities have terminated.
_	Medical theory was based on the assumption that scurvy was a disease of internal putrefaction brought on by faulty digestion caused by the hardships of life at sea and the naval diet.
_	It is based on the assumption that commodity prices moved in long, sustained moves.
_	UrbanLab's project, Growing Water, starts with the assumption that in 100 years that "water will be the new oil" and envisions a Chicago that recycles 100% of its waste water back into Lake Michigan.
_	He criticized the assumption that, if two people disagree, at least one of them must be in error.
_	These designs were based on the assumption that an attack would come along the few roads leading through the desert, rather than through the difficult desert terrain.
_	In Einstein's theory of general relativity, the Schwarzschild metric (also known as the Schwarzschild vacuum or Schwarzschild solution) is the solution to the Einstein field equations that describes the gravitational field outside a spherical mass, on the assumption that the electric charge of the mass, angular momentum of the mass, and universal cosmological constant are all zero.
_	This was based on the assumption that telecoms traffic, particularly data traffic, would continue to grow exponentially for the foreseeable future.
_	So we start with the assumption that the historic police powers of the States were not to be superseded by the Federal Act unless that was the clear and manifest purpose of Congress."
_	As economists and historians came to question the assumption that the National Government could have spent its way out of unemployment, Chamberlain's tenure as Chancellor was to an extent rehabilitated.
_	The basic premise is to use only the assumption that it is possible that all of the treatment groups are equivalent, and that every member of them is the same before sampling began (i.e. the slot that they fill is not differentiable from other slots before the slots are filled).
_	Bornemann wrote that artillery battery observation posts had been left unmanned, on the assumption that they had been superseded by artillery liaison officers in the front line.
_	Applications written with the assumption that the user will be running with administrator privileges experienced problems in earlier versions of Windows when run from limited user accounts, often because they attempted to write to machine-wide or system directories (such as "Program Files") or registry keys (notably HKLM) UAC attempts to alleviate this using "File and Registry Virtualization", which redirects writes (and subsequent reads) to a per-user location within the user’s profile.
_	Before the printing press, monastic copyists altered words or phrases they thought were odd, under the assumption that the copyist before them had made a mistake.
_	Education and political discourse proceeded on the assumption that it was possible to mold people using collectivist institutional forms into an ideal Soviet man or woman, new Soviet man.
_	His partner became sick "within 15 minutes" after spraying the "oily substance" onto her wrists before rubbing them together, under the assumption that it was perfume.
_	Much engineering design is based on the assumption that materials behave elastically.
_	This research centre is based on the assumption that scepticism is an essential aspect of the processes and categorizations within Jewish philosophy, religion, literature, and society in its permanent exchange with adjacent cultures.
_	During the previous night, the batteries of 75s posted forward in the antitank role returned to their battalions, possibly on the assumption that the tank threat was now less pressing than that of the enemy infantry.
_	Plate tectonic theory makes the assumption that deformation is concentrated along plate boundaries.
_	We can use this consensus as a pragmatic guide, either on the assumption that it seems to approximate some kind of valid reality, or simply because it is more "practical" than perceived alternatives.
_	Under the assumption that the servers are non-colluding, such a protocol is secure.
_	The Kuli stone was later dated to 1034 since it was originally found adjacent to a Viking Age boardwalk dated dendrochronologically to that year, on the assumption that the two were contemporaneous.
_	Two weeks later the Drupal security team released an advisory explaining that everyone should act under the assumption that any site not updated within 7 hours of the announcement are infected.
_	The pigment analysis of Renoir's "The Umbrellas" conducted by the scientists at the National Gallery in London confirmed the assumption that it was painted in two distinct stages as mentioned above.
_	During the spring of 1963, Grumman hired Bell to develop the Lunar Module ascent engine, on the assumption that Bell's experience in development of the Air Force Agena engine would be transferable to the Lunar Module requirements.
_	This approach builds on the assumption that human social preferences are significantly (but imperfectly) constrained by their evolved nature as ultrasocial animals and, thus, that people value individuals and groups seen as facilitating effective ingroup functioning and stigmatize those seen as threatening it.
_	The disk appears to be slightly elongated to form an ellipse with its minor axis at a position angle of ; working under the assumption that the disk is in fact circular gives it an inclination of from the plane of the sky.
_	"Star Wars" references are deeply embedded in popular culture; references to the main characters and themes of "Star Wars" are casually made in many English-speaking countries with the assumption that others will understand the reference.
_	Production designer Steve Saklad designed Mark and Vanessa's house with the assumption that "Vanessa has probably read every home magazine and tried to copy what's in them as best she could."
_	These approaches target the consequences rather than the causes of segregation, and rely on the assumption that one of the most harmful effects of spatial inequality is the lack of access to employment opportunities.
_	His theory is based on the assumption that in order to survive in the existence of competitive markets, employers cannot discriminate in the long run.
_	In January 2007 the Head of the Beslan commission asked the Chief Administration for Penitentiary Service of Russia to confirm or refute the assumption that Kulayev was no longer alive.
_	Under the assumption that the true range image is a more or less continuous function of the image coordinates, the correct depth can be obtained using a technique called phase-unwrapping.
_	A Q-based inference is built around the assumption that if the speaker did not make a stronger statement (or say more), then its denial is (implied to be) true.
_	Wreckage of the ship finally washed to shore on the west coast of France on 16 March 1910 which confirmed the assumption that the ship along with its entire crew, cast and cargo had perished at sea.
_	Under the assumption that these two branches would have full cooperation, there was no system of checks and balances.
_	The earlier designs had been built with the assumption that overall airflow should be kept as low as possible and that the energy would be extracted through a propeller.
_	In April 2014, the first measurement of a planet's rotation period was announced: the length of day for the super-Jupiter gas giant Beta Pictoris b is 8 hours (based on the assumption that the axial tilt of the planet is small.)
_	Senior privileges are extended on the assumption that seniors have attained a level of maturity and self-discipline that will allow them to exercise their privileges wisely.
_	They meet, discover they both have superpowers and, operating under the assumption that Green Lantern was their father (which they did not know for certain at the time, but did eventually learn to be true), decide to follow in his footsteps.
_	Although farrowing crates have been used based on the assumption that they reduce piglet mortality rates, there appears to be little published evidence in support of this claim.
_	In 1940, Planck, Popitz, Ulrich von Hassell and General Ludwig Beck drafted a "Provisional Constitution" on the assumption that the forthcoming attack on the Western Front would overthrow Hitler's regime.
_	In 1897, Stere obtained a licensure with a thesis on legal entity and individualism, one which drew criticism from the influential Conservative-inspired group "Junimea", on the assumption that it had been partly inspired by Marx.
_	Robin Cox has argued that the economic calculation argument can only be successfully rebutted on the assumption that a moneyless socialist economy was to a large extent spontaneously ordered via a self-regulating system of stock control which would enable decision-makers to allocate production goods on the basis of their relative scarcity using calculation in kind.
_	Central to the concept of an iron triangle is the assumption that bureaucratic agencies, as political entities, seek to create and consolidate their own power base.
_	This semi-structured method starts from the assumption that the self is populated by a number of opposing narrative voices, with each voice having its own life story.
_	After learning that the contractor had bid on the assumption that they were to be building a brick structure, Woodward paid for the limestone facing himself.
_	Adrian also discovers that the assumption that he is George and Pauline's offspring might be a fallacy.
_	This effort is evident in the types of questions which researchers working in the EDP paradigm ask; in reference to Nikolaas Tinbergen's four categories of questions, EP typically focuses on evolutionary ("Why") questions, while EDP explicitly integrates proximate questions ("How"), with the assumption that a greater understanding of the former category will yield insights into the latter.
_	Berresford Ellis gives an estimate of a minimum of 24,000 based on the assumption that "the Romans had... four legions – for each consul had two legions under his command – and given that each legion had 6,000 men."
_	This method works on the assumption that for shapely hands, the combined length of the trump suit is more significant than points or HCP in deciding on the level of the final contract.
_	The process of the model is based on the assumption that the sum of capacities of the two input branches of roadways is less than the exiting capacity of the system, μ+μ ≤ μ.
_	Dente of Pisa University calls it an example of "fantastic biographical reconstructions", and remarks that it depends too much on the assumption that Shakespeare's heavy use of Italian settings in his plays must mean that he was Italian.
_	"Our results support the assumption that these consumers, in fact, form a distinct group of sex offenders.
_	It was originally designed on the assumption that the pressure in the epidural space was negative.
_	By predicting a specific asymmetry in peripheral high-energy hadron reactions based on the hot spot effect Richard M. Weiner proposed a direct test of this hypothesis as well as of the assumption that the heat conductivity in hadronic matter is relatively small.
_	Using partial integration and the assumption that ζ(3) was rational and equal to "a"/"b", Beukers eventually derived the inequality
_	In particular, Razborov and Rudich showed that, under the assumption that certain kinds of one-way functions exist, such proofs cannot give a resolution of the P = NP problem, so new techniques will be required in order to solve this question.
_	On the assumption that the liar is true, one can show that it is false, and on the assumption that it is false, one can show that it is true.
_	Their relationship is threatened when the landlord's son, who has been sent on the assumption that Emmi has taken in a lodger, to point out to Emmi that subletting is against Emmi's tenancy agreement, and that Ali must leave within a day.
_	Central planning operated on the assumption that if each unit met or exceeded its plan, then demand and supply would balance.
_	This led to the assumption that altruism is the main motive and that financial compensation is secondary.
_	Radical elections rest on the assumption that an election should be performed primarily based on the natal chart of the querent or person for whom the election is being performed.
_	Both pieces aim to achieve more inclusive readings of sexuality and allow for the re-designation of literary figures and real people as bisexual, rather than continuing with the assumption that any same-gender activity, explicit or implied, is homosexual, and any opposite-gender activity heterosexual.
_	Many representatives of the clergy fell under the assumption that the regime will never recognize the Church and therefore a "compromise" – as was often proposed by KGB operatives during interrogations – would serve as a possible solution.
_	Use of this measure implies the assumption that the incidence rate is constant over different periods of time, such that for an incidence rate of 14 per 1000 persons-years, 14 cases would be expected for 1000 persons observed for 1 year or 50 persons observed for 20 years.
_	This licensing agreement was done by Palisades under the assumption that the original manufacturing tooling and molds from the 1970s Mego toyline were still available.
_	It is based on the assumption that how an issue is characterized can have an influence on how it is understood by audiences (Scheufele & Tewksbury, 2006).
_	These conclusions are based on the assumption that each day of the year (excluding February 29) is equally probable for a birthday.
_	These toll revenue requirements were based on the assumption that the federal government, although it contributed $900 million to Phase I, would not contribute funds for Phase II.
_	The overproduction argument depends on the assumption that there is a significant increase in prices paid to Fairtrade farmers.
_	The government proceeded on the assumption that no Indian company, at the time, had the financial resources and technical knowledge to provide large scale mobile services.
_	The discontinuities of PBNs only occur at points formula_84 where either formula_85 is a discontinuous point of formula_86 or formula_87 is a discontinuous point of formula_88 under the assumption that formula_89 and formula_16 is a compact, triangulable topological space.
_	Still, people just make the assumption that we're five guys who've just got our dicks in mind.
_	The underlying rationale of such a learning framework consists in the assumption that a given mapping cannot be well captured by a single Gaussian process model.
_	Their participation has been limited by the assumption that women's proper sphere is the "private" sphere.
_	Conservation of Vector Current is the assumption that the weak vector current responsible for the decay is conserved.
_	The New Zealand dollar was overvalued and following the announcement of the snap election in June, traders started selling off the New Zealand dollar on the assumption that Labour would win the election and devalue the currency.
_	Devereux describes Mohave government as "one of the least understood segments of Mohave culture", and notes that while white officials "tended to act on the assumption that Indian chiefs exercised absolute authority", as an elected leader Irataba was "primarily a servant of the tribe".
_	However, they rejected Guatemala's extradition request due to the assumption that Figueroa could not expect a fair trial in his home country.
_	This is based on the assumption that neither Winchester Manuscript nor Caxton's first edition references to the author reflect confusion in identity by an early copyist.
_	Despite some outside criticism that ASIO staff was an "old boys' club" (perhaps based on the assumption that ASIO was modelled on MI5), military and police backgrounds dominated ASIO staffing into the 1970s and Thwaites eventually resigned believing that the analytical resources were undervalued.
_	Her latest book challenges the assumption that early modern censorship was an instrument used by governmental power to punish dissent.
_	There is the assumption that Jonah is identical with the Moshiach ben Yosef.
_	So we might as well proceed on the assumption that we have a real hope of comprehending the answer, of being able to "handle the truth" when the time comes.
_	The benchmarking was conducted with the assumption that a minimum 256 kbit/s data throughput rate would be a realistic value to place upon a responsive VPN tunnel for use such as remote desktop access.
_	The model is based on the assumption that phase separation during decompression is random, yet highly probable, in body tissue, and that a bubble will continue to grow by acquiring gas from adjacent saturated tissue, at a rate depending on the local free/dissolved concentration gradient.
_	Pederson was committed to the assumption that the full social context is necessary to understanding written texts.
_	A common misunderstanding in this strategy is, that is works with the assumption that managers can exactly indicate the information they need.
_	Rabin's method was based on previous work of Gary Miller that solved the problem deterministically with the assumption that the generalized Riemann hypothesis is true, but Rabin's version of the test made no such assumption.
_	According to a neighbor, residents had already left the area on the assumption that Hammad's house would be demolished.
_	This model starts from the assumption that an ensemble of instantons cannot be described by a mere sum of separate instantons.
_	Demonstration of this result is fairly straightforward under the assumption that is continuous.
_	In classical mechanics, lengths are measured based on the assumption that the locations of all points involved are measured simultaneously.
_	the assumption that a good set of features can be extracted from the object
_	Both sparsity and structured sparsity regularization methods seek to exploit the assumption that the output variable formula_1 (i.e., response, or dependent variable) to be learned can be described by a reduced number of variables in the input space formula_2 (i.e., the domain, space of features or explanatory variables).
_	NIST reported that a simulation model based on the assumption that combustible vapors burned immediately upon mixing with the incoming oxygen showed that "at any given location, the duration of [gas] temperatures near 1,000 °C was about 15 to 20 [minutes].
_	She examines the assumption that individuals may progress to the rhetorical message design logic, which is the highest level of development.
_	In particular, adult education reflects a specific philosophy about learning and teaching based on the assumption that adults can and want to learn, that they are able and willing to take responsibility for that learning, and that the learning itself should respond to their needs.
_	Communicate knowledge manifesto is based on the assumption that the graphic designer should be focused on spreading knowledge as much as possible.
_	In psychology, anomalistic psychology is the study of human behaviour and experience connected with what is often called the paranormal, with the assumption that there is nothing paranormal involved.
_	The Schrödinger–Newton equation can be derived under the assumption that gravity remains classical, even at the fundamental level, and that the right way to couple quantum matter to gravity is by means of the semiclassical Einstein equations.
_	However, this is possible only by making the assumption that the two nuclei are fixed relative to each other, which essentially reduces the problem to a single-body problem within an energy potential.
_	The method of proof is interesting, in that the inequality is shown first under the assumption that the Riemann hypothesis is true, secondly under the contrary assumption.
_	However, the court did not issue any injunctive relief as requested by the plaintiff but rather relied "on the assumption that the law having been declared, the State will comply."
_	Here, a color is calculated for one point on each polygon (usually for the first vertex in the polygon, but sometimes for the centroid for triangle meshes), based on the polygon's surface normal and on the assumption that all polygons are flat.
_	Let formula_66 be the set of positively labeled bags and let formula_67 be the set of negatively labeled bags, then the best candidate for the representative instance is given by formula_68, where the diverse density formula_69 under the assumption that bags are independently distributed given the concept formula_65.
_	Mr. Peacock, the chief of the factory in Patna, was imprisoned by the Governor with the assumption that he was involved in the dispute.
_	Soon it is clear that animals are permitted to view many private things on the assumption that they will remain silent, such as the host Sir Wilfred's commentary on one guest's intelligence and the hope that she will buy his car, or the implied sexual activities of some of the other guests.
_	To believe in God means to accept life on the assumption that it harbors conditions in the outer world and drives in the human spirit which together impel man to transcend himself.
_	The documentary makers found no archival evidence from newspapers of these events, leading to the assumption that the story was crafted to fit the remains.
_	Alternatively, the requirement that "Y" be a Hausdorff space can be relaxed to the assumption that "Y" be a general topological space, but then the limit of a function may not be unique.
_	The second is innate potential: the assumption that an object will fulfill its predetermined course of development (Kanovsky, 2007).
_	Compulsory heterosexuality is the assumption that it is traditionally "normal" or favorable to be heterosexual.
_	Secondly, the assumption that the ideal forces were separated into the top and bottom flanges was increasingly unrealistic with the development of stressed skin and monocoque designs, where loads were more evenly shared.
_	1) the assumption that religious confession leads to mystery and 2) with that assumption people can embrace the spiritual wealth of humanity.
_	The original intent of NULL in SQL was to represent missing data in a database, i.e. the assumption that an actual value exists, but that the value is not currently recorded in the database.
_	Attempts to date domestication by genetic study or analysis of physical remains rests on the assumption that there was a separation of the genotypes of domesticated and wild populations.
_	The domestic court had decided to suspend the publications on the assumption that the applicants would commit the same kind of offences in the future.
_	Pigou and Friedrich Hayek point out that the assumption that the government can determine the marginal social cost of a negative externality and convert that amount into a monetary value is a weakness of the Pigovian tax.
_	Adams, who did not harbor fond memories of that cartoon as a child, and who feared he would be typecast as a Gumby artist if he took the job, told Schultz he would only do it if she could get Bob Burden to write it, on the assumption that Schultz would decline this condition.
_	Napoleon's objective, even as early as spring 1796, was the conquest of rich Venetian Lombardy, and in effect French troops, initially welcomed on the assumption that their stay would be brief, had reached Brescia and Verona by the end of the year : these cities were technically under Venetian domination, and thus the foundations were laid for the events of the following year.
_	Finally, under the assumption that the human mind exists outside of space and time New Confucianism resorts to transcendentalism.
_	The division took over in Cyrenaica, on the assumption that the Italians could not begin a counter-offensive until May, even with German reinforcements.
_	Sustainable investing is based on the assumption that financial markets represent a powerful mechanism to promote sustainable business practices.
_	Einstein's theory was motivated by the assumption that every point in the universe can be treated as a 'center', and that correspondingly, physics must act the same in all reference frames.
_	More parameters always fit better, but at the cost of adding unexplained parameters or unwarranted assumptions (such as the assumption that a slight parabolic curve is a more appropriate model than a line).
_	At the Committee meeting Griffith-Jones and Persaud presented a report which goes into more detail about this position, claiming that an FTT could lead to an 0.25% increase in GDP on the assumption that the FTT would "decrease the probability of crises by a mere 5%".
_	Regarding Indian intentions, they began to act politically and to build a rationale based on the assumption that Nehru already had become a lackey of imperialism; for this reason he opposed border talks.
_	However, further analysis revealed that the spiders only do this whilst stationary, which leads to the assumption that there may be a limit to the neural circuitry underlying limb movement that does not allow them to move on 6 legs.
_	Recent work has shown that there may be an additional mixed-strategy Nash equilibrium with positive economic profits under the assumption that monopoly profits are infinite.
_	Kohlberg's stages of moral development are based on the assumption that humans are inherently communicative, capable of reason, and possess a desire to understand others and the world around them.
_	This diminishing MRS relied on the assumption that consumers make consumption decisions to maximise their utility.
_	As a substrate or in soluble form, T-cadherin inhibits neurite outgrowth by motor neurons "in vitro" supporting the assumption that T-cadherin acts as a negative guiding molecule in the developing nervous system.
_	Recently the term of sensory synergy has been introduced supporting the assumption that synergies are the neural strategies to handle sensory and motor systems.
_	Dina faded out of the story with the assumption that she had returned to Paris after being jealous of John's new found friendship with Joanna Manning.
_	It is said that every person has unlimited wants, but limited resources (economics is based on the assumption that only limited resources are available to us).
_	Second, "[i]n all pre-emption cases, and particularly in those in which Congress has 'legislated ... in a field which the States have traditionally occupied', ... we 'start with the assumption that the historic police powers of the States were not to be superseded by the Federal Act unless that was the clear and manifest purpose of Congress'."
_	This led to a flurry of canal proposals in 1792 and 1793, all based on the assumption that the Grand Junction would be built.
_	On the assumption that there is an evolution of philosophical thought in Plato's dialogues from his early years to his middle and later years, the most common modern view is that Plato's dialogues contain a development of thought from closer to that of Socrates' to a doctrine more distinctly Plato's own.
_	David Ben-Gurion accepted it 'on the basis of the assumption that after we build up a strong force following the establishment of the state, we will abolish the partition of the country and we will expand to the whole Land of Israel
_	Selene ultimately escaped, but not before summarily dismissing the assumption that Cannonball was an External, calling into question Cable's conclusion and the reasons for it.
_	Lewis Tappan initially supported the American Colonization Society (ACS), which promoted sending freed blacks from the United States to Africa, based on the assumption that this was their homeland, regardless of where they were born.
_	The Court therefore proceeded on the assumption that there was, in fact, a liberty interest in the accumulation of good-time credits, and turned to the "nature of the constitutionally required procedures".
_	Traditional therapies are based on the assumption that being male is the norm.
_	A limitation of the original directory information tree structure was the assumption that applications searching for an entry in a particular organization would navigate the directory tree by first browsing to the particular country where that organization was based, then to the region where that organization was based, then locate the entry for the organization itself, and then search within that organization for the entry in question.
_	The conventional K-Ar dating method depends on the assumption that the rocks contained no argon at the time of formation and that all the subsequent radiogenic argon (i.e., Ar) was quantitatively retained.
_	Therefore, under the assumption that all poor would be cared for, begging was completely forbidden.
_	However, my study was designed to test the assumption that the danger of radiation is simply proportional to the radiation dose, which is the only evidence that low-level radiation may be harmful.
_	On the assumption that she is indeed to be identified as Neferititi and using preserved remains, modern technology and artistry, a team led by Expedition Unknown's host Josh Gates presented a reconstruction of what The Younger Lady would have looked like in her full royal regalia.
_	Graham agreed to pay Allardyce £15,000 to cancel his contract, acting under the assumption that Allardyce would struggle to find a club willing to offer him £300 a week.
_	This picture attracted large crowds on the assumption that it was the first authentic likeness of Napoleon exhibited in England.
_	This calls into question the assumption that dog teeth are relatively small due to recent selection, suggesting that dog dentition is plesiomorphic from an ancestor that was smaller than the wolf.
_	French plans as developed by Marshal Ferdinand Foch in 1919 were based on the assumption that in the event of a war with the "Reich", the French forces in the Rhineland were to embark upon an offensive to seize the Ruhr.
_	Very often, the quantities that describe the internal states of the input and output materials are estimated on the assumption that they are bodies in their own states of internal thermodynamic equilibrium.
_	The film "Rumor Has It…" is based on the assumption that "The Graduate" is based on real events which become uncovered.
_	From this, and using the fact that "G" has odd order, sufficient information is available to obtain estimates for |"G"| and arrive at a contradiction to the assumption that "G" is simple.
_	He rejected the assumption that youth receive help from their families more than older people and found there is not enough difference to warrant reducing funding to create such substandard living conditions.
_	Their conduct in this respect is the more noteworthy because the Sixth General Council acted throughout on the assumption that the doctrinal definitions of the Roman Pontiff were irreformable.
_	In 1955 he denounced the assumption that the English "were in some peculiar way wholly foreign and alien to Wales", and ridiculed basing a nation on "poets, preachers and musicians".
_	Euclid is often erroneously reported to have proved this result by contradiction, beginning with the assumption that the finite set initially considered contains all prime numbers, or that it contains precisely the "n" smallest primes, rather than any arbitrary finite set of primes.
_	These dentition patterns are similar to that of "Morganucodon", allowing one to make the assumption that these dentition patterns arose within Thrinaxodontidae and extended into the records of early Mammalia.
_	Marek Niedźwiecki started writing his blog on 14 October 2007 with the assumption that it will be a kind of travel journal (he was just leaving for Australia).
_	One essential point in this approach is the assumption that the scattering properties of the surface, i.e. of the individual atoms, are known in detail.
_	This union allowed the wife to become independent sooner than cum manu, under the assumption that the fathers are likely to have died before a husband.
_	Therefore, given the functional relationship f"(Y)|θ and under the assumption that there are identical measurement error distributions for the reference and focal groups it can be concluded that under the null hypothesis:
_	On the assumption that formula_66 is a total ordering of formula_1, the complement of the upper contour set is the strict lower contour set.
_	In his book, "Islamic Commercial Law" (2000), Kamali wrote, for example, that many have "passed prohibitive judgments on futures and options" who have "not only failed to produce decisive evidence in support of their positions but have done so on the assumption that futures trading has no social utility and has no bearing on the welfare... of the people."
_	Such a killing would only be legal if the person killing had either acted with permission, or on the assumption that an unconscious person wanted to die.
_	The court made a declaration that Webster was legally entitled to use the hall at a certain time for the purpose of his election campaign, on the assumption that the local council would obey it.
_	However, the assumption that the delineations of linguistics always align with those of culture and ethnicity must not be made.
_	If is disconnected and formula_10 is a separation of (with formula_11 disjoint and open in ), then each formula_12 must be entirely contained in either or , since otherwise, formula_13 and formula_14 (which are disjoint and open in formula_12) would be a separation of formula_12, contradicting the assumption that it is connected.
_	Except in the case of insanity, these grounds of divorce were based on the guilt (or fault) principle: that is, on the assumption that, in every divorce action, only one of the spouses is to blame for the breakdown of the marriage, the other spouse being completely innocent.
_	The British historian Sir Ian Kershaw in the 2000 edition of his book "The Nazi Dictatorship" argued that Hillgruber's approach was flawed as it was based on the assumption that to "understand" a period in history required one to "identify" with one side or the other.
_	If the assumption that "M" and "N" are simply connected is dropped, "h"-cobordisms need not be cylinders; the obstruction is exactly the Whitehead torsion τ ("W", "M") of the inclusion formula_34.
_	Others challenge the assumption that civil society in the Arab world is weak, pointing to the flourishing of civil society activity visible when regimes permit a degree of liberalization, which in turn permits civil society to make further demands for political opening.
_	We may expect the "in" field to resemble the asymptotic behaviour of the free field as , making the assumption that in the far away past interaction described by the current is negligible, as particles are far from each other.
_	Before the original "Doctor Who" series reached its conclusion, some tentative plans had been made for a proposed 27th season under the assumption that it would maintain the then-current pattern of two four-part and two three-part stories.
_	In further explaining how pathogenic beliefs develop, CMT starts with the assumption that humans through evolution are geared towards adaptation.
_	On the assumption that this hypothesis is correct, the exposed Aorounga crater is sometimes referred to as Aorounga South.
_	From the beginning he ruled with the assumption that he alone was acceptable to the Soviet Union as Finnish President.
_	The set should be "minimal" because, under the assumption that the brain is sufficient to give rise to any given conscious experience, the question is which of its components is necessary to produce it.
_	Formics live in vast underground colonies, usually without light, informing the assumption that Formics make use of sensory apparatus outside the range of the electromagnetic spectrum visible to humans.
_	However, with the next French presidential election being held in April and May 2017, and the next German federal election likely to be held in autumn 2017, "people close to the E.U. Commission" were reported as saying that the European Commission was at the time working under the assumption that Article 50 notification would not be made before September 2017.
_	After the introduction, the remainder of the book proceeds under the assumption that the IPCC majority view is correct.
_	Based on the assumption that women's libido only exists in order to secure the creation of offspring and is therefore fundamentally different from men's libido, Elberskirchen argued that: "If it was the yearning for a child, there would be no abortion, no infanticide, no suicide.
_	Inflation destroys the assumption that the real value of the unit of account is stable which is the basis of classic accountancy.
_	The Committee stressed that "there is no reliable evidence that the recent changes in the Soviet regime and in Soviet tactics involve any change in the basic Soviet objective of a communist world controlled by the Kremlin," and went on to state that "in the struggle between the imposed coalition dominated by the Kremlin and the free coalition led by the United States, the latter must base its policies on the assumption that the purpose of the Soviet rulers is world domination and that this purpose will constitute the fundamental motivation of all their actions."
_	Incorrectly starting from the assumption that Superman is a human with metahuman abilities (his alien origin had not yet been revealed), the process results in a flawed copy, which Luthor dismissively refers to as "...this bizarre --
_	The print showed each slave being allocated less than 2 metres height and .5-metre width for a lengthy sea voyage that could last for 6 months or more, such figures being calculated on the assumption that there were about 400 slaves on a ship when in fact it was known that there were sometimes more than 600.
_	The Japanese knew that they lacked the logistics to invade India, and the plans for U-Go were based on the assumption that the 14th Army would just collapse, allowing the 15th Army to capture enough food to prevent its men from starving to death.
_	As a consequence of the assumption that cultural norms were expressed in material remains, the normative model equates an archaeological culture with a human culture.
_	Under the assumption that most of the households spend in their life what they earn in their life, the total EVR of the spending of households is the key towards sustainability.
_	"Cornwall" altered course to the north on the assumption that "Pinguin" would head south, which it was.
_	This report was based on the assumption that he owned the entire company, an approach both IKEA and the Kamprad family rejected.
_	However, the assumption that C. michiganensis does not overwinter in the soil is not without controversy.
_	Even the basic assumptions of AI which includes the assumption that ‘in every human situation, there is something that works” is a clear indication that no child is incapable of producing a result that would even surprise the child him/herself.
_	Privileged people see themselves reflected throughout society both in mass media and face-to-face in their encounters with teachers, workplace managers and other authorities, which researchers argue leads to a sense of entitlement and the assumption that the privileged person will succeed in life, as well as protecting the privileged person from worry that they may face discrimination from people in positions of authority.
_	Years later, in a lecture given at Queen's University, Whalley revisited his view of heuristics by questioning predominant assumptions about knowing and rejecting the assumption that knowledge equates with analysis, mastery, and control of a studied object, instead calling for a way of knowing in which poetry is an instrument of inquiry and the poems tell us how to get to know.
_	In 2010, Gonzalo Tancredi presented a report to the IAU evaluating a list of 46 candidates for dwarf-planet status based on light-curve-amplitude analysis and the assumption that the object was more than in diameter.
_	There is no object at this position, but the NGC position is corrected further southeast which leads to the assumption that John Louis Emil Dreyer, creator of the New General Catalogue, had additional information when he catalogued the star.
_	Hence, the assumption that it was sunk south of Goodwin Sands after a collision with HMS Landrail cannot be maintained.
_	The rule is dependent on the assumption that total returns from different asset-types are equal.
_	Vince goes to meet with Ari under the assumption that Ari had taken the position at the studio.
_	But Justin distinctly describes them as headed by youths of Lucanian race; and there appears sufficient evidence of their close connection with the Lucanians to warrant the assumption that these formed an important ingredient in their national composition.
_	Ramanuja's Vishishtadvaita school and Shankara's Advaita school are both nondualism Vedanta schools, both are premised on the assumption that all souls can hope for and achieve the state of blissful liberation; in contrast, Madhvacharya and his Dvaita subschool of Vedanta believed that some souls are eternally doomed and damned.
_	Within the IRE pattern, teachers provide 'directive scaffolding' on the assumption that their job is to transmit knowledge and then assess its appropriation by the learners.
_	Using the assumption that the means of the Gaussians are far away from each other with high probability the samples in the first cluster correspond to samples from the first Gaussian and the samples in the second cluster to samples from the second one.
_	Although the base space is not required to be algebraic, the assumption that all the fibers are isomorphic is very special.
_	Based on the assumption that a country's climate shapes the character of its population, and hence to a large extent the most suitable form of government, Bodin postulated that a hereditary monarchy would be the ideal regime for a temperate nation such as France.
_	Under the assumption that the characteristic of the field "K" does not divide the size of the group, representations of finite groups can be decomposed into a direct sum of irreducible subrepresentations (see Maschke's theorem).
_	He calls a meeting of all the people under the assumption that the thief or thieves will not appear.
_	Reviewing Macdonald's "Separation and Its Discontents" in the "American Jewish Society Review" in 2000, Zev Garber, Professor of Jewish Studies at Los Angeles Valley College, wrote that MacDonald works from the assumption that the dual Torah is the blueprint of the eventual Jewish dominion over the world and that he sees contemporary antisemitism, the Holocaust, and attacks against Israel as "provoked by Jews themselves.
_	Although there have been various folk suggestions regarding the origin of Christmas, the earliest historical source stating December 25 as the date of birth of Jesus was Hippolytus of Rome (170–236), written very early in the 3rd century, based on the assumption that the conception of Jesus took place at the Spring equinox which he placed on March 25, and then added nine months.
_	Herbert A. Simon made the assumption that people had aspirations because they simplify their decision making.
_	The theory of model-centered instruction is based on the assumption that the purpose of instruction is to help learners construct knowledge about objects and events in their environment.
_	This theory is based on the assumption that learners construct mental models as they process information they have acquired through observations of or interactions with objects, events, and environments.
_	He was asked to make his recommendations under the assumption that the court had found Phillip Morris guilty.
_	In 1977, El Al announced plans to reconfigure its aircraft with a small first class cabin and larger business class cabin on the assumption that most transatlantic first-class passengers would shift their business to the Concorde.
_	For example, the assumption that mass is conserved means that for any fixed control volume (for example, a spherical volume) – enclosed by a control surface – the rate of change of the mass contained in that volume is equal to the rate at which mass is passing through the surface from "outside" to "inside", minus the rate at which mass is passing from "inside" to "outside".
_	Abstract artists, taking as their examples the impressionists, as well as Paul Cézanne (1839–1906) and Edvard Munch (1863–1944), began with the assumption that color and shape, not the depiction of the natural world, formed the essential characteristics of art.
_	The resulting theorem (incorporating Rosser's improvement) may be paraphrased in English as follows, where "formal system" includes the assumption that the system is effectively generated.
_	When the term superresolution is used in techniques of inferring object details from statistical treatment of the image within standard resolution limits, for example, averaging multiple exposures, it involves an exchange of one kind of information (extracting signal from noise) for another (the assumption that the target has remained invariant).
_	Owing to the delay in sailing, there was little hope of being able to assist the First Pacific Squadron at the critical passage of the Tsushima Straits; however on the assumption that Vitgeft would be successful, the two squadrons planned to rendezvous in the Sea of Japan.
_	He also ordered an immediate Beaufighter strike led by Wing Commander Charles Read against Penfui airfield, on the assumption that this was where the Japanese raiders were based; four enemy aircraft were destroyed on the ground.
_	The continuing support for the Meic Uilleim in Moray, together with their obviously Gaelic background, can best be explained by the assumption that Domnall's mother was a daughter of Óengus of Moray.
_	Thus, the assumption that "Γ" is constant is justified.
_	The band went into the album with the assumption that DreamWorks was going to drop them at any moment, so they wanted to take advantage of the opportunity by working with their "dream producer".
_	However, Appius Claudius had the aqueduct named after him as, according to Frontinus, at the time that the aqueduct was being built the eighteen month terms of Plautius and Appius as censors was coming to an end and under the assumption that Appius was going to resign in appropriate fashion, Plautius went ahead and resigned in a timely manner.
_	Under the assumption that the model errors or disturbances are independent and identically distributed according to a normal distribution and that the boundary condition that the derivative of the log likelihood with respect to the true variance is zero, this becomes ("up to an additive constant", which depends only on "n" and not on the model):
_	There was speculation in the UK that it would be delayed, and the European Commission in July 2016 was under the assumption that Article 50 notification would not be made before September 2017.
_	Critics have coined the term "The Psi Assumption" to describe "the assumption that any significant departure from the laws of chance in a test of psychic ability is evidence that something anomalous or paranormal has occurred...[in other words] assuming what they should be proving."
_	The British in late 1779 embarked on a new strategy based on the assumption that most Southerners were Loyalists at heart.
_	In 1947 Canon Buchanan-Dunlop, another local historian, writing in Worcester Archaeological Transactions, accepted the assumption that No 9 was part of the old friary.
_	assumptions about local and global economic parameters, and the process develops estimates for the level and composition of expenditures for three years beyond the budgeted fiscal year, with the assumption that existing policies are maintained, planned policies are implemented, and that the Government's planned objectives continue to be pursued.
_	Clearly, such an objective is open to criticism for what is termed cultural elitism; that is, the assumption that some aesthetic expressions are inherently superior - at least as determined by a cognoscenti concerned with the acquisition of cultural capital.
_	Aneroid barometers sold for domestic use typically have no compensation under the assumption that they will be used within a controlled room temperature range.
_	Using the assumption that "C", the total concentration, is constant, "C" and "C" can be related in the following expression:
_	In metal plasticity, the assumption that the plastic strain increment and deviatoric stress tensor have the same principal directions is encapsulated in a relation called the flow rule.
_	In 1993, she published her first academic paper as a co-author on lysosomal degradation which challenged the assumption that it was non-specific.
_	The Lynx protocol is based on the assumption that a connection between two sites is capable of full-duplex transmission.
_	The priesthood refined observations and recorded eclipses of the sun and moon, and movements of Venus and the stars; these were measured against dated events in the past, on the assumption that similar events would occur in the future when the same astronomical conditions prevailed.
_	As for the assumption that the Carians descended from Neolithic settlers, this is contradicted by the fact that Neolithic Caria was essentially desolate.
_	In "Comme s'il en Pleuvait" (2001), the same character finds that the assumption that he is gay, due to a close male friendship, is to his benefit when in fashionable literary groups, where he is seen as more interesting and trendy.
_	At that time, the assumption that Japanese "kami" and buddhas were essentially the same evolved into a theory called , which held that native kami were manifestations or avatars of buddhas, bodhisattvas and other Buddhist deities.
_	Earlier estimates were based on the assumption that fossil-fuel use would continue until reserves were exhausted, and predicted a runaway greenhouse effect, a climate similar to that on Venus.
_	The method is based on the assumption that the rating assigned to the rival teams is proportional to the outcome of each match.
_	When looking at the left and right hemisphere scales, the test is based on the assumption that the left hemisphere is verbally dominant and composed of the motor and tactile scales that represent right-hand sensory/motor performance while the right hemisphere consists of items representing left-hand sensory/ motor performance.
_	Whether there is between study variation (excess heterogeneity) can be tested under the assumption that effect sizes are homogeneous or have a tendency to a central mean.
_	The seeding in these draws (or in any cases where the results of a tie in the previous round were not known at the time of draw) was carried out under the assumption that the higher-ranked teams of the previous round would advance to this round, which means if a lower-ranked team were to advance, it would simply take the seeding of its defeated opponent.
